_	Though they appear to be similar, one asks where the visions are now ("Where is it now") while the other doesn't ("Whither is fled"), and they leave open the possibility that the visions could return:
_	After a third new case was confirmed on 2 July, and it was discovered that all 3 new cases had shared a meal of dog meat, researchers looked at the possibility that the meat may have been involved in the transfer of the virus.
_	Commenting on the matter, acting FBI Director Andrew McCabe "said he was unaware of any such request" but left open the possibility that Comey had requested the president to shift existing resources to the Russia investigation.
_	During October 2000, Daniel Scotto, the most renowned utility analyst on Wall Street, suspended his ratings on all energy companies conducting business in California because of the possibility that the companies would not receive full and adequate compensation for the deferred energy accounts used as the basis for the California Deregulation Plan enacted during the late 1990s.
_	Now a principle was formulated that allowed for the possibility that, in some cases, the interests of animals might prevail over and above those of science and industry.
_	Similarly, Michael Eisenstadt argued that Khamenei may have issued the fatwa to reduce the international pressure on Iran and that "no religious principle would prevent Khamenei from modifying or supplanting his initial fatwa if circumstances were to change" and "expediency/interest of the regime (maslahat) so required," Others have raised the possibility that the fatwa may fall under the Shia practice of taqiyya: dissembling to avoid the threat of religious persecution.
_	The Cit variants in the population were found to possess a number of genetic markers unique to the Ara-3 population, which excluded the possibility that they were contaminants, rather than spontaneous mutants.
_	Perry cautioned Congress in September of the possibility that President Clinton would veto the FY 1996 Defense budget bill because Congress had added $7 billion in overall spending, mainly for weapon systems that the Defense Department did not want, and because of restrictions on contingency operations Congress had put in the bill.
_	After the primary election, the Cook Political Report moved the district (along with four other districts) from "Toss Up" to "Lean Democratic," noting Comstock's underwhelming performance against Hill, including in the Shenandoah Valley, and the possibility that Republican senatorial candidate Corey "Stewart's nomination could alienate independents, depress Republican interest in the Senate race and allow Kaine to run up the score in the 10th CD, compounding Comstock's challenge."
_	This opens up the possibility that she may have him resurrected.
_	Both studies comment on the possibility that these findings could indicate some state of heightened voluntary control over attention during mindfulness meditation.
_	Sheridan was mindful of the possibility that his force could come under attack from the west because he had blocked Confederate Major Generals W.H.F. "Rooney" Lee's and Thomas L.Rosser's approach from the south the previous day.
_	This raises the possibility that EPM is a suitable model for testing GABA-related compounds, such as benzodiazepines or direct GABA agonists, but not for other drugs.
_	However, there is also the possibility that they will fit into the existing ecosystem and their introduction lead to an enrichment of the resident wildlife.
_	This raised the possibility that, for the first time since the Spanish transition to democracy, parliamentary deadlock over the investiture of a Prime Minister would require a new election to be held.
_	These three findings are consistent with the possibility that agents act upon the belief that some types of transactions are relatively unlikely for black customers (statistical discrimination)."
_	However, the panel left open the possibility that Chevron could still be liable for damages incurred by individuals.
_	In recent years, environmental organisations such as Greenpeace have argued that exploration for oil on the north west continental shelf slopes of Europe should be curtailed due to the possibility that is it damaging to the "Lophelia" reefs - conversely, "Lophelia" has recently been observed growing on the legs of oil installations, specifically the Brent Spar rig which Greenpeace campaigned to remove.
_	This allowed for the possibility that Marinello was in Old Metairie at the time of his wife's murder, around 4:00 p.m.
_	Binney also commented on the unchanged interior which included the possibility that the largest room in the house the second floor gallery would be suitable for conversion to a private cinema, and a caveat on the mansion insisting that the chapel and priest's house attached to the house were let to the Roman Catholic Church.
_	One overshot flake and 3 partial overshot flakes found in the Buttermilk Creek Complex suggest the possibility that they were starting to develop the knapping technologies that would be indicative of later Clovis technology.
_	Tilbury, in his book "Cornelius Cardew—A Life Unfinished" suggests that the possibility that Cardew was killed because of his prominent Marxist-Leninist involvement "cannot be ruled out".
_	In China, the possibility that a film approved by Central Board of Film Censors can be banned due to the disagreement of a specific leading cadre has never been eliminated.
_	The main drawback of coiling is the possibility that the aneurysm will recur; this risk is extremely small in the surgical approach.
_	Although Libby had pointed out as early as 1955 the possibility that this assumption was incorrect, it was not until discrepancies began to accumulate between measured ages and known historical dates for artefacts that it became clear that a correction would need to be applied to radiocarbon ages to obtain calendar dates.
_	However, Katsonopoulou and Soter raised the possibility that "poros" could have meant "an inland lagoon".
_	The evidence of an amiable relationship between William I and Dubgall could add weight to the possibility that Dubgall was also involved.
_	Little is known of Ricart, apart from his office as town clerk and the possibility that he was a merchant, also known as Robert Ricardes.
_	In these cases, the "interrogators" are not even aware of the possibility that they are interacting with computers.
_	In the Senate Swagerman voted for an againstment which would end the possibility that a person cannot be re-tried after a final verdict of acquittal.
_	In 43% of cases the individual held the beliefs with less than complete conviction, and was able to varying degrees to consider the possibility that the odor was not existent.
_	This mechanistic model raises the possibility that COI1 serves as an intracellular receptor for JA signals.
_	After the Club of Rome's controversial 1972 report "The Limits to Growth" produced widespread alarm about the possibility that population growth and resource depletion might result in a 21st-century global "collapse", Hudson responded with an analysis of its own, "The Next 200 Years", which concluded, instead, that scientific and practical innovations were likely to produce significantly better worldwide living standards.
_	Sandrin apparently only wrote secular music, and only chansons, although as is the case with many composers of the era there is always the possibility that much of his music was lost.
_	The final possible negative consequence is the possibility that women will be placed with an abusive or exploitative husband.
_	Chao explicitly contemplated the possibility that Wu and other principalities might rebel, but justified the action by asserting that if they were going to rebel, it would be better to let them rebel earlier than later when they might be more prepared.
_	In her book "The Two Roads of Papua", she dismissed the possibility that the lights are from "any human agency."
_	However, the appeals court also left open the possibility that Google might have a "fair use" defense.
_	The Catholic Church endorses this view, but the possibility that hormonal contraception has post-fertilization effects is disputed within the scientific community, including some anti-abortion physicians.
_	Oddly, Berman seems unconcerned with the possibility that he may be accused of murder.
_	This technology has encountered some opposition; a study conducted by researchers at Arizona State University examined the possibility that the silver particles could be released when the socks were washed, posing environmental concerns.
_	There was an extensive library at Piso's Villa of the Papyri at Herculaneum, a significant part of which was formed by a library of Epicurean texts, some of which were present in more than one copy, suggesting the possibility that this section of Piso's library was Philodemus' own.
_	He did not, however, warn Hitler of the problem of the possibility that Grynszpan might claim that he had had homosexual relations with vom Rath.
_	Chris McKay agreed with Strobel that presence of life, as suggested in McKay's 2005 article, is a possible explanation for the findings about hydrogen and acetylene, but also cautioned that other explanations are currently more likely: namely the possibility that the results are due to human error, to a meteorological process, or to the presence of some mineral catalyst enabling hydrogen and acetylene to react chemically.
_	The script also hinted at the possibility that Phones also fancied Marina."
_	Meanwhile, Queen Alice and Loue discuss Liddell's powers, the possibility that Liddell is a creature of the underworld, and plans to continue to monitor her in the future.
_	During the negotiations over the clause "take a part in hostilities," the word "direct" was added, opening up the possibility that child volunteers could be involved indirectly in hostilities, gathering and transmitting military information, helping in the transportation of arms and munitions, provision of supplies, etc.
_	On the other hand, Blanchot's own literary works, like the famous "Thomas the Obscure", heavily influenced Levinas's and Bataille's ideas about the possibility that our vision of reality is blurred because of the use of words (thus making everything you perceive automatically as abstract as words are).
_	However, the storyline has been a highly controversial and discussed storyline because of the possibility that it glamorised the idea.
_	Sharon sees the possibility that an Abbasid-period poem found written on the wall of a nearby catacomb might mark the beginning of the "maqām" of Shaykh Abreik.
_	He even considered the possibility that their "exile from Europe had sapped her will to live."
_	During the trip, Disston realized the possibility that enormous tracts of land could be reclaimed for agriculture by using canals to drain Florida's Lake Okeechobee.
_	Efforts to impose them on the 17th century have appeared forced and largely barren, and I want to propose, not as a new dogmatism, but as a topic for discussion, the possibility that we need to come at the problem from a different angle, using seventeenth-century categories instead of nineteenth-century ones.
_	Based on the heuristic information it has, Algorithm B cannot rule out the possibility that a path through that node has a lower cost.
_	The album's cover art, photographed by Ament, features two skeletons wearing crowns, suggesting the possibility that the two represent a king and a queen.
_	However, Ebert was well aware of the possibility that Germany would not be in a position to reject the treaty.
_	It suggests the possibility that Sheppard may have survived his execution and escaped to the Americas.
_	Spengler's obscurity, intuitionalism, and mysticism were easy targets, especially for the Positivists and neo-Kantians who rejected the possibility that there was meaning in world history.
_	Moreover, besides the threat of assassination, naval leaders were also worried by the possibility that the President's ship would strike a mine or come to grief in some other way.
_	On the other hand, like the Zancigs, he never completely discounted the possibility that Spiritualism might contain elements of truth, and from 1919 onward he also operated a publishing house, the C. Alexander Publishing Company in Los Angeles, California, which released his own astrological, pro-Spiritualist, and New Thought material, including a 5-volume series called "The Inner Secrets of Psychology" and a booklet for his students titled "Personal Lessons, Codes, and Instructions for Members of the Crystal Silence League."
_	France manager Henri Michel, confronted after the game with the possibility that Bellone's penalty should not have stood, pointed to the Carlos incident in open play and said "There was a certain justice in that".
_	Importantly, however, preliminary data suggest that there seem to be identifiable meningeal lymphatic vessels in post-mortem human tissue, suggesting the possibility that they contribute to human disease.
_	The newcomers include heath groundsel, which is unknown elsewhere in the Borough, suggesting the possibility that its seed may have lain dormant in the soil since the last coppice was cut before the Second World War.
_	Collecting counterfeits and forgeries is a controversial area because of the possibility that counterfeits might someday reenter the coin market as authentic coins, but US statutory and case law do not explicitly prohibit possession of counterfeit coins.
_	Ian Archer has argued that "the possibility that England might become another Habsburg milch cow was very real".
_	A militant African American editor indicated in 1920 how this "new line of thought, a new method of approach" included the possibility that "the intrinsic standard of Beauty and aesthetics does not rest in the white race" and that "a new racial love, respect and consciousness may be created."
_	Ullrich, Kühn, and Kühn mention the possibility that the trunks regrew from a stump left after a forest clearing or natural decay, but also mention the opinion of other experts who believe the tree always had two trunks.
_	Craig Keener adds the possibility that he could have been a retired Centurion who had been granted land in the area.
_	In the "Batman/Teenage Mutant Ninja Turtles" crossover miniseries, when the Foot Clan initially arrive in Gotham, Batman considers the possibility that they are a branch of the League of Assassins, but dismisses the idea as the Foot's combat skills show a focus on a specific area of martial arts as opposed to the more varied skills of the League.
_	As Bud strengthened off the coast of Mexico, the government of Mexico issued a tropical storm watch from Manzanillo to Cabo Corrientes, at 21:00 UTC on June 10, with the possibility that Bud's large wind field could bring gale-force winds to that portion of the Mexican coast.
_	She has written about the guilt of her miscarriage and the possibility that she had thoughts of harming her baby.
_	Alan Sweezy described the difference: "But, whereas business-cycle theory treats depression as a temporary, though recurring, phenomenon, the theory of secular stagnation brings out the possibility that depression may become the normal condition of the economy."
_	Napoleon did not seriously consider the possibility that Mack would cross the Danube and move away from his central base, but he did realize that seizing the bridges at Günzburg would yield a large strategic advantage.
_	The series makes passing references to quantum chromodynamics (the appearance of Strong Force-brand glue), computer science (two separate books in a closet labeled "P" and "NP" respectively, referring to the possibility that P and NP-complete problem classes are distinct), electronics (an X-ray — or more accurately, an "F-ray" — of Bender's head reveals a 6502 microprocessor), and genetics (a mention of Bender's "robo- or R-NA").
_	She claims that since coming out is so difficult for gay men, many don't want to come out a second time as bisexual; the existence of male bisexuality can be threatening to some gay men because it raises the possibility that they themselves might be bisexual.
_	The National Commission on Terrorist Attacks Upon the United States investigated the possibility that Vigilant Guardian preparations compromised the military's response to the attacks on September 11.
_	The goal is to increase the possibility that a victim in cardiac arrest will receive cardiopulmonary resuscitation (CPR) quickly.
_	Later Javanese chronicles provide varying accounts of the conquest, but they all describe Demak as the legitimate direct successor of Majapahit although they do not mention the possibility that by the time of its final conquest, Majapahit no longer ruled.
_	Long considered a classic Nabataean town on the ancient spice route, archaeologists are now considering the possibility that Shivta was a Byzantine agricultural colony and a way station for pilgrims en route to the Saint Catherine's Monastery in the Sinai Peninsula.
_	Under his command, ACA apparently began to work closely with the EPP, leading experts to consider the possibility that ACA, weakened by their many losses, might fully rejoin the EPP.
_	Various circumstances were discussed and certain facts came to light such as who may have been in charge on the steamboat, that there were only two lifeboats on board, there may not have been enough water buckets on board in case of a fire, was the boat been overcrowded, had there been previous fires on the "Henry Clay", the possibility that the boiler safety valves were tied down to allow for faster speed.
_	In June 2006, alligator snapping turtles, which are a non-native species, were found in the pond, and there is the possibility that they are breeding.
_	A Diprotodon leg bone was found in a swamp in the 1890s and conjecture surrounds the possibility that the animals were hunted by local aboriginal groups.
_	Clare notes that the centre is slightly domed, and raises the possibility that the original site may have been a stone circle (destroyed) with four portal stones, with the bank being added later.
_	A team of U.N. inspectors, led by Swedish diplomat Hans Blix was admitted, into the country; their final report stated that Iraqis capability in producing "weapons of mass destruction" was not significantly different from 1992 when the country dismantled the bulk of their remaining arsenals under terms of the ceasefire agreement with U.N. forces, but did not completely rule out the possibility that Saddam still had weapons of mass destruction.
_	Lecuona and Desojo also noted that the poor development of the fourth trochanter and femoral head was shared with members of the Sphenosuchia, which allowed for the possibility that they formed a monophyletic group.
_	On October 31, "Christophe-willem.com" announced the possibility that the album would contain a duet with Kylie Minogue on the track called ""Sensitized"".
_	For simplicity, the foregoing account of superrationality ignored mixed strategies: the possibility that the best choice could be to flip a coin, or more generally to choose different outcomes with some probability.
_	Pat congratulates Dunph for being the first of the family to go to college and the younger brother not to be trumped surmises the possibility that it just very well may be that Jackie himself may be the first to graduate.
_	There is also the possibility that he was requested to compose the story by Lord Jayabaya or indeed did so just because he wished to.
_	Coaching can also nurture collective commitment to the team and its objectives, a shared promise that can reduce free riding and increase the possibility that team members will demonstrate personal initiative.
_	Although it was assumed to be a spin 1/2 Dirac particle, the possibility that the neutron was a spin 3/2 particle lingered.
_	Since both forms of microscopy examine living cells, there is always the possibility that the cells will move, causing false results.
_	Nizer tracked down Kushnevitz, the Russian baritone at issue: "He [Kushnevitz] recalled the incident vividly, for this, as he put it, was one of the great moments in his life - the possibility that he would star in a Chaplin picture.
_	Although Sukenik considered this the same as the term in the Talmud, he also entertained the possibility that the final letter "ayin" was left out due to lack of space between the decorations between which it was inscribed.
_	The team started off the year winning 20 of its first 25 games, creating the possibility that the Reds would win the World Series under their new manager.
_	Sobriety checkpoints or roadblocks involve law enforcement officials stopping every vehicle (or more typically, every "n"th vehicle) on a public roadway and investigating the possibility that the driver might be too impaired to drive due to alcohol or drug consumption.
_	The second suggested the possibility that the immune system detected "danger", through a series of what we would now call damage associated molecular pattern molecules (DAMPs), working in concert with both positive and negative signals derived from other tissues.
_	There is evidence to suggest that humans occupied parts of central Alaska before 13,500 B.P. with the possibility that people lived in the region even earlier.
_	Hikosaka pointed out the huge energy contained by nuclei and the possibility that both nuclear power generation and weapons could be created.
_	Faced with the possibility that the British would haul more cannons up the cliffs and knock down the city's remaining walls, the French fought the British on the Plains of Abraham.
_	Community leaders were faced with the possibility that their town would be cut off and decided that a railroad station must be constructed for passenger and commercial services to ensure the survival of Castor Sulfur Springs.
_	This raised the possibility that he could have received the death penalty if he was convicted.
_	In other words, side-by-side seating mitigates the possibility that the examiner will accidentally influence the subject's responses.
_	He raised the possibility that the thorough search for the ore body might have resulted in the discovery of kaolin.
_	Significantly, at the opening of the , though saying he was very comfortable at McLaren, Räikkönen raised the possibility that he might leave McLaren when his contract expired in 2006, if reliability issues were not solved.
_	This allowed Chamberlain and his immediate allies to distance themselves from the main body of Liberal Unionism (and their Conservative allies) and left open the possibility that they could work with the Liberal party in the future.
_	While Semph was against this protocol for the possibility that it affected other races (i.e., people on Earth), Linah sided with it to safeguard the Concord.
_	Together, Da'Vonne and Jason began telling other HouseGuests about the possibility that Liz was a twin.
_	There is also the possibility that the current inhabitants of the Altai region are descendants of the Pazyryk culture, a continuity that would accord with current ethnic politics:
_	As a rigorous filmmaker, Kerrigan eschews conventional exposition, which raises the possibility that William may be sufficiently deranged to have imagined his daughter's presumed abduction, perhaps even the child's existence.
_	Other researchers also carried out variations of this study, exploring the possibility that people had misunderstood the question.
_	Jansen considered the possibility that the altar table from the tabernacle, now in the Museo Bardini, Florence, was also Pagno's.
_	Migratory aptitude made reference to the possibility that the preferred product of the reaction was the result of an initial stability of one carbon migrating in preference to another.
_	A Russian scientist that was cited in initial TASS reports later told the Associated Press that he was misquoted, cautioning, "Don't believe all you hear from TASS," and "We never gave them part of what they published", and a TASS correspondent admitted the possibility that some "make-believe" had been added to the TASS story, saying, "I think there is a certain portion of truth, but it is not excluded that there is also fantasizing".
_	Like Doolittle, he also rejected the possibility that feedback loops could stabilize the system.
_	Derrick Wester, an investigator with the Jackson County sheriff's office, agreed that they were "trying to make up for" not having considered the possibility that things might not have been what they seemed in 2000.
_	However, he still faced the possibility that he could be deported back to China.
_	Makarkin "et al" suggested the possibility that "Cretomerobius" is an early offshoot genus.
_	Ehrlich also researched autoimmunity, but he specifically rejected the possibility that an organism's immune system could attack the organism's own tissue calling it "horror autotoxicus."
_	Although this does not prove his position as author, it does strengthen the possibility that he had ties to the Paris manuscript.
_	Smith told Daniel Kilkelly of "Digital Spy" that Andrew is oblivious to the possibility that Natasha is lying to him as he is focused on doing the right thing.
_	By this time Gough was discussing with Haig the possibility that the war might go on into 1917, requiring fresh offensives.
_	Questions were asked about the possibility that the article had been written by someone within the BBC itself with the intention of promoting the game.
_	To travel to the lab at Killaloe, he is forced to walk with a priest, a boy who has taken a vow of silence due to the death of his mother, and Joseph Herity, the IRA bomber who detonated the explosive that killed O'Neill's wife and children; their purpose is to confirm his identity, either through Herity's indirect questioning, or the possibility that he will confess to the priest when confronted with the pain his revenge has caused for the boy.
_	The musical closes with Jesse once again bidding Amanda goodbye while The Diva is returned to her former glory despite the possibility that the next "Amanda" is out there ready to challenge her supremacy ("The Goodbye Song").
_	The recovery of an Iceland spar sunstone from an Elizabethan ship which sank near Alderney in 1592 suggests the possibility that the navigational technology may have persisted after the invention of the magnetic compass.
_	As Sisko faces the possibility that his actions may actually force the Romulans to join with the Dominion once Vreenak returns to the Empire, he learns that Vreenak's ship was destroyed en route.
_	Erasmus was at this time famous and Luther almost unknown, leaving open the possibility that the concept itself did not originate from Luther, but rather, if not from Erasmus, then within the wider church reform movement.
_	This is because the Qatari government does not want to commit itself to paying pensions or retirement end of service for people who lived for 20 years, and at the same time avoids the possibility that the person may ask for nationality or citizenship.
_	It is unclear why they cause their webs to vibrate in this way; moving their webs back and forward may increase the possibility that insects flying close by may be ensnared, or the rapid gyrations caused by the spider in its web may make the spider harder to target by predators.
_	Respondents assigned a median 50% probability to the possibility that machine superintelligence will be invented within 30 years of the invention of approximately human-level machine intelligence.
_	Research is considering the possibility that Anii is a tenseless language.
_	However, observations from the INTEGRAL telescope's all-sky SPI-ACS instrument indicated that any energy emission in gamma-rays and hard X-rays from the event was less than one millionth of the energy emitted as gravitational waves, concluding that "this limit excludes the possibility that the event is associated with substantial gamma-ray radiation, directed towards the observer."
_	, the sonority of the chordioid itself is a subset of the Wholetone scale and so subject to some of the symmetries and homogeneity for which that scale is known, and anhemitonic allowing the possibility that the resultant scale be anhemitonic or at least ancohemitonic itself.
_	The December 1938 discovery of nuclear fission by Otto Hahn and Fritz Strassmann—and its explanation and naming by Lise Meitner and Otto Frisch—raised the possibility that an extremely powerful atomic bomb could be created.
_	Thereafter, his movements until 1662 are uncertain: whilst it is known that he was a Puritan and took up preaching, the possibility that he was the "John Williams" who was the vicar of Llanbeblig from 1651 cannot be verified on the surviving information.
_	Yet, according to FAIR, "the possibility that illegal, unpopular government actions might be disrupted is not a consequence to be feared, however—it's the whole point of the U.S. First Amendment.
_	A morphological study and comparisons of plumage and behaviour led some authors to accept that the Snares Islands, Little Barrier Island and Stewart Island forms were all species instead of subspecies of the Auckland Island snipe, also raising the possibility that the Antipodes Island snipe might be a separate species.
_	Though some of these are superficially 'crane-like' and the possibility that some may even be related to extant families traditionally included in the Gruiformes, there are no completely extinct families that can be confidently assigned to core-Gruiformes.
_	The Jewish sage Rabbi Akiva indulged the possibility that Simon could be the Jewish messiah, and gave him the surname "Bar Kokhba" meaning "Son of the Star" in Aramaic, from the Star Prophecy verse from Numbers :
_	Kim replies that she alone is responsible for the accident, expressing guilt at the possibility that she could have killed someone by falling asleep at the wheel.
_	Ochre may have had many uses but the possibility that it was used as a body paint, and therefore had served a symbolic purpose”
_	Finally, Shanzer argues that the reference to the war between Magnentius and Constantius in the work's proem precludes the possibility that Faltonia Betitia Proba arranged "De laudibus Christi", due to the fact that the war took place in the same year as her supposed death.
_	News of the possibility that Jack the Ripper had arrived in New York posed a challenge to NYPD Chief Inspector Thomas Byrnes who had criticized Scotland Yard for its inability to capture Jack the Ripper.
_	This now provides the possibility that "Sam" was a reference to Samson, although the Doctor never calls Samson this to his face.
_	Ann’s life is spared when Sammy raises the possibility that her child, being Jimbo’s as well, might also be a "golden child".
_	However, a statement from Carver raised the possibility that Crowley might not retain this humanity in Season 10.
_	The convention came as result of the scenario where in competitive auctions, the opening bidder would like to show his minimal three-card support for partner's suit on the possibility that partner has five or more cards in it.
_	In light of the possibility that the impact of the notice and comment requirement may be “limited by the fact that some of the most critical decisions in rulemaking are often made before a proposal appears in the Federal Register," the study will cover how proposed rules are developed as a policy-making process.
_	Indeed, relationships within the Emberizidae as defined here are uncertain with the possibility that each of the three main groups may not be all that closely related.
_	Arguing against the bill, some Democrats said that the deadlines would lead to "the possibility that projects will be approved too quickly, which could lead to legal and environmental problems, and more delays, down the road."
_	Trumka was asked to respond to the possibility that some coal companies might hire permanent replacement workers.
_	This shows that in considering materials available for a task, engineers need to consider the possibility that no one single material is adequate for the job; rather, combining multiple materials together may be the best solution.
_	Yezhov could correct the water transportation situation with tough Chekist methods, and his transfer to the "terra incognita" of economic tasks would leave him less time for the NKVD and weaken his position there, thus creating the possibility that in due course he could be removed from the leadership of the punitive apparatus and replaced by fresh people.
_	Law enforcement initially suggested the possibility that Adams's death had been "sex-related" due to the nature of his body when it was discovered, almost entirely nude.
_	Facing the possibility that the dramatic changes in the Middle East could turn peaceful neighbors Egypt and Jordan more hostile to Israel, the Israel Defense Forces aims to build a larger, more flexible force that will be capable of dealing with more than the traditional northern front of Syria and Lebanon.
_	This indicates the possibility that the lyre might have existed in one of Greece's neighboring countries, either Thrace, Lydia, or Egypt, and was introduced into Greece at pre-classic times.
_	Due to the limits of scientific knowledge, it was impossible to rule out the possibility that he hadn't contracted dermatitis during the non-wrongful exposure to brick dust while working in the kiln.
_	In the sympathetic nervous system (SNS), predominant dysautonomia is common along with fibromyalgia, chronic fatigue syndrome, irritable bowel syndrome, and interstitial cystitis, raising the possibility that such dysautonomia could be their common clustering underlying pathogenesis.
_	The bill would prohibit the use of funds: (1) to conduct closure of adjudicatory functions, technical review, or support activities associated with the Yucca Mountain (Nevada) geologic repository license application; or (2) for actions that irrevocably remove the possibility that Yucca Mountain may be a repository option in the future.
_	Some in the media questioned the move, wondering whether it was motivated more by an inability to fill the 70,000 seat stadium and the possibility that empty seats would show a lack of enthusiasm.
_	In "Astonishing X-Men" #14, during an impromptu telepathic "therapy session", Emma Frost presented Cyclops with the possibility that his lack of control over his optic blasts actually stems not from physical brain damage, but from a sort of mental block that the young Scott imposed upon himself after the combined traumas of the loss of his parents, separation from his brother, and shocking manifestation of his powers; this is seen as a coping mechanism, giving Scott something to focus on and try to maintain some sort of control over at a time when events completely out of his control had effectively shattered the life he had led up to that point.
_	Masterson's biographer has raised the possibility that they were married on November 21, 1893, two weeks after Emma's divorce from Edwin Moulton.
_	An article written by William F. Ruddiman explores the possibility that methane emissions began to rise as a result of anthropogenic activity 5000 years ago when ancient cultures started to settle and use agriculture, rice irrigation in particular, as a primary food source.
_	Studies of expression of mutant DISC1 prenatally and postnatally have demonstrated varying effects, indicating the possibility that early postnatal expression of mutant DISC1 causes features of autism.
_	The musicologist Bernd Baselt has raised the possibility that Handel's Harpsichord Suite in G Minor, HWV 453, is an arrangement of the overture to "Nero".
_	However, since these traits greatly benefit sexual selection, their usefulness in providing more mating opportunities overrides the possibility that the trait could lead to a shortening of its lifespan through predation or starvation.
_	While the Senate Report does not exclude the possibility that individuals may make use of that chapter as well, it notes that the cost of filing for chapter 11 would likely prevent individuals from using it.
_	The atmosphere shows isotopic evidence of having been stripped of volatile elements by offgassing and solar wind erosion over time, implying the possibility that Venus may have had liquid water at some point in the distant past; no direct evidence for this has been found.
_	T F Maples was not only the young Disraeli's employer and friend of his father's, but also his prospective father-in-law: Isaac and Maples entertained the possibility that the latter's only daughter might be a suitable match for Benjamin.
_	Large fluctuations observed in above ground population size suggest the possibility that seed banking plays a significant role in "W. carteri"s biology.
_	This does not however exclude the possibility that such organisms may be found in the future.
_	Although the lack of Colavita effect in people with one eye begins to explore the possibility that a decrease in visual dominance potentially allows for the adaption of other senses, such as audition.
_	gov further states that "It is vital that all household members learn how to shut off the water at the main house valve" and cautions that the possibility that rusty valves might require replacement.
_	The ruling left open the possibility that Belarus could apply again.
_	Leeds United's relegation to League One in 2007 may have reignited this rivalry, although Bradford's relegation to League Two removed the possibility that the three major West Yorkshire football teams (Bradford, Huddersfield and Leeds) might be in the same division for the first time since the 1980s in the 2007–08 season; ultimately only Huddersfield and Leeds met each other in the third tier.
_	However, in "Penguins of Madagascar", he appeared to have been abandoned as an egg, leading to the possibility that he is an orphan.
_	Its precise location remains unknown although various suggestions have been made, including the possibility that it has since been lost to erosion.
_	The report raises the possibility that Portugal's economic interests in Angola influence the country to neglect the issue and that Angola has influenced the Portuguese judicial system to ignore specific cases of corruption.
_	Badat and Malaysian terrorists discussed the possibility that the cockpit door in airliner might be locked: "So I said: 'How about I give you one of my bombs to open a cockpit door?'"
_	As L.A. prosecutors investigated potential voter fraud, several citizens allegedly told the "Times" that city officials encouraged them to fill out absentee ballots in a manner that election experts said has significantly raised the possibility that state law has been violated.
_	"U. minor" is present on Gotland, leaving open the possibility that Fries's "Ulmus montana nitida" was not pure wych.
_	With the possibility of past water, there was the possibility that life could have begun on Mars and it was once again perceived to be more Earth-like.
_	To discuss the possibility that it might be necessary to start a new political party to avert nuclear war, Meacham invited Hagan, Riesman, and about forty persons he considered influential or useful to a conference in the West Texas hills at a Friends country retreat.
_	Many araneomorphs are immediately identifiable as such since they are found on webs designed for the capture of prey or exhibit other habitat choices that eliminate the possibility that they could be mygalomorphs.
_	Johnson states that an associated "amicus curiae" brief by the National Academy of Sciences improperly "defined 'science' in such a way that [it was impossible to] dispute the claims of the scientific establishment" and a rule it proposed against "negative argumentation [eliminated] the possibility that science has not discovered how complex organisms could have developed".
_	There is the possibility that at the time Midas came the city was essentially unpopulated.
_	Hooke was prepared to accept the possibility that some such fossils represented species that had become extinct, possibly in past geological catastrophes.
_	First, given that children use different conflict-resolution tactics during various developmental stages, one must rule out the possibility that the questioned behavior is in fact age-appropriate for the child exhibiting it.
_	The KT Debate covers the various theories discussing the mass extinction of dinosaurs at the boundary between the Cretaceous and Tertiary periods and the possibility that the cause of the dinosaurs' mass extinction poses a threat to humanity today.
_	There has been speculation about the possibility that the sentence was headed to Felipe II in praise of related to the image that was Sun-King.
_	In January 2018 three men were arrested by police investigating the possibility that Farquhar and his near neighbour Ann Moore-Martin may have been murdered.
_	Had the invaders somehow managed to overcome all these difficulties, there was still the possibility that they could be intercepted at the very last moment back on the Rhine again on the return trip from one of their marauding attacks, and have all their booty confiscated, just to see it redistributed among the border soldiers who had taken part in the battle (see also ).
_	Studies of sexual dimorphism raise the possibility that early human ancestors were polygamous rather than monogamous.
_	Other testimonies suggest the possibility that the British delayed their entry into Baghdad for 48 hours because they had an ulterior motive in allowing a clash between the sectarian populations within the capital city.
_	There is also the possibility that the word has Pre-Greek origin.
_	In banter with Han, he seemed to allude to the possibility that those who similarly post misleading articles may eventually be subjected to litigation.
_	The major problem with this idea is the possibility that "japonicus" will also become an invasive species with no native predators.
_	Stating the possibility that evidence might be uncovered that supports a trans-Atlantic migration, they state that "X2a has not been found anywhere in Eurasia, and phylogeography gives us no compelling reason to think it is more likely to come from Europe than from Siberia.
_	Anna II, the dancer, is heard only infrequently and the text hints at the possibility that the two Annas are the same person:
_	Although it was suggested that the civil servants should immediately move their headquarters to Boyle's building, the suggestion was dismissed due to objections to its location, the close proximity of trees, outbuildings and other houses and the possibility that abandoning their current headquarters would lead to disorder in the town.
_	Explanations for the facial features of the colossal heads include the possibility that the heads were carved in this manner due to the shallow space allowed on the basalt boulders.
_	This suggests the possibility that the Takahashi clan record, at least in part, was used as a reference in compiling "Nihon Shoki" while also suggesting that parts of it may be even older.
_	Additionally, there is no evidence that the drop in antibiotic prescribing for otitis media has increased the incidence of mastoiditis, raising the possibility that the drop in reported cases is due to a confounding factor such as childhood immunizations against Haemophilus and Streptococci.
_	Changes the Neartown area has experienced over the last twenty years rule out the possibility that the 'Block Party' will ever grow to match the original festival.
_	Later authors, though agreeing with the possibility that Zhang held such views, dismiss the assassination claims; they instead state that Merse went to the Soviet consulate in Manzhouli.
_	Given the inquest findings relating to alcohol in Newson's bloodstream, McNaughton examined the possibility that Newson was drunk.
_	He quoted a prominent defense attorney's concerns about "the constant shuffle of attorneys in and out of the president's legal team", and the possibility that an attorney could invest resources and reputation in such representation "only to find yourself on the sidelines a short time later because the president saw someone he liked better on Fox News".<ref name="Lovelace_3/26/2018"></ref>
_	However, observing the conditions and predicting a transition to democracy is so difficult, because the conditions only lay the ground-works for the possibility that it may occur.
_	This would place the name "Carloman" in the 6th century, and open the possibility that the Frankish name "Carl" may originate as a short form of "Carloman".
_	David Hume discussed the possibility that the entire debate about free will is nothing more than a merely "verbal" issue.
_	But before they can close the case, an old Navajo guide who was the last man to see Breedlove alive is seriously wounded by a sniper, raising the possibility that Breedlove's death was murder.
_	Sampson in 1995 rejected the possibility that the difference in skull ornamentation between "Einiosaurus" and "Achelousaurus" represented sexual dimorphism, for three reasons.
_	He suggested the possibility that the builders had constructed a ramp out of "collected stones", which was then "placed against the back of the chamber", with the capstone then being "hauled up on rollers, probably running on logs embedded longitudinally in the ramp" in order to get it into position.
_	He ruled out the possibility that it was done by Muslims, declaring that it was "done at the hands of the occupation."
_	The organization uncovers numerous details that create reasonable doubt as to the guilt of Hiddell in the assassination, and the possibility that the real assassin is still at large.
_	The spacecraft definitively confirmed that humans cannot survive on the surface of Venus, and excluded the possibility that there is any liquid water on Venus.
_	For example, Morris wrote that the intense human pair bond evolved so that men who were out hunting could trust that their mates back home were not having sex with other men, and suggested the possibility that sparse body hair evolved because the "nakedness" helped intensify pair bonding by increasing tactile pleasure.
_	I do not rule out the possibility that the crowd, this human river marches united to Milaflores to expel a traitor to the Venezuelan people." and explicitly stated an objective to "remove Chávez."
_	Current theories about such objects include the possibility that gravitational perturbations may have kicked them out of their planetary systems soon after they formed through planetary accretion, or they may have been formed by some other means.
_	Secondly, he considers the possibility that an apparent error at the individual level could be understood within the totality of creation as error free.
_	When asked, Libi told "The Financial Times" in July 2017 that the allegations against him were false and that they were an attempted smear campaign, to which the newspaper agreed to the possibility that Libi was telling the truth: "[the allegations] are perhaps inevitable given the public rage over the rampant state-sanctioned corruption that explains many of Venezuela's problems today."
_	André, aware of the possibility that this would happen, kindly produces two ducks (the first one gets trodden on by Manuel) for Basil, and some sauces.
_	As the various Ajax missile sites were overlapped, this led to the possibility that two sites might attack one target while another flew past both.
_	Numerous other details in the Book of Mormon indicate principal lands that are quite localized, generally negating the possibility that the Book of Mormon settings cover major parts of both North and South America.
_	If all examples of the RNA were upstream of homologous genes, there is the possibility that the RNAs were conserved in that position simply by inheritance.
_	It may result in intentionally outrageous behavior, efforts to act in uninterruptible ways, or refusal to recognize the possibility that the outsider can understand the situation of the insider.
_	Leaving open the possibility that she might return to triathlon racing, Wellington formally announced on 16 January 2012 that she would be taking a one-year break from professional Ironman racing in 2012, in order to spend more time in the UK with her friends and family, and to "explore new opportunities" which she would otherwise be unable to undertake with the necessary focus and dedication.
_	In general there were very few North Chinese or Southerners reaching the highest-post in the government compared with the possibility that Persians did so in the Ilkhanate.
_	The Qur’an is not specific on the precise value of its injunctions, and it leaves open the possibility that a command in the Qur’an may sometimes imply an obligation, a recommendation or a mere permissibility" and "As a characteristic feature of Qur’anic legislation, it may be stated here that commands and prohibitions in the Qur’an are expressed in a variety of forms which are often open to interpretation and ijtihad" which are found in Rouahni's thesis dated July 1998, were "lifted" from the work by Hashem Kamali first published in 1991:
_	Recent investigations also suggested the possibility that the altimeter had malfunctioned and locked at , which led the pilots to believe that they were at a higher altitude.
_	Debs tried to persuade the Union members who worked on the railways that the boycott was too risky, given the hostility of both the railways and the federal government, the weakness of the union, and the possibility that other unions would break the strike.
_	When Governor-General of India Lord Auckland heard about the arrival of Russian envoy Count Jan Prosper Witkiewicz (better known by the Russian version of his name as Yan Vitkevich) in Kabul and the possibility that Dost Mohammad might turn to Russia for support, his political advisers exaggerated the threat.
_	Recent study by Emma Coulthard mentioned the possibility that hedgerows may act as guides for moths, like "A. rumicis," when flying from one location to another.
_	The "Tocqueville Connection" states: "Most of the ambassadors were appointed by former prime minister Lansana Kouyaté, in office from February 2007 until May 2008," raising the possibility that the recall was an attempt on the part of Camara to distance himself from the previous government.
_	Wang has, indeed, accepted a party post that is incompatible with vice chairmanship, effectively ending the possibility that he would be vice chairman, although after meeting with Wang, Ma said that he would "leave the position open" for Wang.
_	However, he included all of them with "panicked", failing to account for the possibility that despite their reaction, they were still aware the broadcast was staged.
_	Although it was not formally described until 2013, the possibility that "T. kabomani" might be a distinct species had been suggested as early as 100 years prior.
_	It is stated that Finrod Felagund was able to quickly master Taliska purely by determining the various changes undergone by its Avarin component from Primitive Quendian, and Faramir stated that all languages of Men are of Elvish descent, suggesting that Taliska and Adûnaic are in fact Quendian/Avarin with some Khuzdul influence (notwithstanding the possibility that Faramir was misinformed, much as how many people mistakenly think English is a Romance language).
_	That Kamarupa remained unconquered till the beginning of the Assamese literature in the 14th century points to the possibility that the apabhramsa of the Kamarupa kingdom must have flourished.
_	The styles of Kiyonobu's disciples and relatives are very similar, and most scholars entertain the possibility that Kiyonobu II or Kiyomasu I were the same man as the subject of this article, Kiyonobu I, or as one another.
_	Following a months-long process of discussions, community forums and negotiations, the boards of both organizations agreed that the shared values of the two entities and the complementary expertise of their staffs pointed to the possibility that a merger could address the immediate needs of both organizations and open new possibilities for the combined organization.
_	The next few issues involve the mercenaries preparing to invade Zoidstar on behalf of the Cybersol Corporation; Griff battling for control of his mind against Zoidzilla's influence from the mental interface and suffering amnesia; The Celeste crew and Heller continuing to work to survive with the Namer on Zoidstar; Redhorn making his return and killing Mammoth for control of the Red Zoids, but with the possibility that he too will return; the Blue Zoids rebuilding; a new kind of "Renegade"
_	Since 2011, the possibility that hydraulic fracturing might make the Monterey Shale productive over large areas has gained widespread public attention.
_	Deuteronomy 19:8 indicates a certain fluidity of the borders of the promised land when it refers to the possibility that God would "enlarge your borders."
_	In these experiments, peripherin deficiency did produce an upregulation of α-internexin, indicating the possibility that this type IV intermediate filament makes up for the loss of peripherin.
_	In researching the possibility that public service directors, who decide which pro bono campaigns their media outlet will run, they found only a "very small percentage" who would not run the campaign but mainly due to their audience was much older.
_	Well to the west of the Roman province, the site was surrounded by extensive forests and Tacfarinas evidently discounted the possibility that the Romans could discover his location, as he apparently failed to post a screen of sentries in the woods.
_	Linguistic analysis of Korean loanwords in the Khitan language also indicate the possibility that the Balhae elite spoke the Korean language.
_	Schulten also began to explore the possibility that fast triplets could explain compass sensors in biological species such as migrating birds.
_	Earlier on, domestic and international observers commented on the possibility that the campaign is an emblematic feature of Chinese political culture which has, since its imperial days, invariably attempted tackling corruption in a high-profile manner when a new leader comes to power.
_	Another example was the emergence of the possibility that Parliament, when deemed necessary, would submit a motion of no confidence against the cabinet of ministers.
_	The FWS has also been alerted to the possibility that Indiana bats, a federal endangered species, may be exploiting opportunities provided by the refuge.
_	Eric Walter White suggests and dismisses the possibility that the Petrushka chord is derived from Messiaen's "second Modes of limited transposition" (the octatonic scale) in favor of a "black key/white key bitonality" which results from, "Stravinsky's well known habit of composing at the piano."
_	Asimov admitted that by the standards of scientific knowledge in 1939, the possibility that Mars might have a native intelligent race was unlikely, and the possibility that Martians and humans would be interfertile was even more so.
_	The way of arranging the participants by age and by sex has suggested the possibility that these groups sang by answering each other, but there are hardly any remnants that appear to support this possibility.
_	However, there is also the possibility that a tag added to a protein might obscure binding of the new protein to its interacting partners.
_	As these prints cannot be confirmed, there remains the possibility that the series remained unfinished after the publication of the eight known prints.
_	In 1998, some critics raised the possibility that Heller's book had questionable similarities to Louis Falstein's 1950 novel, "Face of a Hero".
_	On August 26, 2007 the Sunday Telegraph reported that American officials were investigating the possibility that the bombing was the result of a failure in the bombs guidance system rather than being the result of pilot error.
_	During parliamentary committee inquiries, these allegations were extended to the possibility that the auditors had been misled.
_	The word was used in the context of describing the phenomenon of "charismatic necrofauna," which expresses the possibility that only certain charismatic species may be chosen as candidates for de-extinction based on human preferences, or that such resurrection efforts could distract from helping less "charismatic" species that are currently endangered.
_	Despite writing well after the Roman conquest, Lucian claimed to be "still barbarous in speech and almost wearing a jacket ("kandys") in the Assyrian style"; this has been taken as a possible, but not definitive, allusion to the possibility that his native language was an Aramaic dialect.
_	It is uncertain as to when the work was composed, which leaves the possibility that it was an early work that was filled with Milton's ideas about the English Civil War or it was a later work that incorporates his despair over the Restoration.
_	In 2014, Czerkas, along with Alan Feduccia, published a paper further describing "Scansoriopteryx" and stating their opinion that certain archaic features of the skeleton and the hypothesis that it was arboreal ruled out the possibility that it was a theropod or even a dinosaur, but that "Scansoriopteryx" and all birds evolved from non-dinosaurian avemetatarsalian archosaurs like "Scleromochlus".
_	Having a three-branched nuclear capability eliminated the possibility that an enemy could destroy all of a nation's nuclear forces in a first-strike attack; this, in turn, ensured the credible threat of a devastating retaliatory strike against the aggressor, increasing a nation's nuclear deterrence.
_	The absence of the King of Strathclyde from the assembled kings, and the possibility that Echmarcach's powerbase was situated somewhere in the Isles beyond Kintyre, could indicate that Knútr's main focus was on the troubled region of Moray, and the rulers whose lands it bordered.
_	This led some reporters (namely the "Herald-Express"s Bevo Means) and detectives to look into the possibility that Short was a lesbian, and begin questioning employees and patrons of gay bars in Los Angeles; this claim, however, remained unsubstantiated.
_	Spokespeople downplayed the possibility that the building might be demolished, citing the rarity of a building this tall in Halifax coupled with the difficulty in building a new one.
_	She suggested the possibility that the mythology surrounding Dali represented a preserved form of "a very ancient cycle of traditions and songs about the interrelations of the mistress, patroness, or sovereign, of the beasts, forest, crags and waters, with a mortal young man."
_	Over time, Reynolds became willing to accept the possibility that the theory was wrong.
_	The police, who vowed to investigate the motive of the blast and find the culprits of the bombing, ruled out the possibility that the bombing was masterminded and executed by militants, as certain quarters had claimed.
_	Half-duplex (HDX) data communications networks have the possibility that more than one node will transmit at the same or overlapping time.
_	The article considered only the organizational changes resulting from secretaries operating word processors rather than typewriters; the possibility that word processors might result in managers creating documents without the intervention of secretaries was not considered—not surprising in an era when few managers, but most secretaries, possessed keyboarding skills.
_	Press and public opinion, however, were concerned by the possibility that the sect would codify and enforce laws on religious grounds, and the scheme was scrapped.
_	The half-life reported was 10 minutes and was assigned to either 102 or 102, although the possibility that the alpha particles observed were from a presumably short-lived mendelevium ("Z" = 101) isotope created from the electron capture of element 102 was not excluded.
_	The office excluded "the possibility that such people are Muslims."
_	In addition, the filamentation may allows bacterial cells to access nutrients by enhancing the possibility that part of the filament will contact a nutrient-rich zone and pass compounds to the rest of the cell’s biomass.
_	The plan contemplated the possibility that options 1 and 2 be used to prevent an "impending major Sino-Soviet Bloc attack upon the U.S. or its allies".
_	Greek heritage led to her being one of several members of parliament to come under scrutiny over the possibility that they held another citizenship by descent.
_	Article 13 has faced criticism over the possibility that it could create a chilling effect on online expression.
_	He has also advocated Swedish-style free schools, to be managed by parents and funded by the State, with the possibility that such schools may be allowed to be run on a for-profit model.
_	The DAM-team responsible for licensing concluded on March 20, 2010 that this judgment leaves open the possibility that the independence of the project-MER-experts may yet again be questioned in the course of any procedures to obtain urban development permits.
_	Likewise, the anomaly does not appear in the orbits of Neptune's moons, challenging the possibility that the Pioneer anomaly may be an unconventional gravitational phenomenon based on range from the Sun.
_	The sonority of the chordioid itself is identical to that of the It+6, a subset of the Wholetone scale and so subject to some of the symmetries and homogeneity for which that scale is known, and anhemitonic allowing the possibility that the resultant scale be anhemitonic or at least ancohemitonic itself.
_	Settlers also viewed the peace process at this point as a threat due to the possibility that their homes and livelihoods would be at risk.
_	Some researchers assert the identification of Kuber's associate with Mauros of the seals; others do not exclude the possibility that the Mauros of the seals was the former's son.
_	This suggests the possibility that the Great service may have been Byrd's next major compositional project after the three Latin mass settings, which were published between 1592 and 1595.
_	This family relationship would lessen the possibility that the Younger Lady (and, by extension, Tutankhamun's mother) was either Nefertiti, or Akhenaten's secondary wife Kiya, because no known artifact accords either wife titles such as "King's sister" or "King's Daughter".
_	By the early 20th century, four noted authors of "The Fundamentals" were explicitly open to the possibility that God created through evolution, but fundamentalism inspired the American creation–evolution controversy that began in the 1920s.
_	The antenna is composed of eleven segments, though the last segment shows a possible fusion line, leaving the possibility that the antennae are thirteen segments long.
_	Throughout the books, Rune has been recorded as having at least two children - Cornelius Murphy, the hero of the Cornelius Murphy Trilogy, who rescues Rune from the 'Forbidden Zones' and helps to defeat the secret rulers of the world, and the Campbell, the villain in "The Book of Ultimate Truths" and the grandson of the secret king of the world, who was conceived as a result of Rune's attempts to become a prince only for him to be killed at the conclusion of the novel - although his active sexual lifestyle would suggest the possibility that there are other children out there.
_	However, they were unable to indicate which submarine was involved and indicated also the possibility that the accident may have been caused by the unidentified spy submarine or other technically feasible causes.
_	The main drawback of the campaign of conquest lay in the possibility that the United Provinces of the Río de la Plata react in defense of a territory which formed part of the country since its inception.
_	The origin of this title is unknown, however it should be known that the phrase was the title of a 1963 board game, although the possibility that it is a German idiom or simply just made up should not be ruled out either.
_	He was acutely aware of the danger posed by the possibility that the Latin West, particularly his neighbors in Italy, would unite against him and attempt the restoration of Latin rule in Constantinople.
_	This raised the possibility that, in mammals, chemotaxis is not solely a guidance mechanism but it is also a mechanism of sperm selection.
_	These sperm features raised the possibility that prolonging the time period, during which capacitated spermatozoa can be found in the female genital tract, is a mechanism, evolved in humans, to compensate for the lack of coordination between insemination and ovulation.
_	Shortly after the first geomagnetic polarity time scales were produced, scientists began exploring the possibility that reversals could be linked to extinctions.
_	Due to the possibility that these bi-fuel Commodores may have been fitted with undersized O-rings in the service valve hand tap, Holden issued a recall affecting the first 981 of these models on 10 April 2007.
_	This was due to the possibility that one of the fuel lines in the engine compartment may have a rub condition with a fuel vapour hose clip, possibly causing a fuel smell to become evident.
_	This means that a player whose cost is between 2/3 and 1 will not contribute, even though their cost is below the benefit, because of the possibility that the other player will contribute.
_	Other variants ignore the restriction that pursuers and evaders must always occupy a node and allow for the possibility that they are positioned somewhere along an edge.
_	On 22 April 2012, the governing coalition of the Civic Democratic Party (ODS) and TOP 09 dissolved their coalition with VV due to corruption accusations against the party leadership (especially Vít Bárta), raising the possibility that early elections would be held in June 2012.
_	The British still had to consider the threat of an invasion, due the possibility that the Soviet Union could collapse under the German onslaught, after which Germany could easily transfer troops back to the west.
_	Thus, for changes of less than 8 g/L since a previous test, the possibility that the change is completely caused by test-retest variability may need to be considered in addition to considering effects of, for example, diseases or treatments.
_	Keith Brown, the race starter, was interviewed briefly by the BBC and alluded to the possibility that the nine jockeys who noticed and obeyed his recall could be eligible to take part in a re-run.
_	Hill has hired Stewart's campaign manager, and some experts say that Hill embodies the possibility that Comstock's efforts to appeal to centrists in the most populated areas of her district could cost her conservative votes.
_	The move came as a result of a restructuring and a possible shift away from local programming, along with the possibility that Family Broadcasting would place the station up for sale.
_	Impulse confesses his fear over his own lack of regard for his own life; Empress, now left to care for two newborn infants faces the possibility that her career as a super-hero may be over; Slo-Bo, with his physically inferior body, is slowly beginning to degrade; Cissie at last establishes peace with her mother; and Superboy and Wonder Girl finally confess their feelings for one another.
_	His remarks about the possibility that the World Trade Center was demolished with explosives were also repeated in newspaper and television stories following some of the interviews.
_	Much of the difficulty in accurately diagnosing head lice stems from the possibility that observed nits are due to an extinct infestation.
_	Despite much scholarly opinion against the authenticity of the Mecklenburg Declaration, belief in the document remains important to some North Carolinians, says historian Dan L. Morrill, who notes that the possibility that it is genuine cannot be entirely discounted.
_	The United States sought his extradition, with the possibility that he will finish the remaining 22 years of his sentence.
_	When Jay withdraws his hand from Diane's when they go to get two chairs up on deck so he can varnish them, Diane voices the possibility that Jay doesn't like her but Jay states that he does.
_	The Daoist idea of "bianhua" (metamorphosis, or "change and transformation"), "that the certainty that the world is in flux leaves open the possibility that things may transform from one type to another" (Csikszentmihalyi 2008: 229), can be traced from the "Zhuangzi" through the Shangqing School.
_	The novel is a mix of recollections and existential musings on the part of its narrator, many of which pertain specifically to the possibility that the narrator is constructed by the language he speaks.
_	While Smith quickly and publicly disavowed any connection to the work, historians continue to debate the possibility that some aspects of the pamphlet may have represented Smith's thought.
_	A "distinct subgenre" of stories explore the possibility that time travel might be used as a means of tourism, with travelers curious to visit periods or events such as the Victorian Era, Crucifixion of Christ, or some point where dinosaurs could be watched (or hunted by big game hunters), or to meet historical figures such as Abraham Lincoln or Ludwig van Beethoven.
_	2 has only produced a few flakes, fire-broken rocks and hearthstones though there is the possibility that microblades could be excavated closer to the bluff edge.
_	This 'threat' refers to the possibility that a country could successfully develop outside the US-managed global system, thus presenting a model for other countries, including countries in which the United States has strong economic interests.
_	Henry Highland Garnet preached in New York about the possibility that free produce could strike a blow against slavery.
_	O'Rahilly's historical model suggests the possibility that there was a Brittonic (P-Celtic) language in Ireland before the arrival of Goidelic languages (Q-Celtic) there, but this view has not found wide acceptance.
_	Events such as major layoffs, mergers, and bankruptcy will typically invalidate the portfolio’s contracts since they increase the possibility that an issuer would have to pay out on contracts for these management initiated events.
_	Intrigued by the possibility that they live their whole lives in the air, Kate reveals that she is on a mission to prove that such creatures are real.
_	Still, this does not preclude the possibility that an inner asteroid belt may be present with a combined mass no greater than the asteroid belt in the Solar System.
_	The UK Government addressed consultation responses about the possibility that the European Court of Human Rights could force all churches to marry same-sex couples, stating:
_	Munisai had moved to northern Kyūshū and became Tadaoki's teacher, leading to the possibility that Munisai introduced the two.
_	But when Gene's injuries are rapidly healed with advanced medical technology he hasn't seen before, he accepts the possibility that there might be more to the human than meets the eye.
_	The Meiji Restoration in 1868 eliminated the possibility that he would become Shogun, and Prince Hirotsune returned to the Imperial household.
_	Discussion in the Dáil during the run-up to the General Election, focused on the possibility that a warning "had" been transmitted and demands were made to know the nationality of the captain (a British subject):
_	So far there is no unambiguous physical evidence against the possibility that "everything is just a computation," and a large amount has been written about digital physics since Zuse's book appeared.
_	There needs to be consideration for the possibility that these syndromes evolved not to benefit seed dispersal but possibility to combat other selective pressures.
_	If, in spite of all of your efforts, Diệm remains obdurate and refuses, then we must face the possibility that Diệm himself cannot be preserved...
_	Based on the names, and the time between the consulates, Andreas Krieckhaus raises the possibility that Sulla Urbanus is the son of Marcus Munatius Sulla Cerialis, consul in 215.
_	With a symmetric key, the key needs to be transmitted to the receiver where there is always the possibility that the key could be intercepted or tampered with.
_	Savile's estate, believed to be worth about £4 million, was frozen by its executors, the NatWest bank, in view of the possibility that those alleging that they had been assaulted by Savile could make claims for damages.
_	The two discussed the possibility that Ravalomanana could run as an AVI candidate, but this idea was abandoned.
_	Some evidence points to the possibility that social anxiety disorder involves reduced serotonin receptor binding.
_	The Buffy television episode Normal Again raises the possibility that Buffy never actually left the asylum and that her life in Sunnydale may have been a delusion lasting 7 years.
_	New consumers would have to buy products of unknown quality and bear the risk of the supplier being an undercover informant and even the possibility that he would not deliver at all.
_	There is the possibility that it may refer to the rebirth process, a central tenet teaching of groups having, or claiming to have, a Rosicrucian philosophy.
_	Around this time, documents attest to multiple repairs of a nearby window, opening the possibility that the original fresco had experienced water damage, and would have needed to be restored in any case.
_	Wagner Mora raised the possibility that the third film would be made without the character he interpreted.
_	In a separate paper, Currie noted the possibility that "Alioramus" might represent a juvenile "Tarbosaurus", but stated that the much higher tooth count and more prominent nasal crests in "Alioramus" suggest it is a distinct genus.
_	The time gap in publishing his story raises the possibility that Smith may have exaggerated or invented the event to enhance Pocahontas' image.
_	For months, speculation surrounded Selig and the possibility that he and Henry Aaron would not attend Bonds' games as he closed in on the record.
_	However, the strong folding found in the fossils makes this conclusion tentative, with Simon Conway Morris, one of the scientists involved in its discovery, admitting the possibility that the team simply has not spotted it.
_	It appears Charles Darwin speculated in 1855 about the possibility that icebergs could gouge the seabed as they drifted across isobaths.
_	However, the scientist who invented one of the modern pigments dismissed the possibility that Pollock used this paint as being "unlikely to the point of fantasy."
_	Based upon detailed analysis of "Shenxian Zhuan" editions and fragments, Stephan Peter Bumbacher (2011:807) confirms the possibility that the text "indeed is from Ge Hong's brush"; however, if it is a forgery, "then it must have been fabricated in the time between Ge Hong's death and the earliest testimonies in the early 5th century, most probably during the first decades after his decease."
_	Because of H.M., they began to explore the possibility that there were multiple memory systems in the brain: different types of learning and memory that were supported by mechanisms in different areas.
_	Both the fact that she was able to fight hand-to-hand with Necrolai and the fact that she is implied to have lost strength lends credit to the theory that she is a vampire, however there is the possibility that she is a Dhampir (half-human, half-vampire), which can fully explain her abilities and human appearance.
_	According to al-Rafi'i, "A group of scholastic theologians (ahl al-kalam)—who have no preoccupation except to engage in conjecture and allegorical interpretation (ta'wil), and to seek procedures of disputation in every injunction and doctrine—maintain the possibility that some passages of the Qur'an may be missing.
_	Heading into spring training in 1999, Soriano prepared himself for the possibility that Seattle would release him, at which point he planned to return to the Dominican Republic to work.
_	In cases where there is the possibility that the notation might be misinterpreted, a binary minus operation can be enforced by explicitly specifying a leading 0 (as in codice_4 instead of just codice_5), or parentheses can be used to clarify the intended meaning.
_	Some researchers, such as Richard Abbott, note the possibility that Labaya and the biblical figure of Abimelech ben Gideon, from Judges 9, were identical.
_	According to Kathleen A. Miller, "Although Shelley's novella appears to relate a conventional female gothic narrative of a young woman victimized by her father's incestuous desire, it leaves open the possibility that, in fact, it is Mathilda, rather than her father, who wields control over the novel's gothic script."
_	So there's the possibility that their relationship might be re-kindled".
_	And so, even though Michele Lee herself is a very likeable person, and even if she's being over the top she's a person of great enthusiasm, she's a person of great strength, in the pilot anyway, we were sort of pushing the possibility that she was gonna be roughly our equivalent.
_	A reduction in A expression appears to prevent hypoxia-induced ventriculomegaly and loss of white matter, which raises the possibility that pharmacological blockade of A may have clinical utility.
_	As such, there is the possibility that a judge will uphold as valid a newer revision of the law.
_	However, Ealedonia left open the possibility that PINA would consider moving its Pacnews service and its headquarters out of Fiji at its conference in July 2009.
_	A revolution in 1932 ended the absolute monarchy and raised the possibility that King Prajadhipok might abdicate.
_	A foul break thus includes the possibility that the fouling breaker may eventually be assigned a group from which a ball was pocketed on the foul break shot.
_	Later, Mallett abandoned the idea of using slowed light to reduce the energy, writing that, "For a time, I considered the possibility that slowing down light might increase the gravitational frame dragging effect of the ring laser ...
_	The former comment leaves open the possibility that the fault lies with the giver of the criticism.
_	Theorizing that a plot to kill the President was masterminded out of New Orleans in conjunction with the CIA with cooperation from the Dallas police department and city government, Garrison tasked his chief investigator, Pershing Gervais, of looking into the possibility that Cabell had stayed in the city's Fontainebleau Motel at the time of the assassination.
_	In particular, the descriptions here do not address the possibility that the measure of some sets could be infinite, or that the underlying space could exhibit pathological behavior, and additional technical assumptions are needed for some of the statements.
_	Equally western society have become more complex with ethnic diversity, multi-culturalism and life-style choices raising the possibility that a single concept of poverty as conceived in the past might no longer apply (Ferragina et al. 2016).
_	However, there was a tense moment towards the end of recording when Dammers decided at the last minute that he wanted to add a flute to the song, and with no free tracks available Collins was forced to record the flute directly onto the track containing the previously recorded brass section, with the possibility that any error would have rendered the entire track unusable:
_	The Second Empire style was widely used for hotels at the time, one of which, the Towsley House Hotel in Waterloo, New York was extremely similar in design and layout to the Brooks House Hotel, raising the possibility that Boyden might have plagiarized it.
_	Another investigation was conducted by reporter Amy Davis of Houston news station KPRC into the possibility that air marshals with criminal convictions were still being employed by FAMS.
_	Some netsuke resemble Mizuki's design, creating the possibility that they referred to Mizuki's design.
_	A subsequent Twitter post by Bellamy, in reply to a fan, states that US would have the grand finale and that they would have "a tough decision to make", hinting on the possibility that the final station should not be activated and that United States of Eurasia should not be recognised.
_	Feminist philosophers often highlight the under-representation of female scientists in academia and the possibility that science currently has androcentric biases.
_	The "Sensitive" of SSE referred to the possibility that sites searched might have contained chemical, biological, radiological, or nuclear (CBRN) materials inherent in WMDs.
_	Mr. Staples did note that there was the possibility that the mayor withheld some emails that perhaps had public information that was required to be turned over per the Texas Public Information Act, but that these allegations, if genuine, needed to be followed up by the Public Integrity Unit of the Dallas District Attorney's Office.
_	Despite early reports that the Wildcats would not sign Trahair (as they held out for the possibility that American forward Shawn Redhage would become an Australian citizen), the guard was officially signed up shortly before the first match of the season against his previous club, the Singapore Slingers.
_	However, critic Sarah Boxer suggests that it is difficult to view photos of such artists without considering the possibility that they were trying to gain fame in a manner similar to Pollock.
_	Gwen is unable to deal with the possibility that she might lose a third child and convinces herself that holistic treatments will save her son's life; when she finally grasps the seriousness of the situation and decides to tell Ethan about Little Ethan, Rebecca drugs her to prevent her from telling Ethan.
_	Psychological theory through the 1960s placed much greater focus on the possibility that a bedwetting child might be acting out, purposefully striking back against parents by soiling linens and bedding.
_	It mentioned the possibility that Chen could run away, destroy or forge evidence, or collude with co-conspirators.
_	A variety of concerns over the Games, or China's hosting of the Games, had been expressed by various entities, including allegations that China violated its pledge to allow open media access, various alleged human rights violations, its continuous support of repressive regimes (such as Zimbabwe, Myanmar, Sudan and North Korea), air pollution in both the city of Beijing and in neighbouring areas, proposed boycotts, warnings of the possibility that the Beijing Olympics could be targeted by terrorist groups, disruption from pro-Tibetan protesters, and religious persecutions.
_	At the end of 2012, McCann began teaching the possibility that the last day would be October 7, 2015.
_	Author Alan Haynes views Tresham as the most likely culprit, but raises the possibility that Cecil penned the letter himself, to protect a source.
_	In mice sensation of acoustic information via the vestibular system has been demonstrated to have a behaviourally relevant effect; response to an elicited acoustic startle reflex is larger in the presence of loud, low frequency sounds that are below the threshold for the mouse cochlea (~4 Hz), raising the possibility that the acoustic sensitivity of the vestibular system may extend the hearing range of small mammals.
_	The plants attempt to break loose, however the EPA bulldozes the plants, killing them, but leaving the possibility that some plants may have survived.
_	Gosden's family considered the possibility that Gosden could have been struggling with his sexual orientation.
_	Also, there is the possibility that BP pathway leads to protoanemonin which is a dead-end metabolite that cannot be utilized by cells.
_	"Seconds" is a song about nuclear proliferation, and the possibility that Armageddon could occur by an accident.
_	The National Institute for Occupational Safety and Health (NIOSH) has investigated the potential health effects of prolonged bicycling in police bicycle patrol units, including the possibility that some bicycle saddles exert excessive pressure on the urogenital area of cyclists, restricting blood flow to the genitals.
_	Kavanaugh eventually noticed the security camera in the room and the possibility that his conversation with his wife was being observed by his enemies led him to rush out of the interrogation room.
_	The "Washington Post" later noted that, by stating that he used his own money to "facilitate" the payment, Cohen was not ruling out the possibility that Trump, as an individual, reimbursed Cohen for the payment.
_	Dexter Thomas of "Vice News" criticized Melfi's additions as creating the white savior trope, "In this case, it means that a white person doesn't have to think about the possibility that, were they around back in the 1960s South, they might have been one of the bad ones."
_	McNamara does not totally dismiss the possibility that Reiter, the man she says "all but invented the legal thriller derivative", may be able to mold this show into what she calls a "solid procedural hybrid", but questions the demand for such a show in the face of "The Good Wife" and "Damages".
_	This derivation only shows that "at most" 23 people are needed to ensure a birthday match with even chance; it leaves open the possibility that is 22 or less could also work.
_	They further noted that the medical evidence before the Coroner allowed for the possibility that punches were one possible explanation for the facial injuries or bruises but the medical evidence unequivocally rejected punching described by Bramwell as a cause of death.
_	They expressed cynicism towards the possibility that these reforms would be different.
_	Any notion of sectionalism—the possibility that a department or departments could establish for themselves a set of conditions and a government—must be labeled as anti-revolutionary.
_	Studies of STAT6 transgenic mice suggest the possibility that IL-13 signaling occurring only through the airway epithelium is required for most of these effects.
_	This does not conflict with the Autobit regarding Arcee being an "exception", as the explanation does not preclude the possibility that a Cybertronian could voluntarily self-identify with a gender, merely that they do not inherently have a gender, female, male, or anything in-between.
_	Although The Girl in White makes Ambrosio think she is playing hard-to-get, we are unable to ignore the possibility that everything unfolds exactly according to plan.
_	The two discuss the possibility that extraterrestrial intelligences could send robotic probes to study other planets.
_	However, in October 2006 the authority's board voted against any further consideration of purchasing new trolley buses to allow Routes 29 or 79 to be restored, a decision that effectively eliminated the possibility that trolley bus service might return to route 79 (or 29).
_	In 1811, fearing the possibility that Great Britain would occupy Florida in its war against Napoleon, Folch decided to cede West Florida to the United States temporarily.
_	During this time, Butler established a House committee to investigate the possibility that four of the seven Republican Senators who voted for acquittal had been improperly influenced in their votes.
_	The concerns include cost (an estimated 890 million Euros), the possibility that vibrations would damage the historic buildings in Vilnius Old Town, and the perception that streets would be closed.
_	Finally, there is also the possibility that the name derives from an Etruscan word for "rocky", though any historical Etruscan rule of the island is disputed.
_	This can be reconciled with its relatively old geological age by the possibility that the Ankylosauridae as a whole appeared much earlier during the Early Jurassic, which must have been true if they were the sister group of the Nodosauridae in the sense proposed by Coombs in 1978; i.e. if all polacanthines were nodosaurids.
_	In the end, the politics of the issue mattered less to historians "than the possibility that Bellesiles might have engaged in faulty, fraudulent, and unethical research."
_	Continuous study of these and other oscillations has led to an important conclusion: analyzing waves as having a common signal phase but a different amplitude leads to the possibility that these different signals serve a synergistic function.
_	That is, science is open to the possibility that future experiments might support more complex theories than demanded by current data and is more interested in designing experiments to discriminate between competing theories than favoring one theory over another based merely on philosophical principles.
_	The follow-up investigation examined the possibility that Hodel had also committed crimes outside of Los Angeles in: Chicago (Lipstick Murders), Manila, Philippines (The Jigsaw Murder) and in the San Francisco Bay Area in 1968-69, possibly reinventing and calling himself "Zodiac."
_	This imperfect communion allows for the possibility that ministers ordained outside the Catholic sacramental system can nonetheless celebrate the Eucharist in a way that makes available the salvific presence of the Lord."
_	In a 1993 speech, Farrakhan seemed to acknowledge the possibility that the Nation of Islam was responsible for the assassination:
_	Despite the retraction, studies concluded that the possibility that there is an additional planet orbiting Gliese 436 remained plausible.
_	In contrast, even the possibility that evolution had occurred was rarely mentioned in the discussions of other learned societies such as the "Société Botanique", the "Société Zoologique", the "Société Géologique" and the "Académie des Sciences".
_	"There were about three days where we were facing the possibility that we might have to split up," said Samberg.
_	Eaves gave copies of this poster to Braga and Berman, with Berman suggesting the possibility that this could be a good concept for an opening sequence.
_	However, there had been two peals of Grandsire Triples earlier that year conducted by William Underwood which were described as having 'two singles', although there is the possibility that they could have been "Holt's Original", or Holt's six-part composition.
_	"The sighting was reported to air traffic control at Port Elizabeth International Airport who requested NSRI's assistance to investigate the possibility that an aircraft or craft may be in difficulty."
_	Concerns were raised about security and preservation of emails, and the possibility that laws may have been violated.
_	In his comprehensive website about Ptolemaic genealogy, Christopher Bennett also notes the possibility that Cleopatra IV, from her brief marriage to Antiochus IX Cyzicenus, may have been the mother of the later Seleucid monarch, Antiochus X Eusebes ("the Pious"), who would go on to marry Cleopatra IV's younger sister, Cleopatra Selene, thus making him the spouse of a woman who was both his stepmother (Selene married both of her sisters' widowers, Grypus and Cyzicenus, before marrying Eusebes) and perhaps his maternal aunt.
_	There is also the possibility that tribal differences were part of the Neolithic cultural landscape.
_	Community leaders were faced with the possibility that their town would be cut off and decided that a railroad station must be constructed for passenger and commercial services to ensure the survival of Castor Sulfur Springs.
_	Another name for Dibon was Karchoh, and there is the possibility that in the 9th century the name Dibon referred to a tribe of which Mesha was the leader, and that the name Dibon was attached to the town later (see van der Steen and Smelik 2007)
_	Vallée is one of the first people to speculate publicly about the possibility that the "solar dance" at Fatima was a UFO.
_	Vallée has also speculated about the possibility that other religious apparitions may have been the result of UFO activity including Our Lady of Lourdes and the revelations to Joseph Smith.
_	Certain other scholars believe that the play is an early version of Shakespeare's own play, pointing to the survival of Shakespeare's version in three quite different early texts, Q1 (1603), Q2 (1604) and F (1623), suggesting the possibility that it was revised by the author over a period of many years.
_	Though these objections have been made, the possibility that the incident may be a homicide rather than an animal attack has been ruled out by the RCMP.
_	Alarmed by the possibility that the revolution might spread to Visayas and Mindanao, Colonel Ricardo Monet, the Commander of the Spanish Forces in the Visayas came to Dumangas in the early part of 1898 to recruit volunteers to help defend the colonial government.
_	These radial velocity measurements conclusively eliminated the possibility that the observed dips in Kepler-39's brightness were caused by the movements of binary stars and confirming the existence of planet Kepler-39b in the process.
_	In a television interview that aired September 22, 2010 on Decision Makers TV, he openly speculated about the possibility that the United States may have been complicit in the events of September 11 attacks in 2001.
_	The collapse of the Soviet Union has given rise to the possibility that former Soviet nuclear weapons might become available on the black market (so-called 'loose nukes').
_	In the KLM protocol, each of the photons is usually in one of two modes, and the modes are different between the photons (the possibility that a mode is occupied by more than one photon is zero).
_	Hilde allies herself with Siegfried's group of mercenaries, Schwarzwind, to defend her kingdom, regardless of the possibility that she might lose her life in the process.
_	However, he was willing to accept the possibility that Madoff was front-running (as Casey and Chelo believed).
_	Willow and Tara snuggle in bed together after their reconciliation, discussing the possibility that something is going on between Buffy and Spike.
_	For this reason, the absence of matching records found by SAVE cannot be used to rule out the possibility that somebody is a United States citizen.
_	In their 2004 book, Gerry Kennedy and Rob Churchill suggest the possibility that the Voynich manuscript may be a case of glossolalia (speaking-in-tongues), channeling, or outsider art.
_	Two independent reports have linked reciprocal 1q21.1 deletions and duplications in this region with microcephaly and macrocephaly, respectively, raising the possibility that DUF1220 copy number may be involved in influencing human brain size.
_	Like movement, firing is resolved simultaneously, resulting in the possibility that ships could destroy each other on the same turn.
_	As the discussions continued, Zhao suggested sending the general Gao Yanchou (高彥儔) to attack Bi Prefecture (壁州, in modern Bazhong, Sichuan), to cut off the possibility that Shannan West troops might be able to attack through Bi. However, the official Li Hao opposed, pointing out that doing so would cut off any possibility of reconciliation with the imperial government, and Meng agreed.
_	When, in early 1970, a few years after production of Flipper had ended, Kathy, the dolphin who most often played Flipper, did not resurface for air, O'Barry considered the possibility that she had committed suicide, and concluded that capturing, displaying and training dolphins to perform tricks is wrong.
_	However, the court held open the possibility that the right to substantive due process could be violated in certain egregious circumstances and remanded the case to the lower court to decide this issue on the case's facts.
_	Müller was to make inquiries if "abuse" had happened somewhere and report this to Himmler "on SS oath"; Himmler hence did not from the outset exclude the possibility that such had taken place.
_	According to a 2018 article in "The Guardian", "Eyewitnesses, however, gave accounts suggesting that the shot may have come from the opposite direction to the basement, raising the possibility that Ramp was accidentally felled, by police fire.
_	Special features include deleted scenes, such as a much more abstract alternate opening and an alternate ending that gives a few more details about Walter's prison sentence and hints at the possibility that the son could be subject to the same obsessions as his father.
_	The long history of aridity raises the possibility that supergene mineralisation, under the appropriate conditions, can form in arid environments, instead of requiring humid conditions.
_	But this concept also hinted at the possibility that the land might have more valuable uses than as a home for the Twins, an idea which would play a significant role later.
_	The film leaves open the possibility that in the future a less oppressive society will be achieved: literally translated, the title means 'The Unfinished Tale'.
_	They are attracted to boys, but also unhappily entertain the possibility that they might be lesbians.
_	Gifford discusses the possibility that the defensive structures date from the original, 14th-century castle, which was then rebuilt as a hunting lodge in the 15th century.
_	In a reversal, the current owners changed their position on the historic status in a letter to the Council, citing historic tax credits and the possibility that the house's historic value could be a selling point.
_	Police were no longer allowed to refuse a report based on an initial belief that no criminal activity was involved, the brevity of the interval since the person was last seen, the possibility that the person may have intentionally disappeared or the lack of a relationship between the missing person and the reporter.
_	This includes the possibility that societal double standards may scare more men than women into not talking about or otherwise revealing their sex fantasies (corroborated by the existence of characteristics that differ between male volunteers and male nonvolunteers, but not between female volunteers and female nonvolunteers, in erotica research) giving a false appearance of men having narrower ranges of sexual fantasies than women, and the possibility that men who want to be castrated out of their spiritual beliefs may have to commit sex crimes and claim that it was due to uncontrollable urges to get castrated since such surgery is not off the shelf (corroborated by the overrepresentation of religious groups in child sexual abuse scandals that cannot be explained by biopsychiatric correlations) creating a false appearance of men being less able to control their sexual impulses than women.
_	SSPV priests regard the questions of the legitimacy of the present hierarchy and the possibility that the Holy See is unoccupied (sedevacantism) to be unresolved.
_	The "Wall Street Journal" noted that this development was “being closely watched because it raises the possibility that patent officials may put an end” to Bass's patent-challenge scheme.
_	The sections of the Newcastle Inner City Bypass from the Pacific Highway at to and from Jesmond to have since been constructed, while the original freeway route between Belmont and Bennetts Green and then northward to the Pacific Highway at Merewether Heights is still reserved from development, with the possibility that it could be constructed in the future.
_	Although the "Force de Raid" was berthed in colonial Africa outside Axis-occupied territory following the Second Armistice at Compiègne, the wartime British Government of Winston Churchill was greatly alarmed by the possibility that these modern capital ships might be acquired by the Axis powers, with or without French consent.
_	The Trust Deed stipulated that the winning essay should be the one:...which in the opinion of the King's School most convincingly authoritatively and informatively examines and discusses in depth the life and works of Christopher Marlowe and the authorship of the plays and poems now commonly attributed to William Shakespeare with particular regard to the possibility that Christopher Marlowe wrote some or all of those poems and plays or made some inspirational creative or compositional contributions towards the authorship of them.
_	However, Heinrich Winter (1938), one of the few scholars to have had direct access to the fragile map, believes Humboldt's original 1424 date has merit and casts doubt on Ruge's identification of its author, although reserving the possibility that it might have been made by another member of the Freducci family.
_	Opponents of the legislation argued that this would have rendered the Parker case moot, and would have effectively eliminated the possibility that the case would be heard by the Supreme Court.
_	equilibrium due to being easier to compute, or alternatively due to the possibility that in games of more
_	Hotson himself had considered the possibility that the witnesses had "concocted a lying account of Marlowe's behaviour, to which they swore at the inquest, and with which they deceived the jury" but came down against that scenario.
_	Another concern regarding signing the treaty is the possibility that implementing it would, in practice, "tear the child away from a parent", as a primary caregiver would be unable to accompany the children to countries which have criminalized parental abduction.
_	In other parts of the world these species are found associated with brackish or polluted water conditions, raising the possibility that there is residual salinity in the deeper parts of the lake.
_	While this discovery did not rule out the possibility that "Oviraptor" included eggs in its diet, its exact feeding strategies remain unknown.
_	Although the Hero of Ukraine decrees do not stipulate the possibility that a decree on awarding this title can be annulled.
_	Keith Taylor, President of the Student Association, was vehemently opposed to the EU, fearing the possibility that the organization rendering aid would result in death or other situations in which the institute would be liable.
_	Mailer embraced the possibility that an American withdrawal could lead to a Communist Asia; however, he did not think it was the calamity that most individuals thought it was.
_	Whereas neo-Darwinism defines evolution in terms of changes in gene distribution, the possibility that an evolutionarily significant change may arise and be sustained without any directly corresponding change in gene frequencies is an elementary assumption of developmental systems theory, just as neo-Darwinism’s ‘explanation’ of phenomena in terms of reproductive fitness is regarded as fundamentally shallow.
_	In the Vinaya, it is said that "ubhatovyanjañaka" should not be ordained, on account of the possibility that they would entice a fellow monk or nun into having sex.
_	The fact that the officer proposed to be court president was junior to the captain of "Maine", Wegner writes, "would indicate either ignorance of navy regulations or that, in the beginning, the board did not intend to examine the possibility that the ship was lost by accident and the negligence of her captain."
_	The attack resulted in President Duterte declaring a state of martial law across the entire island of Mindanao with the possibility that it be expanded nationwide.
_	English Legal documents indicate actual presence of settlers in 1676, with the possibility that the first Englishmen had made permanent homes much earlier.
_	LeVay added, "The existence of 'exceptions' in the present sample (that is, presumed heterosexual men with small INAH 3 nuclei, and homosexual men with large ones), hints at the possibility that sexual orientation, although an important variable, may not be the sole determinant of INAH 3 size.
_	After Carroll announced that he was leaving for the Seahawks, he denied the possibility that the NCAA sanctions were a factor in his leaving USC to return to pro football in Seattle.
_	Widespread speculation and criticism centered on the possibility that Wade was grooming his son Karim to succeed him.
_	Four documentary, "Hitler's British Girl", investigated the possibility that Unity Mitford gave birth to the son of Adolf Hitler in Hill View Cottage, Wigginton.
_	Four years later, after Messi had won his first Ballon d'Or by a record margin, the public debate regarding his qualities as a player moved beyond his status in contemporary football to the possibility that he was the greatest player in history.
_	During the conversation, Burris and Blagojevich discussed the possibility that Burris might raise campaign money on a larger scale, saying "I know I could give him a check myself."
_	In the late 1940s, the personnel of Project Sign, the U.S. Air Force's flying saucer investigation, seriously considered the possibility that UFOs might have been secret aircraft manufactured by the U.S.S.R. based on the Hortens' designs.
_	However, as more information about fission became available, the possibility that the fragments of nuclear fission could still have been present in the target became more remote.
_	This reaction resulted in the sample precipitating with the HF, an action that definitively ruled out the possibility that the unknown substance was a rare earth.
_	"The Times" raised the possibility that RAF production aircraft would be diverted as early Saudi Arabian aircraft, with the RAF forced to wait for its full complement of aircraft.
_	Some authors insist that manuscript belongs to unknown collector rejecting the possibility that it was Zmajević.
_	Yolland and Barlow also noted the possibility that failure was by fracture of a leeward column.
_	There is no firm evidence of this and it is likely that Gian Galeazzo became a scapegoat after the fact due the existing animosity with France, though there remains the possibility that the Duke of Milan, who had murdered his own uncle to ensure his own power, did in fact betray the crusaders.
_	As the local people see one man with the courage to fight Raunak Singh, they awaken to the possibility that they too can resist his extortionary demands.
_	He rejected some alternatives, such as a close affinity to aardvarks or the possibility that the material assigned to "Plesiorycteropus" did not in fact represent a single animal.
_	This finding has raised the possibility that the species may be evolving resistance to malaria, however this may be only a localized event.
_	His statement left open the possibility that some documents could still be withheld under the JFK Records
_	So there was no way to exclude the possibility that someone maximized the graphics detail on purpose to force a slowdown of the action.
_	This opens up the possibility that there are other branes which could support other universes.
_	There is the possibility that Clement of Rome cryptically referred to Atlantis in his First Epistle of Clement, 20: 8:
_	The olomao is still classified as critically endangered due the possibility that an extremely small population or individuals may still exist.
_	Intelligence officers appraised the voluntary withdrawal ahead of the two IX Corps divisions as a realignment of forces with those dropping back in the Dauntless sector, but did not overlook the possibility that the Chinese were coaxing the IX Corps into a vulnerable deployment.
_	When asked about the possibility that African Americans may no longer hold the majority of the seats on the Board of Education, Marilyn Preston Killingham, deputy chairman of the Umoja Party, said, "The general design for D.C. is one of white takeover.
_	In this regard, co-financing will be sought with the CONICET doctoral fellowships as well as the possibility that researchers from this body can develop their work of study in UADE.
_	With the possibility that the edge of the pack was nearby, work on the construction of a jury rudder began.
_	Since declared candidate Rodrigo Duterte of PDP-Laban faces possible legal problems with his own candidacy, Señeres originally opened the possibility that he will allow Rodrigo Duterte as his substitute candidate if Duterte will abide with three conditions, especially being a pro-life advocate.
_	On January 12, 2015, at the 2015 Winter TCA Press Tour, Wentworth Miller and Dominic Purcell revealed the possibility that Fox was interested in bringing back "Prison Break", with Miller stating:
_	His teacher Shi De (石德), invoking the infamous story of Zhao Gao's scheme to murder Ying Fusu and raising the possibility that Emperor Wu might already be deceased, suggested to Liu Ju to start an uprising to get rid of the villains.
_	Ambiguity arises from the possibility that the listener might interpret the meaning differently from what the speaker intended.
_	However, Abigail's hallucinations get worse as the possibility that Ben is looming becomes even more real.
_	Strictly, it excludes the situation where the fetus is a hybrid of the carrier and another species, thereby excluding the possibility that the carrier is the biological mother of the offspring.
_	Major figures were explicitly open to the possibility that God created through a Lamarckian form of evolution: long articles by James Orr and George Frederick Wright expressed this openness, and Benjamin Breckinridge Warfield and A H Strong shared this view.
_	In his 2007 phylogenetic examination of Formicidae, entomologist Philip Ward notes the possibility that "Brownimecia" is a crown group genus and placed the subfamily into the informal "poneroid" grouping in his phylogony.
_	This then means that medical science has difficulty in entertaining even the possibility that placebo effects are real, exist and may be objectively determinable and finding such reports difficult if not impossible to comprehend and/or accept.
_	This prevented the possibility that a blind person might drop the arm accidentally and that the sudden fall might damage the stylus or the record.
_	Dying, he confides to Tenma that he gave in to his anger (raising the possibility that his alter ego was a psychological filter he used to justify his violent acts); he then dies in front of Tenma, Franz Bonaparta and Wim Gnaup.
_	Archduke Charles did not seriously consider the possibility that the French could cross elsewhere than north of Lobau island until late on 4 July.
_	A large-scale genetic analysis conducted in 2008 shows the possibility that ANK3 is involved in bipolar disorder.
_	After Scully raises the possibility that Marty is not be blind, an eye examination is undertaken, during which Marty experiences another vision.
_	The podcast's conversations regarding driverless cars, for example, analyzed how autonomous cars might decrease employment of truck drivers, the potential for increased labor productivity as workers complete job tasks while being chauffeured to their workplaces, the possibility that driverless cars might be supplied through the sharing economy, and how carsharing of driverless cars could decrease individual car ownership (with a resulting decrease in real estate demand for commercial and residential parking areas).
_	Additionally, on 18 December 2006, Tarcisio Bertone, Cardinal Secretary of State of the Holy See, stated, but only in jest, that he did not preclude the possibility that the Vatican, in the future, could put together a football team of great value, that could play on the same level as, Roma, Internazionale and Milan or Genoa.
_	Unfortunately for Beaulieu, his government warned him of the possibility that Sardinia might make peace with France or even switch sides.
_	Several scholars have raised the possibility that the will was indeed a forgery, though most modern historians believe that it was genuine.
_	During that year Home Depot made an offer to buy the center to build a new store, with the possibility that portions of the center may be demolished.
_	Since the collapse of free-form commercial FM, the commercial radio market has become more and more stringently formatted and automation-driven, leaving no room for experimentation or the possibility that any artist would ever become popular without the official "imprimatur" of major-record-label or broadcast-industry focus groups.
_	Failing to do so meant they could not eliminate the possibility that the neutrons were being released due to electrical effects in the plasma, the sorts of reactions that Kurchatov had pointed out earlier.
_	Although some suggest the possibility that the stories have their origin in Persia or India, they come from Maghreb (Northwestern Africa), which in turn, according to other authors, were originated in al-Andalus (Islamic Iberia).
_	Brennan spoke of the GAA's plans for pay-per-view deals, the improvement of disciplinary rules within the sport, the possibility that some inter county competitions might be discontinued, the GAA's possible recognition of the Gaelic Players Association and his opposition to the idea of professionalism within what is primarily an amateur organisation.
_	This defeat put the Mohave on the defensive, wary of the possibility that whites would take this moment of weakness as an opportunity to begin settling on tribal lands.
_	He was facing up to the possibility that he might lose Moore for the entire World Cup.
_	When the Hulk was "upgraded"' to the persona of Doc Green (a version of the Hulk with access to Banner's intellect after being treated with Extremis following being shot in the head), he began to experience dream-like visions of the Maestro while hunting down and 'curing' all over gamma-based mutations, creating the possibility that Doc Green would eventually become his dark future self, starting with him contemplating growing a beard.
_	The first temperature measurements had a standard deviation of 30 °C from the brightness temperature, but due to the small sample size was estimated to be 50 °C with the possibility that the true temperature of the sample being was 200 °C higher than that of the brightness measurement.
_	Interest in Mars has been stimulated by the planet's dramatic red color, by early scientific speculations that its surface conditions might be capable of supporting life, and by the possibility that Mars could be colonized by humans in the future.
_	The discovery team evaluated the possibility that is not gravitationally bound to , but is seen close to it along our line of sight and moving in the same direction by chance.
_	The disadvantage of this method is the possibility that an incorrect solution will occur.
_	The grain problem therefore refers to the possibility that an adaptive problem may actually involve a set of nested 'sub-problems' "which may themselves relate to different input domains or situations.
_	Some historians have raised the possibility that the attack never took place.
_	Lan Fleming considered the possibility that the Phobos monolith may be artificial and not a geological feature or rock.
_	Three of the plays have their own separate pagination, suggesting the possibility that they were intended for individual publication.
_	Other possibilities had been considered for the birth of the Detroit bamboo sharks including thoughts that the sharks had been fertilized by a male and stored the sperm for a period of time, as well as the possibility that the Belle Isle bamboo shark is a hermaphrodite, harboring both male and female sex organs, and capable of fertilizing its own eggs, but that is not confirmed.
_	Bob Davis acknowledges the possibility that had Coleman played, Essendon may well have won, given that Geelong had no true match for him, as Coleman was simply too skilled.
_	Residents of Atwater Village were terrified of the possibility that McGhee could be found innocent and subsequently released to terrorize the neighborhood again.
_	It is noted that the ancient scrolls written about Void Termina say that its reincarnations may be affected by positive or negative energy that is gathered when it revives, leaving the possibility that Void Termina may one day return as a friend instead of an enemy.
_	In February, the Tokai Daini Plant in Ibaraki Prefecture and the Tomari power facility in Hokkaido said that they could not rule out the possibility that the plants were vulnerable.
_	Depaulis additionally doubts the Kven and Pomor tracks because he finds it hard to imagine that the Norwegians and Danes based their daldøs game on the Sámi sáhkku game, but he does not give any arguments as to why this is any less likely than the opposite; nor does he address the possibility that daldøs and sáhkku could have developed separately, but with roots in the same Middle Eastern progenitor.
_	The nearness of Savai'i and the Samoa island chain to the Tonga Trench at the south became a possible explanation for these discrepancies as well as the possibility that the islands were formed by magma seeping through cracks in stressed fracture zones.
_	The Human Rights Campaign joined students in advising law enforcement officials on the possibility that Warren's murder was a hate crime.
_	Brague has said that "Leo Strauss taught me that when reading a text, you must be open to the possibility that it contains different layers of meaning.
_	The "New York Times"/"Los Angeles Times" reporter T. Christian Miller reported on the possibility that he was murdered by defense contractors who feared he would become a whistle-blower against their alleged fraudulent activity throughout the Iraq War.
_	Even allowing for the possibility that some of these units were detachments from larger units, it is likely that Diocletianic unit-strengths were far lower than earlier.
_	She discusses the possibility that Nita has an elemental affinity with water, and tells her about Angelina Pellegrino, the last great hydromage, who designed the dangerous and powerful Gibraltar Passthrough, used to move and manipulate large quantities of water under precise control.
_	Thévenot studied astronomy, physics, medicine, and magnetism, and demonstrated in the 1660s the possibility that atmospheric pulsations had something to do with human and animal respiration.
_	Thomson further suggests the possibility that as "Oresteia's" ending dramatizes the establishment of the court of Areopagus, the Danaid plays may have ended by dramatizing the establishment of the festival of the Thesmophoria, a festival reserved for women which was based on the cult of Demeter which, according to Herodotus, was brought to Greece from Egypt by the Danaids.
_	Scholars have expressed the possibility that they are indeed Boniface's, but this is by no means generally accepted.
_	Recognizing that some of the studies potentially included the presence of confounding factors, such as the possibility that women who regularly perform fellatio and swallow semen also engage in more frequent intercourse, the researchers also noted that, either way, "the data still overwhelmingly supports the main theory" behind all their studies—that repeated exposure to semen establishes the maternal immunological tolerance necessary for a safe and successful pregnancy.
_	Psychologist Earl B. Hunt reviewed the book in the journal "Intelligence", stating that "Nisbett is a very good writer, but he is a combative writer", and while "Nisbett is writing for a general audience" and "does so very well", Hunt argues that "Nisbett...goes too far in attacking discussions of the genetics of intelligence", that Nisbett's argument against the genetic origins of racial and ethnic differences was weakened by citing research on parenting practices without "[considering] the possibility that these practices may themselves be influenced by the parental genotype", and that Nisbett repeatedly attributed positions to unnamed "experts" without citation.
_	The act ends as the subjects worry about Chrudoš and the possibility that he will sow discord.
_	The same kind of disc-shaped cobbles are found in the lower layers of human occupation in Chan-Chan, as well, leaving open the possibility that they were deposited by an ancient tsunami, according to Pino and Navarro.
_	His teacher Shi De (石德), invoking the story of Ying Fusu of the Qin dynasty and raised the possibility that Emperor Wu might already be dead, suggesting that Prince Ju start an uprising to fight the conspirators.
_	The increasingly overt Iranian involvement necessary to stave off a Kurdish defeat—including the presence of Iranian soldiers dressed in Kurdish uniforms, who participated in combat for as long as 10 days at a time, thus raising the possibility that further escalation might lead to "open war" between Iran and Iraq—combined with assurances from Arab leaders including Sadat, King Hussein of Jordan, and Algeria's Houari Boumédiène that "Saddam Hussein was ready to pull Iraq out of [the] Soviet orbit if Iran would take away the [Kurdish revolt] which was forcing them into the arms of the Soviets"—also helped convince the Shah that an accommodation with Iraq was necessary and desirable.
_	They noted that other planets discovered using radial velocity measurements might not have accounted for the possibility that their host stars were binary systems; the only way that this was definitely known in the case of Kepler-14 was through the use of high-resolution imaging.
_	Since the bombings, the chief opposition party, PP (which lost power in the election in the immediate aftermath of the bombings), together with conservative media in Spain, have overtly argued the possibility that the Socialist party, the police, the Spanish, French, and Moroccan secret services, and, of course, ETA, had a role in organisation of the outrage.
_	Ultimately, Fritsch's study concluded that while no protease activity was detected, this fact does not rule out the possibility that the genus may be carnivorous in some other way.
_	There is also the possibility that the full-length form of the molecule reaches the cell surface before furin cleaves it.
_	In one very revealing conversation with Gaunt, she explores the possibility that Gaunt may be disappointed, let down by not being chosen Warmaster when Slaydo died.
_	One solution to this dilemma may be that more than one hotspot passed through the Marshall Islands, as well as the possibility that hotspot volcanism is affected by contemporaneous lithospheric extension.
_	1988 - the freehold of the forest is acquired by East Sussex County Council from the executors of the Lord of the Manor, forestalling the possibility that the remaining common land of the forest would be broken up and sold off into private hands.
_	In regards to the possibility that her father could have been saved, King said she doubted that her father could have lived much longer given all the stress he had during his tenure as a leader of the Civil Rights Movement.
_	A Scientific Advisory Committee funded by the Semiconductor Industry Association concluded there was no evidence of increased cancer risk to cleanroom workers, although it could not rule out the possibility that circumstances might exist that could result in increased risk.
_	Bakker now began to consider the possibility that, in view of the lack of proof for a close relationship between theropods and sauropodomorphs, the 1974 study indicated that Sauropodomorpha were more closely related to the ornithischian dinosaurs than to theropods.
_	However, Pearce did not rule out the possibility that certain aspects of the show may have been intentionally engineered to increase the possibility of disorder.
_	An economic downside to using birth control to limit fertility is the possibility that parents will not having enough successful, living offspring to support them financially in old age.
_	This alteration significantly shifted the work's centre of balance; the young woman was no longer near the middle of the composition, thus reducing both her prominence and the possibility that she is seen to be the focus of the work.
_	This study also admitted that at first they did not consider the possibility that the infant did not have a urea cycle deficiency.
_	In a 2010 interview, staff members of Radical Axis stated that a sequel entitled "Death Fighter" is in production, and mentioned the possibility that the film might be made in 3-D.
_	In a review from Automobile Magazine, writer Greg Migliore notes that despite the reception from both sides and the possibility that other automakers might exit the large SUV segment, that with this 12th generation, "GM is clearly hoping the Suburban makes it to the century mark."
_	Alperovich announced on January 15, 2014, that he would not seek a fourth term as governor, but “did not dismiss the possibility that his wife, Senator Beatriz Rojkés, would run to succeed him in 2015.
_	In various critical interpretations of the novella, special note is made about the possibility that Dionis is the writer's "alter ego".
_	They also mention the possibility that helmets would make cycling more dangerous by giving cyclists a false sense of safety and thus encouraging riskier riding behavior."
_	The director also leaves open the possibility that Oscar's life starts over again in an endless loop, due to the human brain's perception of time.
_	The build-up to the opening of the championship was dominated by Birr and the possibility that they would retain their All-Ireland title and lead the all-time club roll of honour with four championships.
_	Olshey noted that Maynor was known for making excellent decisions with the basketball while playing at a steady and reliable pace and offered the possibility that Maynor might potentially share time in the backcourt with Blazer rookie star Damian Lillard.
_	So [...] you have to consider the possibility that as remote as it may seem, these finds may represent evidence of contact with Europeans prior to the Vikings' arrival in Greenland."
_	The elimination of the possibility that income taxation would return (through a separate Congressional bill), requires a repeal of the Sixteenth Amendment to the United States Constitution along with expressly prohibiting an income tax.
_	The film attempts to conclude if Trump may be able to be manipulated by Putin due to the possibility that Russian intelligence may possess a sex tape of Trump.
_	Airco executives, who were at the time intensely exploring various alternatives and further partnerships with other aircraft companies, considered the possibility that Boeing might choose to drop the 727 project and instead co-manufacture the Airco D.H.121 in the USA; Lord Douglas was one of the proponents of this initiative.
_	Each extra penalty has its own smoothing parameter and estimation then proceeds as before, but now with the possibility that terms will be completely penalized to zero.
_	Though it is possible to understand people and to treat them as if they are completely known, Bakhtin’s conception of unfinalizability considers the possibility that a person can change, and that a person is never fully revealed or fully known in the world.
_	Historian F. G. Stevens, one of the main authorities on the early development of Penang, pointed out in a 1929 article "A Contribution to the Early History of Prince of Wales Island" that the road leading to the house from Air Itam Road was only "lined out but not made" in 1807, discounting the possibility that the house could have been built before then.
_	"Shame" highlights something like the downsizing of interpretation as it only occupies eight pages and draws the reader's attention to the possibility that the text experiments with the potential indifference between drugs and texts.
_	He dismissed the possibility that the trial was not fair as he saw no evidence to suggest that Blencoe was not able to provide a full answer and defence.
_	Police soon discarded the possibility that the shooting was a terror attack.
_	His motivation stemmed from the possibility that if a war involving France were to be lost, he, or his successor, would still hold the Duchy of Brittany as a means to preserve their royal status and function.
_	However, the possibility that media owners can be involved in various business enterprises in sectors other than the media one, as well as their involvement in public tenders, is a concerning issue since economic cross interests can threaten media independence and integrity.
_	She asks Janeen to come live with her as her only remaining family, but Janeen tells her, "I'm going home" and returns to the swamp, with the possibility that she may decide to rejoin civilization in the future.
_	The background factors were the driver’s inexperience, the possibility that the driver anticipated the tram ahead would leave the stop earlier, and driver’s suspicion that brakes were not working properly and therefore the use of the incorrect braking method.
_	In "Paper Reclaim Ltd v Aotearoa International" it was held that exemplary damages are not to be awarded in actions for breach of contract but the Court left open the possibility that exemplary damages might be available where the breach of contract is a tort.
_	The city changed its approach in the late 1990s after building owners complained that the upgrade process was too expensive, and the possibility that the city may be left in possession of properties that were left needing the costly renovations.
_	The other defendants were also acquitted of murder due to the unreliability of eyewitness testimony and the possibility that White had died from a pre-existing thrombotic condition.
_	A catalogue of failures has been plaguing the research effort, but Devereaux refuses to entertain the possibility that the base computer is making errors.
_	The NTSB report on the accident stated, "the Safety Board cannot rule out the possibility that the flightcrew was incapacitated by smoke or heat in the cockpit during the last 7 seconds of the flight."
_	This, in turn, cast doubt on the fairness of Evans' trial and raised the possibility that an innocent person had been hanged.
_	Groves warned General Dwight D. Eisenhower of the possibility that the Germans might disrupt the Normandy landings with radioactive poisons, and sent Major Arthur V. Peterson to brief his chief of staff, Lieutenant General Walter B. Smith.
_	Despite her apparently premature death he never lost faith in her divine mission or the possibility that she would reappear, and wrote a book in her defense: "An answer to the world etc." (London, 1806).
_	Additionally, multiple cases of credit card fraud involving organised crime syndicates has also raised the possibility that credit card numbers retrieved from Landslide.com may have been used by a third party and not their owners at all.
_	Although the reliability of such late genealogical sources is suspect, Rǫgnvaldr's known dealings with leading Welsh dynasts could lend weight to the possibility that he had an otherwise unknown Welsh wife or concubine.
_	"Barron's" raised the possibility that Madoff's returns were most likely due to front running his firm's brokerage clients.
_	FICO scores are used by many mortgage lenders that use a risk-based system to determine the possibility that the borrower may default on financial obligations to the mortgage lender.
_	Due to the possibility that repeatedly "heading" a ball practicing soccer could cause cumulative brain injury, the idea of introducing protective headgear for players has been proposed.
_	One legal commentator on the case thought that insufficient consideration had been given to the possibility that Guede had called at the house on some pretext while Kercher was alone there, murdered her after she opened the door to him, and faked a burglary to cover his tracks.
_	There is the possibility that the drystone wall may be associated with John Melton Black's private residence on Melton Hill c.1867, it has the potential to extend the current body of knowledge about this early civic leader.
_	The opinion raises the possibility that Westminster may legislate to relax abortion laws in Northern Ireland, since human rights, unlike health, are not a devolved matter.
_	The main task of Nazi propaganda, both at home and abroad was to reassure the general public, alarmed at the possibility that Hitler meant war.
_	Although popularly believed to have retired to the castle of Kozograd above Fojnica as dowager, there is no historical basis for dismissing the possibility that she remained at the royal court in Jajce as the mother of Stephen Tomašević's closest heirs.
_	The letters raised the possibility that Faithfull had committed suicide by stowing away aboard one of the ships in port in New York on June 5 until the ship was underway, and then, after taking a large dose of sedative, jumping overboard as the ship passed south of Long Beach late on June 5 or early on June 6, with her body eventually washing up on shore.
_	Historians have offered several hypotheses about why the survival rate was much smaller in the Netherlands than in the other western European countries; including the possibility that the German occupiers in the Netherlands were particularly vigorous in comparison to other occupied countries.
_	In 2018 "The McClatchy Company" reported that Mitchell, as a long time lawyer for the NRA, had previously expressed concerns about the NRA's close ties to Russia and the possibility that Russia had been funneling cash through the NRA into Donald Trump's 2016 Presidential Campaign.
_	For Commander-in-Chief, North America Jeffery Amherst, who before the war had dismissed the possibility that the Indians would offer any effective resistance to British rule, the military situation over the summer had become increasingly grim.
_	The infant was nonetheless kept outside the house to avert the possibility that evil might still befall the family if the child remained under their roof.
_	This is a high risk scheme because of the possibility that the storage area for passwords might become compromised.
_	Hazel Rowley argues that "there is no doubt that Franklin's relationship with Missy was romantic", but notes the possibility that the relationship could not have been consummated due to FDR's disability.
_	By March 25, the ozone loss had become the largest compared to that observed in all previous winters with the possibility that it would become an ozone hole.
_	The City of Dayton purchased land on the site of the development in May 2013, raising the possibility that a new development could be in the works there.
_	At the end of the series, Germanicus is surrounded by a loyal army of Jews and Anatolians, and Nepos' army is routed, leading rise to the possibility that he may try to take back Rome.
_	Modern critics today have rejected this account, skeptical of the possibility that any other individual aside from Kenko himself could have put together such an insightful piece of work.
_	It is used to prove the existence of certain data before a certain point (e.g. contracts, research data, medical records, ...) without the possibility that the owner can backdate the timestamps.
_	By the end of 2017, Citi Bike planned to double its bike fleet to 12,000, with the possibility that some of the expansion could be publicly funded.
_	Gough issued another memorandum on 30 June, summarising the plan and referring to the possibility that the attack would move to open warfare after 36 hours, noting that this might take several set-piece battles to achieve.
_	There is the possibility that sub-strata kerbing and channeling exist with the potential to extend the current body of knowledge about this early civic work of the Charters Towers Municipal Council.
_	Cumont himself dated the text to the 5th or 6th century, considering the possibility that this text was in turn based on an older, 4th-century Latin text, which would have been written within a few decades of the historical event.
_	A satisficer has criteria and standards, but a satisficer is not worried about the possibility that there might be something better.
_	Kurt that she is a sophomore, leaving open the possibility that she could return to the show in future seasons.
_	Anglican Bishop Charles Ellicott mentions the possibility that the words were "interpolated by transcribers to make the text of the discourse harmonise with the liturgies".
_	Still, the Court could not completely discount the possibility that for certain "carefully contemplated murderers", "the possible penalty of death may well enter into the cold calculus that precedes the decision to act".
_	While the procedure generally reduces the over-all risk level for the remaining fetus or fetuses, reduction does have its own risks, including the possibility that one or more of the remaining fetuses will also die.
_	It was not possible to exclude the possibility that the crew may have doubted the correct operation of their artificial horizon.
_	Meanwhile, concerned about the possibility that the Wu imperial Yang clan, whose members were then housed at Tai Prefecture (泰州, in modern Taizhou, Jiangsu), would be taken and used by the Later Zhou army, Li Jing sent the official Yin Yanfan (尹延範) to Tai to move them south of the Yangtze to Zhenhai's capital Run Prefecture (潤州).
_	Lucian has the reputation of being a witty scoffer, thanks to his many genuine essays and dialogues, and thus the reliability of "De Dea Syria" as an authentic picture of religious life in Syria in the second century has been brought into question, but given the possibility that Lucian is not in fact the author, the treatise may in fact be more accurate than was previously supposed.
_	While it is uncommon nowadays for vessels to suffer disasters such as fire, explosion, or a sinking, workers face the possibility that they may have to abandon their craft at short notice if it collides with other vessels or runs aground.
_	He did not exclude the possibility that the opposition would start street protests should the government manipulate the election.
_	At least there exists the possibility that we can continue to develop this work, which I believe is very important for Chilean artists.
_	The difference between this estimator and the estimator produced by multiple hash functions is that always has exactly members, whereas the multiple hash functions may lead to a smaller number of sampled elements due to the possibility that two different hash functions may have the same minima.
_	MacDonald was appointed minister of Trinity Congregational Church, Arundel, in 1850, but his sermons—which preached God's universal love and the possibility that none would, ultimately, fail to unite with God—met with little favour and his salary was cut in half.
_	Gould also discusses the possibility that what Morrell sighted was the eastern coast of Graham Land, the so-called "Foyn Coast", despite its being 14° further west from position of the New South Greenland sighting.
_	On November 2017 a Mw 5.5 struck the city of Pohang (South Korea) injuring several people and causing extensive damage, the proximity of the seismic sequence with an EGS site, where stimulation operations has taken place few months prior the earthquake raised the possibility that raises the possibility that this earthquake was anthropogenic.
_	Philippos the jester interrupts, amused by the possibility that even cowardly men be taught manliness (2.14).
_	Around February 1945, he began to fear the possibility that Emil Bodnăraș was planning his assassination and that he intended to blame it on political opponents of the Communist Party (as a means to direct sympathy towards the latter group).
_	The synod also denied the possibility that he could become a bishop in any eparchy in the Czech or Slovak republic.
_	Similarly, most experts recommend longitudinal imaging of the chest, typically a CT scan, to rule out that the possibility that the skin lesion is a skin metastasis of an underlying small cell carcinoma of the lung.
_	"Logically this raises the possibility that a third system, with which the accumbens shell, ventral pallidum, and basolateral amygdala are associated, distributes the affective signals elicited by specific commodities across distinct functional systems to control reward seeking...
_	However, Betty herself raises the possibility that she is being mistaken for the machinations of her sister Glynis.
_	They discuss the possibility that the monster is responsible for Luke's disappearance; Venkenheim suggests they appeal to the monster's humanity, as the monster is intelligent and seeking companionship, which Vicky doubts.
_	In the first half of the 1990s, observers speculated about the possibility that some of the jurisdictions in the federation might emulate the former Soviet republics and demand full independence.
_	The Storm Prediction Center  began to note the possibility that a severe weather event could develop on December 30 as early as December 25, 2010.
_	There is also the possibility that new insurance niches such as takaful (Islamic insurance) and microinsurance products will become part of the Moroccan market in the medium-term, but they are unlikely to appear in the near future.
_	"Christine" was known as a slave ship, which raises the possibility that in his final years Morrell was engaged with the slave trade.
_	Listing of taxa in this category indicates more information is required and acknowledges the possibility that future research will show a threatened classification is appropriate.
_	He is sent to Korell on a mission to discover the fates of three Foundation ships lost in that sector, as well as to investigate the possibility that Korell has developed nuclear technology.
_	Men and women who use it should not donate blood for three years after using it, because of the possibility that the blood might be used in a pregnant patient and cause birth defects.
_	Spencer, in his book "Homosexuality: A History", suggests the possibility that a certain sense of self-preservation in the Roman society after suffering some epidemic such as the Black fever increased the reproductive pressure in the individuals.
_	However, the possibility that it is a genuine name cannot be ruled out.
_	Outside, Mulder and Scully discuss the possibility that Goldman is experimenting on pregnant women for the Project and reminisce about their son William, who remains in hiding.
_	Safety concerns, including the possibility that such a system could be hacked, have prevented its roll-out.
_	Significantly, the possibility that Dietrich may have been acquitted differentiates the case from the unsuccessful 1979 "McInnis v R." appeal.
_	He has no complaint about this because it is designed, he added, to avoid the possibility that "bad Israelis" might buy properties and fly the Israeli flag at their windows.
_	However, the pathologist had suggested the possibility that the ulceration and consequent haemorrhage had resulted from a pill (which might have been taken because of malarial symptoms) lodging in the diverticulum; but, even if this suggestion were correct, the link between malaria and the observed causes of death would be entirely indirect.
_	And Jorge Domene, the security spokesman for the state of Nuevo León, does not discard the possibility that Óscar Manuel Bernal Soriano alias "La Araña" may have been the major leader in the riot and escape in the prison.
_	This eliminated the possibility that the numbers would not be changed as the bomber manoeuvred, but required so much manual working that a new crew member was introduced to operate the console, the bomb-aimer's mate.
_	It also includes the possibility that biopsychiatric models that consider sexual criminality hereditary and that are advocated by some feminists may blame victims of incest abuse for being genetically related to their abusers and thereby dissuading them from reporting abuse.
_	Despite the recent rash of African military coups, Dacko publicly dismissed the possibility that Bokassa would someday try to take control of the country.
_	Based on multichannel seismic profiles and rock samples from Integrated Ocean Drilling Program (IODP) core sites, Tamu Massif appears to be a single massive volcano made of lava flows that emanated from the volcano centre and formed its shield shape; however, the profiles have large gaps in them, leaving open the possibility that it may represent the activity of more than one volcano.
_	In December 2013, San Diego Gas & Electric filed a lawsuit against NaturEner, claiming that NaturEner hid the possibility that nearby eagles would be harmed by the wind farm.
_	In 2003, James Alcock Professor of Psychology at York University published "Give the Null Hypothesis a Chance: Reasons to Remain Doubtful about the Existence of Psi", where he claimed that parapsychologists never seem to take seriously the possibility that psi does not exist.
_	Because of that, they interpret null results as indicating only that they were unable to observe psi in a particular experiment, rather than taking it as support for the possibility that there is no psi.
_	Charges could not be laid because there was not enough evidence to identify individuals, with the possibility that the perpetrator(s) were among those killed, or alternately, those who knew the truth were concealing it.
_	The planctomycete "Gemmata obscuriglobus" has exceptionally complex membrane architecture and has been a source of controversy in the literature regarding the possibility that it has a membrane-bound "nucleoid" compartment enclosing its DNA.
_	Predator drone footage also shows the possibility that Roberts was alive and fighting on the peak after the SEALs left rather than being killed outright as thought by Mako 30.
_	While some have discussed the possibility that Gudrid spoke with the Pope on her journey, there is no proof of it.
_	Elaine is bitten by a dog while with George at the optometrist's, and she becomes afraid of dogs as well as the possibility that she may have rabies.
_	miR-17 and miR-30c-1, these patients were noncarriers of BRCA1 or BRCA2 mutations, lending the possibility that familial breast cancer may be caused by variation in these miRNAs.
_	Some attention was also given to the possibility that favourable coverage of the lottery in Desmond's "Daily Express" and the "Daily Star" amounted to disguised advertising, which was reported to the Advertising Standards Authority, who found the issue to be outside their remit.
_	Despite the fact that the Harris County Prosecutor cited Denkowski's expertise in upholding his findings in the other four cases, Denton County District Attorney Bruce Isaacks rejected the findings, fired Denkowski and hired Dr. Thomas Allen to assess the possibility that Clark was faking mental retardation.
_	However, other sources raise the possibility that this statement may have been misleading.
_	Heinrich Kramer (author of the "Malleus Maleficarum") adopted again an intermediate position; he wrote that demons acted first as succubi and then as incubi, but added the possibility that incubi could receive semen from succubi, but he considered that this sperm could not fecundate women.
_	He was also overwrought over the possibility that the French would come to Dacko's aid after the coup d'état, as had occurred after one in Gabon against President Léon M'ba in February 1964.
_	Professor Dennis Olson of Princeton Theological Seminary wrote that the episode illustrated the need to allow for the possibility that persons outside the institutional leadership of God’s people may have genuine words and insights from God.
_	During the interview NPR's Scott Simon discussed the love letters of Harding and Phillips, which were soon to be released for unhindered perusal by the public; and speculated about the possibility that Phillips was a German spy during World War I.
_	This is in contrast with "The guests need an omelette for breakfast," which leaves open the possibility that they also need other things for breakfast.
_	This went beyond the recommendation of Patriarch Paisios of Jerusalem, who suggested that differences in ritual did not of themselves indicate error, accepting the possibility that differences hasd developed over time.
_	The article warned clinicians to be alert to the possibility that paraneoplastic pemphigus in lymphomas not of B-cell lineage.
_	Reports surfaced of internal memoranda addressed to many of Shell's senior executives months earlier discussing the possibility that the company's proven reserves had been overestimated.
_	Unlike Planck, Einstein entertained the possibility that there might be actual physical quanta of light—what we now call photons.
_	Derek, who is constantly worried about the possibility that she will develop Alzheimer's, initiates a clinical trial hoping to cure the disease.
_	This "proton radius puzzle" remained unresolved as of late 2015, and has attracted much attention, in part because of the possibility that both measurements are valid, which would imply the influence of some "new physics".
_	Carl Sagan once suggested the possibility that time travelers could be here but are disguising their existence or are not recognized as time travelers.
_	Because ectoplasm was believed susceptible to destruction by light, the possibility that ectoplasm might appear became a reason for making sure that Victorian séances took place in near darkness.
_	An important, but unanswered question concerns the possibility that the cancer risk from passive smoking can increase with exposure to residential radon.
_	Smith also introduced legislation to toughen the prostitution laws of England and Wales, making it a criminal offence to pay for sex with a prostitute controlled by a pimp, with the possibility that anyone caught paying for sex with an illegally trafficked woman could face criminal charges.
_	There is the possibility that the M28A2 could have been the first unit designed to work with the XM128/M128 Helmet Sight System (HSS) developed primarily for use with TOW armed AH-1s.
_	the possibility that the authors of these memoranda counseled the use of lethal and unlawful techniques, and therefore face criminal culpability themselves.
_	He tried to return to the contest and he lived in the apartment with Mayte, Raquel and Enrique until he was eliminated as a fifth option chosen by the audience behind the option that gave the possibility that no one was returning to the contest.
_	In a statement to the press, Rovio denied that they were providing any information to the intelligence agencies, but did not exclude the possibility that their advertisers might do so.
_	Mixotrophic dinoflagellates are extremely common in the food web, and "Vitrella"-like organisms may have been the ancestors of such, raising the possibility that further families of Chromerida may eventually be found in the environment.
_	Another factor that loomed over Walker's gubernatorial candidacy was the possibility that former two-term Governor John Kitzhaber might enter the race.
_	The dissenting judges found a high expectation of privacy in cell phones, recognizing the immense data storage and retention capabilities of modern cell phones, the volume of metadata generated by cell phones, and the possibility that a search of a cell phone might access data stored in the cloud, not on the cell phone itself.
_	As with many things involving the Lafittes, including the possibility that they used the structure to plot illegal seizures and the sale of contraband, no documentation exists.
_	In May 2018, researchers at the artificial intelligence department of NVidia realized the possibility that a robot can learn to perform a job simply by observing the person doing the same job.
_	Some historians have accepted the possibility that the legislature intended to name the county seat after Francis Burt, the first Governor of the Nebraska Territory.
_	This research shows the possibility that the rents from oil and gas can be used for social change in Ghana.
_	Choi came under harsh criticism, as the possibility that Choi may have only confessed because he knew his name would be mentioned by the media was raised.
_	Despite occasional malevolent behavior, he always learns from his wrongdoing; while a leading character in the film "Springtime with Roo", he abandons his selfishness after considering the possibility that it will drive all of the other characters away from the forest.
_	In his description of "F. aurea", which was based on plant material collected in Florida, Thomas Nuttall considered the possibility that his plants belonged to the species that Sloane had described, but came to the conclusion that it was a new species.
_	This raises the possibility that the whales use mnemonic devices to help them remember the more complicated songs.
_	It touched down on land, although the possibility that it would touch down in an ocean was also taken into account in its design.
_	The British loss opened the possibility that the British would be able to deploy troops to Central America to better defend the area.
_	Pushing this notion further comes the possibility that bilingualism might remain throughout adulthood and aging in general.
_	This reaction resulted in the sample precipitating with the HF, an action that definitively ruled out the possibility that the unknown substance was a rare earth.
_	Twiss reports the names of some of these players; there is the possibility that some of them were also part of the original group which collaborated on the "Traité".
_	The risk element arises from the possibility that the merger or acquisition will not go ahead as planned; hedge fund managers will use research and analysis to determine if the event will take place.
_	This brings up the possibility that the pen name disassociated her identity from critics to her Union Army sympathies.
_	Puchuldiza has been inspected for the possibility that it may be suitable as a source for geothermal energy.
_	Also observed during the dive was an open torpedo tube door, with an empty torpedo tube behind it, suggesting the possibility that "Lagarto" fired off a torpedo shortly before her sinking.
_	According to Assistant United States Attorney Joseph Facciponti, "the bank has raised the possibility that there is a danger that somebody who knew how to use this program could use it to manipulate markets in unfair ways."
_	There is also the possibility that the ages represent not the length of life of an individual but rather the time span of a dynasty.
_	While it "leav[es] open the possibility that other factors may bear on the question, the statute identifies none."
_	During the years before the Civil War, Governor Perry foresaw the possibility that Florida might secede from the Union, and in 1858 he urged the reestablishment of the state's militia.
_	Jung, in conjunction with the physicist Wolfgang Pauli, explored the possibility that his concepts of archetypes and synchronicity might be related to the "unus mundus" - the archetype being an expression of "unus mundus"; synchronicity, or "meaningful coincidence", being made possible by the fact that both the observer and connected phenomenon ultimately stem from the same source, the "unus mundus".
_	A summary of reviews of supplementation in healthy subjects did not report this problem but left as untested the possibility that individuals with hereditary hemochromatosis might be adversely affected.
_	The conventional PBS process can now be fully interactive, affording the possibility that more crew members get a schedule that fulfills their wishes.
_	However, this period is close to the rotation period of 55 Cancri A, which led to the possibility that the 43-day period was caused by stellar rotation rather than a planet.
_	Reporters without Borders criticized the fact that the state government immediately ruled out the possibility that the murder of Jiménez was related to his work uncovering crime in the region.
_	The describing authors of "Paludititan" considered the possibility that the skeleton was a specimen of "Magyarosaurus dacus", a coeval titanosaurian sauropod sharing the same habitat.
_	He points out the possibility that Anno had "acted out of political ambition", but admits that he may have also acted for the good of the Empire.
_	In a majority opinion by Justice Brennan, the Court held that "Booth v. Maryland" (1987) left open the possibility that the kind of information contained in victim impact statements could be admissible if it "relate[d] directly to the circumstances of the crime."
_	The shift to brigade-level organization provided greater operational flexibility, maneuverability, and tactical initiative, and it reduced the possibility that large army units would be destroyed in setpiece engagements with an aggressor.
_	There is also the possibility that certain individuals will be eligible for pensions, and the law also creates an appeals process for those deemed subject to its penalties.
_	The reality of the possibility that it could impact their neighborhood and their homes is being met with steadfast disapproval.
_	In addition, their small size also raises the possibility that the real shards have been transported from elsewhere by local, strong tidal currents.
_	If one considers the possibility that a positive and a negative pion are virtually related in the sense that they can annihilate and transform into a pair of two neutral pions (or two photons), i.e. a pair of identical particles, we are faced with a more complex situation, which has to be handled within the second quantisation approach.
_	He adopted the summary of this shift given by Lord Justice of Appeal Simon Brown in "R. v. Inner West London Coroner, ex parte Dallaglio" (1994): "[T]he court is no longer concerned strictly with the appearance of bias but rather with establishing the possibility that there was actual although unconscious bias."
_	Although this is theoretically identical to a second currency loan (with settlement in dollars), the borrower may face basis risk: the possibility that a difference arises between the swap market's exchange rate and the exchange rate on the home market.
_	Hope was bolstered by the discovery of a "C. abingdonii" hybrid male in the Volcán Wolf population on northern Isabela, raising the possibility that more undiscovered living Pinta descendants exist.
_	In 2010, parliamentarian Marcos Espinoza announced to the media the possibility that this project would be not included in the 2011 budget.
_	This was due, in part, to the possibility that sensitive electronics within of any 16-inch gun muzzle may be damaged from overpressure.
_	Evidence presented at the inquest included the possibility that she had died after 20:00 on Sunday 6 April 2014.
_	Like the other compounds, it has also been shown to be reactive in many different assays of biological activities, raising the possibility that any drug generated from fisetin would have too many side effects to be useful.
_	Nicotine has been correlated in vitro with increased expression of a gene associated with oral cancer; the researchers say their work "raises the possibility that nicotine could potentially increase the risk of mouth cancer.
_	Rankin had a studio in midtown Manhattan where he produced commercial artwork on commission, so there is the possibility that assistants were involved.
_	Some authors have discussed the possibility that Neanderthal extinction was either precipitated or hastened by violent conflict with "Homo sapiens".
_	Canger recognized the possibility that centuries of population migrations and other grammatical feature diffusions may have combined to obscure the genetic relationships (the branching evolution) among the dialects of Nahuatl.
_	According to "The Times", the financial impact of the fire could reach as high as £1 billion due to a combination of litigation, compensation for deaths and injuries, rehousing and rehabilitation, the cost of demolition and rebuilding and the possibility that other tower blocks may have to be improved or evacuated.
_	That year's election created the possibility that the GOP could reclaim control when Patricia Blevins, the senate's president pro tempore, was narrowly upset by Anthony Delcollo in her suburban Wilmington district, and Bethany Hall-Long was elected lieutenant governor.
_	In the modern research, based on the possibility that the unicorn tapestries were designed for use as a bedroom ensemble, the five large pieces fit the back area of wall, while the other two pieces serve as the coverlet, or overhead canopy.
_	The new Act broadens the definition of hijacking to include any attempt to seize or gain control of an aircraft using "any technological means", which accounts for the possibility that the hijackers may not be physically present on board the aircraft.
_	During this time, he was diagnosed with AIDS (having been diagnosed as HIV positive in 1987), which was not yet publicised and was only known to the rest of the band; however, rumours had been spreading since 1988 about Mercury's health and of the possibility that he had the disease, with speculation about his health being fuelled by a clear physical decline in his appearance, particularly weight loss.
_	There is also the possibility that he received additional training at the Mac Aodhagáin bardic school located at Ballymacegan, Lough Derg, County Tipperary, which was run by noted scholar, Flann Mac Aodhagáin.
_	As there was no evidence of forced entry or a struggle, investigators began to examine the possibility that Yeates may have known her abductor.
_	In March 2011, Holder left open the possibility that the Guantánamo Bay detention camp might remain open beyond President Obama's first term.
_	No overall differences in safety or effectiveness were observed in clinical trials comparing elderly and younger subjects, however the trials could not eliminate the possibility that some older individuals may have a higher level of sensitivity.
_	Porter now had to consider the possibility that his vessels would be trapped.
_	At the end of the novel, Evaine and Joram discuss the possibility that their father may actually be a saint.
_	The description of T-151, identifies the man in the center as Martin Faust and notes the possibility that the still comes from this work.
_	In 2017, the company paid a claim to Disney, who had bought insurance against the possibility that actress Carrie Fisher would die before filming "Star Wars Episode IX".
_	However, the authors did leave open the possibility that "Microraptor" could have parachuted short distances, as between closely spaced tree branches.
_	The fact that Gustav vom Rath was gay suggested the possibility that Ernst vom Rath may have also been gay.
_	Eric Foner (Columbia University), a Pulitzer Prize–winning historian of the period, claimed in a letter to "The New York Times" that "The film grossly exaggerates the possibility that by January 1865 the war might have ended with slavery still intact."
_	Ultimately, the NTSB theorized that Brody was distracted by the gate that had hit the rear of her car and the possibility that it had been dented.
_	Treating the injured tissue with "L. reuteri" immediately after removing the acid almost completely reverses any ill effects, leading to the possibility that "L. reuteri" may be beneficial in the treatment of human colitis patients.
_	Upon the album's release, "Rolling Stone" reported that "it contains a substantial portion of good music" but, regarding the album's predecessor as superior, warned of the possibility that "his posturings will soon seem not merely dull but irrelevant".
_	Conflicting scholarly theories have been proposed about the etymology of the name "", the possibility that the tree is of another species than ash, its connection to the many sacred trees and groves in Germanic paganism and mythology, and the fate of Yggdrasil during the events of Ragnarök.
_	Audrey spends much of her time investigating Lucy's past and the possibility that she is her mother, but she uncovers evidence that Lucy may, in fact, be Audrey herself.
_	After Col. Swanee's death, Trout asked the team (at this point consisting of only Shepherd, Vincent, and Riddle) to investigate the possibility that it was murder.
_	The intended effect was to reverse the burden of proof concerning the life issue, but biologists stated that naming a 'species' at this point is inappropriate, as it may lend credibility to the possibility that life has been detected.
_	A revisionist theory raises the possibility that Esterhazy may have been a double agent working for the French counter-espionage service and that this could help to explain the degree of protection he received.
_	What is more, they said, there was always the possibility that the Burgundies had been mistreated during the long trip from the (French) wineries."
_	Vance receives an anonymous letter alerting him to the possibility that violence will soon be done within a well-known family, and the letter also suggests that something of interest will take place that night at the casino.
_	The Department ordered that the rudders of all Super Electras be modified so as to eliminate the possibility that flutter would cause an in-flight break-up.
_	Further, he raised the possibility that they were produced outside Athens, perhaps in northern Attica or even outside Attica.
_	However, he himself had been initially unaware, which raises the possibility that he was adopted.
_	Davis and Semken could not rule out the possibility that the apatite was introduced after deposition, since the shell of an animal similar to "Bellerophon" in the same sediments had been replaced with apatite.
_	Other Ottoman officials were hesitant to rush into an armed conflict following the disastrous First Balkan War, especially considering the possibility that the Balkan states might attack the Empire should it become belligerent.
_	The Ministry of Finance rejected the possibility that Cyprus would be forced to undergo the sweeping austerity measures that have caused turbulence in Greece, but admitted that there would be "some negative repercussion".
_	He had a lifelong interest in the Vedanta philosophy of Hinduism, which influenced his speculations at the close of "What Is Life?" about the possibility that individual consciousness is only a manifestation of a unitary consciousness pervading the universe.
_	In response to Bill O'Reilly's questions concerning the possibility that the woman might have fabricated the allegations, Sharpton said, "First of all, the authorities have charged there was a crime.
_	The consent form did not include the possibility that a chimpanzee heart may be used, although Hardy stated that he included this in discussions with Rush's stepsister.
_	The book does say that nothing known excludes such travel, but he doesn't completely rule out the possibility that future research may prove it impossible.
_	Finally, the possibility that "torii" are a Japanese invention cannot be discounted.
_	An engineer was quoted as saying that he informed his superiors of the possibility that a tsunami could damage the generators.
_	In March 2010, a news report alleged that a victim of forced labor from North Korea, who had previously fled from a logging camp, was approached by several men in plain clothing, and told to get into a vehicle before he was able to meet with officials from the international community to seek assistance; the article noted the possibility that the victim could be deported to North Korea, where he faced possible torture, imprisonment, and execution for escaping from the logging camp.
_	This presents the possibility that explosive gases could be easily transported with a reduced risk of accidental detonation.
_	The Gemara rejected the possibility that might have referred to the Levites' service (of carrying the sacred vessels), noting that addresses the Levites' service when it says, "And they shall be joined to you and keep the charge of the Tent of Meeting."
_	He accepted the defense's interpretation of the timeline; citing the evidence produced at trialincluding the possibility that Stover did not see Frank because she did not proceed further than the outer officehe wrote: "Therefore, Monteen Stover must have arrived before Mary Phagan, and while Monteen Stover was in the room it hardly seems possible under the evidence, that Mary Phagan was at that time being murdered."
_	As of 2017, the possibility that the ACA may be repealed or replaced has intensified interest in the questions of whether and how health insurance coverage affects health and mortality.
_	Bamber's lawyers argued that the 26 September 1985 letter to Julie Mugford from John Walker, assistant director of public prosecutions, raised the possibility that Mugford had been persuaded to testify in the hope that charges against her would not be pursued.
_	When Dessa confronts Ruth on the subject of her late mammy, Ruth is forced to face the possibility that her mammy, who was enslaved, never really loved her.
_	Tech also calls one of the main characters, Benny, an African-American, a "darkie", "brotha" and refers to him as "dark meat", leading to the possibility that he is a racist.
_	Even when one has established developmental delay and exposure to low levels of nurture, one needs to rule out the possibility that the link between the two is coincidental.
_	Scientists considered the possibility that Springer had been rejected by her pod (although resident orcas had never been known to do this).
_	A few years later, designers were exploring the possibility that physically smaller platters might offer advantages.
_	At the same time, Arthur's repeated use of the past tense in his boasts about his companions' exploits arguably give them an elegiac tone, suggesting the possibility that we should see the Arthur of the poem as a man past his glory years and living in the past with a sadly diminished following.
_	Some, however, are known from such fragmentary remains that the possibility that they are non-avian "reptiles" such as dinosaurs cannot be ruled out at present.
_	This raises the possibility that aerodynamic behaviors could be ancestral to all of Deinonychosauria.
_	The prediction that light represented a transmission of energy in wave form through a "luminiferous ether", and the seeming confirmation of that prediction with Helmholtz student Heinrich Hertz's 1888 detection of electromagnetic radiation, was a major triumph for physical theory and raised the possibility that even more fundamental theories based on the field could soon be developed.
_	Others, while admitting the possibility that the cave could have been associated with monastic activity, claimed that the etched crosses alone cannot confirm the existence of a church, since they may have been made by random pilgrims which was a common phenomenon at the time.
_	Researchers began discussing the possibility that ABCD syndrome was in fact not a syndrome; rather it was a type of another syndrome known as Waardenburg.
_	Another point worth noting is that both Martha and Mrs. Peters express guilt over not having visited Minnie more often— which opens up the possibility that Martha's reading of the evidence is skewed by her own feelings that she should have helped Minnie.
_	In 2013, Michael Maul published research suggesting the possibility that instead, Bach compiled it for performance in Vienna at St. Stephen's Cathedral (which was Roman Catholic) on St. Cecilia's Day in 1749, as a result of his association with Count Johann Adam von Questenberg.
_	Another challenge is the possibility that the patient might mount an immune response against the therapy.
_	Further raising the possibility that cold temperatures could have affected the game was that the winter of 2014 was particularly cold in North America.
_	Unlike deductive arguments, inductive reasoning allows for the possibility that the conclusion is false, even if all of the premises are true.
_	Analysis has focused on the characters' resemblance, demonstrated in shots of overlapping faces in which one face is visible and part of another is seen behind it, suggesting the possibility that the characters are one, and their duality.
_	The process of moving the statue revealed several additional challenges which the Dajnowski will face, including the rust in base that he described as "a big issue because [the original builders] inserted a 1 inch rod in both of his legs and that's why one of the legs is already splitting," and the possibility that Washington's sword is not the original but has been replaced at some point in the past.
_	Cooper notes that in Jonson's 1632 play "The Magnetic Lady", Jonson describes his ideally bad play in terms that correspond well to the plot of "Guy Earl of Warwick", and suggests the possibility that Jonson was, in fact, criticizing his own primitive work.
_	After being alerted to the possibility that there was opposition on the road, Smith ordered some light infantry to move forward while he stayed with the main body of the expedition, thus he was not present at the skirmish in Lexington.
_	The Scott Henderson Inquiry was criticised for being held over too short a time period (one week) and for being prejudiced against the possibility that Evans was innocent.
_	Another aspect of the strife between the two kindreds is the possibility that it coincided with the anti-English campaign waged by Andrew Murray (died 1297) and Alexander Pilche against the embattled Countess of Ross in eastern Ross.
_	He does admit the possibility that an increase in savings might decrease the money interest rate thereby increasing the investment but does think this to be a very strong factor and therefore misses the equilibrating function of the interest rates in the capital market.
_	Inhabitants discarded vases and fragments in the vicinity of the body of water, and many pots were trapped in the lava, especially domestic pieces such as pans, pots, pitchers, dishes, boxes and comales, even if it does not preclude the possibility that at the end of the life of these vessels, they were simply thrown into the water, considered as trash.
_	Fearing the possibility that the peasants might rebel and press into areas surrounding the capital Chengdu while he was attacking Wei in the north, Zhuge Liang decided to pacify the southern tribes first.
_	This raised the possibility that the outbreak was due to a "third party abattoir, Gallfoods in Hungary, just outside the restricted zone".
_	Saint Augustine of Hippo (354 – 430) entertained the possibility that Mary of Bethany and the unnamed sinner from Luke might be the same person, but did not associate Mary Magdalene with either of them.
_	Biographer Weissweiler does not dismiss the possibility that Busch's increasing alcohol dependence hindered self-criticism.
_	It also dropped the insistence on armed takeovers present in his earlier thought, acknowledging the possibility that extreme-right nationalists could gain power through the British electoral process.
_	The ISG stated that while it had, "not found evidence that Saddam possessed WMD stocks in 2003," they acknowledged "the possibility that some weapons existed in Iraq, although not of a militarily significant capability."
_	Though this was unproven, some in government circles were worried about the possibility that a repetition of the Irish rebellion of 1641 was being planned and in any case this was a convenient excuse for proceeding against Plunkett.
_	If there appears to be a similarity between the Gray and Bell drawings, there is also the possibility that Gray may have had knowledge of Bell's experiments.
_	Brooks noted that if Eowa was a Northumbrian puppet, there would be the possibility that Oswald may have made moves to promote Christianity in Mercia at this time, thus accounting for the presence of monks in what was still a pagan kingdom.
_	In the process of reunion, Article 23 of the Basic Law had been repealed, closing off the possibility that any further former parts of Germany might subsequently declare their accession to the Federal Republic; while Article 146 was amended to state explicitly that the territory of the newly unified republic then comprised the entirety of Germany as a whole; "This Basic Law, which since the achievement of the unity and freedom of Germany applies to the entire German people, shall cease to apply on the day on which a constitution freely adopted by the German people takes effect".
_	He also conveyed his own "willingness to consider the possibility that some of the teachings may be specific to a particular cultural and historic context".
_	One dating adviser agreed that love is risky, and wrote that "There is truly only one real danger that we must concern ourselves with and that is closing our hearts to the possibility that love exists."
_	In early May 2007, parents were informed that there was the possibility that the school would cease operations and not re-open for the 2007–2008 school year.
_	And at another point implying the possibility that the sex was in fact real:
_	Kligyte cautions that there are limitations to the framework, such as the possibility that participants will conform to expectations in their reflections.
_	In his study of the play, Scott McMillin entertains the possibility that Shakespeare's contribution might have been part of the original text from the early 1590s, when Shakespeare may have written for the Lord Strange's Men.
_	Taizu, sensing the possibility that the succession process would run into difficulty, forced the Khitan leadership to swear allegiance to Yelü Bei after he was installed as heir apparent.
_	This unusual variability in genes raises the possibility that the DUF805 RNA motif has a more general function than cis regulation.
_	He intended to continue to use the name, but when he registered with the Screen Actors Guild, which requires unique registration names to avoid credit ambiguities (and the possibility that royalty checks would be sent to the wrong actors), he discovered that Michael Fox, a veteran character actor, was already registered under the name.
_	Amlie is concerned about the possibility that Wealthia may seek "assistance" from folk healers in Poverty Pinch, or may travel to Rochester for an "illegal operation."
_	He mulled over the possibility that the Chinese characters were an unwitting form of his universal characteristic.
_	Enodia's very name ("In-the-Road") suggests that she watched over entrances, for it expresses both the possibility that she stood on the main road into a city, keeping an eye on all who entered, and in the road in front of private houses, protecting their inhabitants.
_	Between 1969 and 1991, the average age of the population in the village increased, which points to the possibility that the working-age population largely fled the village.
_	In November 1878 when George Romanes presented his new book refuting theism, "A Candid Examination of Theism" by "Physicus", Darwin read it with "very great interest", but found it unconvincing; the arguments it put forward left open the possibility that God had initially created matter and energy with the potential of evolving to become organised.
_	The book's first section ("Myth?") entertains the possibility that some legendary creatures (like the sirrush, the unicorn or the cyclops) might be based on actual animals (or misinterpretation of animals and/or their remains).
_	Csillik (1960) suggests the possibility that Omar Khayyam could see in Sufism an ally against orthodox religiosity.
_	Initially, authorities termed it a liquefied petroleum gas explosion in a restaurant, but later began investigating the possibility that the explosion may have been a C-4 bomb.
_	With the possibility that the New England League club would be integrated, Bavasi looked for a community with a significant French Canadian population (believing that the ethnic group would be accepting of African Americans) and a racially progressive newspaper.
_	This of course does not exclude the possibility that the polonium that killed Litvinenko was imported by a licensed commercial distributor, but no one—including the Russian government—has proposed that this is likely, particularly in regard to the radiation detected on the British Airways passenger jets travelling between Moscow and London.
_	...after the split with her husband, she was forced to admit the possibility that John married her only to get closer to her father.
_	The Rajk trial had revealed the possibility that the center of the international plot was in Czechoslovakia.
_	Tyson uses the Ship of Imagination to provide a postulate of the warping of spacetime and time dilation as one enters the event horizon of the black hole, and the possibility that these may lead to other points within our universe or others, or even time travel.
_	The name is derived from an academic who first speculated on the possibility that a lake existed in lower Antelope Valley.
_	Nothing more is known of her, except for the possibility that she may have been the prototype in Alice Diehl's first published novel "Garden of Eden" for the mother of a fictional opera singer whose sad fate she prophetically foretells.
_	These infected infants should not come into contact with pregnant women because of the possibility that the woman will transmit the virus to her unborn child.
_	A notice from the Japanese government that was sent to cattle farmers after the nuclear accident made no mention of the possibility that rice straw could be contaminated with radioactive materials from the fallout.
_	However, in February 2015, it was decided that the antenna would not top the tower due to the possibility that it might obstruct flight paths.
_	Schmidt further considered the possibility that it might be the elusive source of the tektites of the Australasian strewnfield (which is only 790,000 years old).
_	Some scholars point to the possibility that Abishag is the female protagonist in the Song of Songs.
_	An example is the possibility that climate change could lead to migration or conflict.
_	When foundresses attempt to establish nests in new sites, there is the possibility that the site is disadvantageous to colony initiation.
_	Seeing his wife's emotional distress, Othello ignores alternative, innocent explanations—like the possibility that she did not love another—and kills her, as his preconceptions biased his observation and, therefore, his judgments.
_	Whilst this source's claim that Edmund was martyred after being captured is not implausible, the fact that he came to regarded as a martyr does not negate the possibility that he was slain in battle (as suggested by the "Anglo-Saxon Chronicle").
_	In addition to stating that the characters were systematically arranged, unlike those at Temiya Cave, and thus represented a script, he further suggested the possibility that these characters were used by people who came to Japan from Eurasia.
_	The build-up to the opening of the championship was dominated by Birr and the possibility that they would become the first club to win three All-Ireland titles in-a-row, and a record-breaking fifth championship title over all.
_	Additionally, a slope affords better drainage, obviating the possibility that the vine might sit in overly moist soil.
_	In 2002 he warned, "Everything so far suggests that Stingers have been exported from Afghanistan to Africa and were used in this attack," referring to an attack against Israeli tourists in Kenya, "We can't rule out the possibility that these rockets have been brought into Europe.
_	Berger's lawyer went on in an attempt to mitigate Berger's actions by claiming that the Cold War bore strong parallels to the Nazi fight against "Jews and Bolsheviks", and the possibility that the US would also have to fight the Soviet Union in the near future.
_	Lovell had deliberately structured the punishment to maximise the possibility that Defoe would remain incarcerated for the rest of his life.
_	The location of the wreckage, and evidence in the wreckage of anchor usage, indicates continued use, raising the possibility that some of the sailors had attempted to re-man the ship and sail her home (or elsewhere), possibly on orders from Crozier.
_	Relying on "United States v. Sullivan", 274 U.S. 259 (1927), the Chief Justice wrote that even with the possibility that compliance under the statute were an incrimination per se, an extension of Fifth Amendment protection would be an "extreme if not extravagant application."
_	The archaeologists Mark Gillings and Joshua Pollard suggested the possibility that Avebury first gained some sort of ceremonial significance during the Late Mesolithic period.
_	This naturally leads to SF plot lines dealing with the possibility that the planet had been inhabited, and if so – that the inhabitants caused its destruction themselves, by war or gross environmental mismanagement.
_	They admitted Dr. York had stayed with them and suggested the possibility that he had run into trouble with Indians.
_	Even so, the court left open the possibility that foreign sales, under the right circumstances, may incorporate an implied license to import and use the product within the United States.
_	An early report attributed the fire origin to a refrigerator, but this cause was rejected by agents from the federal Bureau of Alcohol, Tobacco, Firearms and Explosives, although agents initially left open the possibility that it was started by another electrical appliance or component.
_	In 2003 he made a TV documentary titled "The Strangest Viking" (part of Channel 4's "Secret History" series), in which Shaban explored the possibility that Viking chieftain Ivar the Boneless may have had osteogenesis imperfecta, the same condition he himself has.
_	The allegations made against him generally include suspicions about the extremely rapid increase of his activity in the construction industry in the years 1961–63, hinting at the possibility that in those years he received money from unknown and possibly illegal sources.
_	Quine was very warm to the possibility that formal logic would eventually be applied outside of philosophy and mathematics.
_	Act 2000", which included the possibility that parent members could be co-opted if not enough were elected for the board to continue.
_	Coincidentally, public doubts over the plan centered around whether it could be achieved; the possibility that Emin might not want to leave seems not to have been considered.
_	This foresees the possibility that geographically distinct operations may constitute one workplace.
_	Although Lucheni boasted that he acted alone, because many political refugees found a haven in Switzerland, the possibility that he was part of a plot and that the life of the emperor was also in danger, was considered.
_	Jordan Lancaster leaves open the possibility that the practice was a Christian survival of a pagan ritual intended to protect the locals from unexpected eruptions from Vesuvius.
_	"Quatenus" subscription (the "Book of Concord" is adhered to "insofar as" it is faithful to the Scriptures) implies that the subscriber leaves room for the possibility that there might be a contradiction of the Scriptures in the "Book of Concord" in which case the subscriber would hold to the Scriptures against the "Book of Concord".
_	Although there is no record that "Armida" was ever performed in Mantua, Stevens has mooted the possibility that it may have been staged in Venice in 1628, since Monteverdi's reply to Striggio's February letter indicates that the work was in the hands of Girolamo Mocenigo, a wealthy patron of the arts at whose Venetian palace "Il combattimento" had been performed in 1624.
_	The Van Hetton Creek sighting therefore provides the possibility that more of these very rare beetles might be found elsewhere in Montmorency County.
_	Michael H. Miller at "The New York Observer" wrote: "Both "Fatal Vision" and "A Wilderness of Error" are equally confident in their antithetical theories, but Mr. Morris is less insidious than Mr. McGinniss, at least allowing for the possibility that Stoeckley was simply overly suggestible—as the prosecutors claimed—and that the presence of a woman matching her description near the MacDonald house in the early-morning hours of February 17 was a coincidence, albeit a highly unlikely one."
_	While the three fly away Caroline exclaims "We're all going to die!", to which Mac quite sternly says "Caroline, there's something I've been meaning to tell you", opening the possibility that Mac is not going to die.
_	He withdrew the challenge when faced with the possibility that it could lead to counter-suits against the party.
_	The report mentioned the possibility that the repaired part of the turbine-building added a larger strain on the total structure than expected, and the braces in the roof were damaged by corrosion and sloppy welding.
_	The CIA analysts were broadly skeptical concerning the possibility that some UFO reports may represent extraterrestrial objects or objects of terrestrial (either American or Russian) manufacture, favouring the hypothesis that currently unidentified reports were misidentifications of conventional objects or natural phenomena.
_	In the episode "The Boy with the Answer", Booth is confronted with the possibility that Brennan, claiming she is "tired of dealing with murders and victims and sadness and pain", might leave the Jeffersonian permanently.
_	This made OFCOM change its licensing requirements, as it had required the submissions to include three-year revenue statements, never envisaging the possibility that a local telecom operator could start from zero.
_	Even the possibility that the graphite parts might very quickly break into small pieces could not be ruled out.
_	Among the hypothesized reasons for the fence are the possibility that it is intended to trap mites that live in the same environment, as food for the hatchlings, or to protect the egg and baby spider from ants.
_	If he were voted out, there would be a new election for Speaker, which would allow for the possibility that Democrats and dissenting Republicans would vote in Dick Gephardt as Speaker.
_	These results raise the possibility that chronic exposure to low, subanesthetic concentrations of ketamine, while not affecting cell survival, could still impair neuronal maintenance and development.
_	However, some of his defenders as well as his critics allowed for the possibility that his account was not entirely accurate, stating that the main point was that he had drawn attention to an issue that was of vital importance.
_	Possible explanations for any inaccuracies include the trauma of war as experienced by a young child, the drug use described in his account, and the possibility that Beah was tacitly encouraged by outsiders to compile stories from multiple sources into a singular autobiographical account.
_	However, recent political movements in the U.S. have increased the chances that the minimum wage there will nearly double, which raises the possibility that the U.S. will develop more distinctly under a wage-led demand regime.
_	Additionally, her work identified the possibility that the Keatley Creek community had emerged as a “complex collector socioeconomic strategy”.
_	In early 2004, with Bush expected to face a difficult re-election campaign, political commentators openly discussed the possibility that Cheney might be dropped from the ticket due to his "personal baggage".
_	Extermination of the stock herd there was so profound that some zooarchaeologists reject the possibility that local ancient miners owned and regularly bred them.
_	No date for the proposed referendum was ever set however the expectation was at the time that it would have been held sometime in the first six months of 2006 with the possibility that it could have been held on the same day as the 2006 UK local elections which were scheduled and duly held on 4 May 2006.
_	In 1973 Jackiw and Johnson and Cornwall and Norton studied the possibility that a (non-vectorial) gauge interaction of fermions can break itself; i.e., is strong enough to form a Goldstone boson coupled to the gauge current.
_	In November 2008, Rodolfo de la Guardia García, the No. 2 official in the AFI from 2003–2005, was placed under arrest as investigators looked into the possibility that he leaked information to the Sinaloa Cartel in return for monthly payments.
_	This prompted the United States Geological Survey to investigate the possibility that the Lake San Cristobal dam might fail.
_	He had been appointed from the Federal Court of Appeal, leading to the possibility that his right to be appointed might be called into question.
_	Eggs and early fry are completely unknown, suggesting the possibility that spawning may take place inside the burrow system.
_	This raises the possibility that ultraviolet vision gives birds a channel in which they can privately signal, thereby remaining inconspicuous to predators.
_	The increasingly overt Iranian involvement necessary to stave off a Kurdish defeat—including the presence of Iranian soldiers dressed in Kurdish uniforms, who participated in combat for as long as 10 days at a time, thus raising the possibility that further escalation might lead to "open war" between Iran and Iraq—combined with assurances from Arab leaders including Sadat, King Hussein, and Algeria's Houari Boumédiène that "Saddam Hussein was ready to pull Iraq out of [the] Soviet orbit if Iran would take away the [Kurdish revolt] which was forcing them into the arms of the Soviets"—also helped convince the Shah that an accommodation with Iraq was necessary and desirable.
_	At an unknown date during his reign, there’s the possibility that the Mamikonian family immigrated from Bactria to Armenia.
_	Since she has a full cybernetic body, she is not certain her "ghost" retains any humanity and speculates on the possibility that she is entirely synthetic, with artificially generated memories designed to fool her into thinking she was once human.
_	He discounted the possibility that the Hiroshima bomb was responsible, due to the timing of the events.
_	They concluded that the Christmas and holiday season is "a risk factor for cardiac and noncardiac mortality", stating that there are "multiple explanations for this association, including the possibility that holiday-induced delays in seeking treatment play a role in producing the twin holiday spikes".
_	Lightcurve analysis indicated the possibility that "Sharp" could be orbited by a minor-planet moon nearly every 24 hours.
_	She noted the possibility that polypeptides might cyclize to form closed rings (true) and that these rings might form internal crosslinks through the cyclol reaction (also true, although rare).
_	In "Rebirth", Superboy is confronted with the possibility that he may have accidentally taken a human life and gives up his Superboy identity in guilt.
_	Gruber (1720) had admitted the possibility that a Werkzeug could lose the gift of Inspiration.
_	There is plenty of evidence that rhesus monkeys as well as chimpanzees (Weldon et al., 2013) exhibit the Thatcher effect, raising the possibility that some brain mechanisms involved in processing faces may have evolved in a common ancestor more than 30 million years ago.
_	Peers was a leading supporter of Lord Curzon's attempt to pass the legislation that became the Ancient Monuments Consolidation and Amendment Act 1913, spurred by the possibility that American investors would dismantle Tattershall Castle and remove it piece by piece to the United States.
_	An AAIB inquiry into the accident concluded the most likely cause of the accident was pilot disorientation, although the possibility that the pilot had suffered an epileptic fit could not be completely ruled out.
_	Until these measurements, the possibility that the neutron was a spin 3/2 particle could not have been ruled out.
_	This reduces the possibility that a set of instructions will be acted on by the wrong locomotive engineer:
_	The older a person is when receiving anti-aging treatments for the first time, the larger the possibility that they won't work that well.
_	Instead of the Klan, HUAC concentrated on investigating the possibility that the American Communist Party had infiltrated the Works Progress Administration, including the Federal Theatre Project and the Federal Writers' Project.
_	That building was planned with the possibility that it would be merged into a larger structure.
_	In his summing up, Coroner Baxter raised the possibility that Chapman was murdered deliberately to obtain the uterus, on the basis that an American had made inquiries at a London medical school for the purchase of such organs.
_	D.E.C. Eversley observed that Malthus appeared unaware of the extent of industrialization, and either ignored or discredited the possibility that it could improve living conditions of the poorer classes.
_	Davis argued that a number of factors may account for the negative results of some investigators and decried their unsubstantiated accusations of fraud, noting the variability of formulations, possible errors in the testing performed on the samples he brought back, the possibility that the tetrodotoxin-based mixture may have had ingredients that improved blood–brain barrier transmission of the tetrodotoxin, and the nature of folk medicine with respect to success rates (i.e., that very few successes are required to establish credibility).
_	For example, relevant evidence may be excluded if its tendency to prove or disprove a fact is heavily outweighed by the possibility that the evidence will prejudice or confuse the jury.
_	He appealed the decision, and on March 20, 2007, the Court of Appeal overturned the conviction against Panday, based on the possibility that he may not have received a fair trial.
_	The application notes that in addition to Revolutionary War connections, the shipwreck is important for showing the British state-of-the-art copper sheathing of the ship as well as the possibility that it may reveal problems about corruption in the British shipyards at the time.
_	This has included the possibility that the continuing high rate of growth could lead to revolution, economic slumps, and environmental problems, especially in mainland China.
_	Simply applying the current market multiple ignores the possibility that current multiples may be high or low by historical standards.
_	Authorities did not discard the possibility that the murderer would be driven by some sort of religious fanaticism.
_	The suggestion that the Armenians had also been newcomers to the region, even if 1500 years earlier than the Turks, might rise, within the logic of ethnic nationalism, the possibility that Turkish and Armenian claims to the territory were "morally equal".
_	Speed, in his 1611 work "History of Great Britain", mentions the possibility that Eleanor had a son named Philip, who died young.
_	Japan would recognize him as Emperor of an independent state and conclude defensive and offensive alliances with his new country to defend against the possibility that Chinese Nationalist armies would attack.
_	When the government of Jorge Pacheco Areco outlawed the PS and closed down "El Sol" and the PS headquarters ("La Casa del Pueblo"), Frugoni rejected the possibility that the patrimony could pass to the Movimiento Socialista.
_	He thinks the most likely sources of bangs are malicious use of nanotechnology, nuclear war, and the possibility that the universe is a simulation that will end.
_	According to Robert McCarson, a former spokesman for Fannie Mae, "the value that he [Davis] brought to the relationship was the closeness to Senator McCain and the possibility that Senator McCain was going to run for president again."
_	As a result, the technical communicator must consider the possibility that their audience changes over time.
_	In other words, it admits the possibility that a valid solution for "P" can be further extended to yield other valid solutions.
_	Isabella's exile helped cause the Franco-Prussian War, as Napoleon III could not accept the possibility that a German whose candidacy was supported by Prussia, Prince Leopold of Hohenzollern-Sigmaringen, might replace Isabella, a dynast of the Spanish Bourbons and great-great-granddaughter of the French-born Philip V of Spain.
_	British and German teams also consider the possibility that organic matter, microbes, or even simple plants might co-exist with these inorganic formations, especially if the mechanism includes liquid water and a geothermal energy source.
_	Police are investigating the possibility that Mendenhall is responsible for other murders in the region including:
_	This raised the possibility that Britain might have to fight an aggressor alone.
_	SABR investigated the possibility that the play had set the record for least distance travelled through the air for a home run ball.
_	She also tells him about life in Purgatory, and the possibility that he could be dragged to Hell should he fall in battle and become lost forever.
_	The video documentation was not convincing, and the Israeli military changed some of its earlier statements and conceded the possibility that the object could have indeed been a stretcher, but did not offer the apology Hansen had demanded.
_	Nunn supported expanding federally mandated background checks to include all local sales to prevent the possibility that mentally ill persons would be able to buy a firearm.
_	Not all of the ring material need have been swept up right away: the thickened crust of the Moon's far side suggests the possibility that a second moon about 1,000 km in diameter formed in a Lagrange point of the Moon.
_	In response to the possibility that Stop Rail Now's petition would fail, the City Council had however voted on August 21 to place a proposed amendment to the city charter on the ballot, asking voters to decide the fate of the project.
_	Junger's book raises the possibility that Smith's conviction was founded on circumstantial evidence, and in part on racism, because the prosecution's narrative of Smith's day in Belmont was built on witnesses who remembered seeing Smith chiefly because he was a black man walking in a white neighborhood.
_	Even though the two may despise each other, the audience was allowed insight into the possibility that Kenny and Spenny may still be incomplete without each other."
_	Uncovering stories that lead to the possibility that satanic worship might still be occurring in the small town, lead Taylor to want to go deeper, and risk entering the possible gateway of Satanic worship in the town.
_	By 2012, François Compaoré was "considered the new CDP strongman", and speculation centered on the possibility that he could succeed his brother at the time of the 2015 presidential election.
_	The reasons behind this controversial decision is further complicated by the possibility that he may himself have had Jewish ancestors.
_	He speculates that the absence of these missions in Western literary sources can be explained by how the Byzantines typically viewed political relations with powers of the East, as well as the possibility that they were launched on behalf of frontier officials instead of the central government.
_	R. D. Laing pointed repeatedly to "the possibility that what we call psychosis may be sometimes a natural process of healing (a view for which I claim no priority)".
_	It had raised the possibility that every decision made by a federal court exercising state jurisdiction was invalid.
_	With opinion polls showing that Scotland is more strongly in favour of remaining in the EU than the rest of the UK, the possibility that Scotland could vote to remain within the EU but find itself withdrawn from the EU 'against its will' has led to discussion about the risk to the unity of the United Kingdom if that outcome materialised.
_	Some scholars of Azerbaijani literature and culture, after being exposed to Blair's arguments, continue to express doubts about the possibility that Chamanzaminli is the novel’s author.
_	Concern at the ambitions of the Saddam Hussein regime and at the possibility that Iraq was concealing aspects of its weapons of mass destruction (WMD) program from United Nations inspection teams was common to the United States and all member states of the European Union.
_	The age of death he estimated as being around 25 years although he later suggested the possibility that the body had suffered from Frölich's syndrome which delayed normal skeletal maturation.
_	CFSO's concern is the possibility that the clearance process can be used to circumvent Federal personnel regulations, to bypass equal employment opportunity laws and to punish dissenters and whistle blowers within the agency.
_	However, there is also the possibility that climate change will slow down ocean currents and circulation, which can change the present-day dynamic and send the rain belt to the south.
_	When the fuse kept blowing despite the new parts, and faced with no diagnosis showing anything wrong with the car, the engineers were moved to consider the possibility that the fuse had been tampered with.
_	Tindale entertained the possibility that the Pitjara and Badjiri split up, before the advent of white settlement, as a result of an easterly thrust by other tribes which caused them to develop as independent tribal realities.
_	The legal papers filed in support of UND pointed out that the Florida State Seminoles have not been required to change their name, thus raising the possibility that the decision regarding the UND Fighting Sioux was arbitrary and capricious.
_	The Allies had heard the rumours of Japanese plans for the Indian Ocean and on 27 November 1941, the British Chiefs of Staff discussed the possibility that the Vichy government might cede the whole of Madagascar to Japan, or alternatively permit the Japanese Navy to establish bases on the island.
_	Jesch also allows for the possibility that the term may have meant "black men", in which case the meaning is unclear.
_	The only acceptable strategy is one that eliminates the possibility that Iraq will be able to use or threaten to use weapons of mass destruction.
_	In more recent scholarship, however, the possibility that a text could be both has been shown to be critically viable.
_	At the end of "Tehanu", the child Tehanu addresses Kalessin oldest and wisest of the dragons as "Segoy", raising the possibility that Kalessin is identical with Segoy or is manifestation or incarnation of him.
_	An interview given by King Harald V, and hints in a biography by Jo Benkow, who was the President of the Storting that time, mention the possibility that King Olav suffered great trauma upon learning of the outbreak of the first Gulf War, which began the day of his death.
_	Congressman Chaka Fattah had pledged to use congressional power to ensure that democratic voting is honored in outer space as well as on planet Earth, in response to the possibility that NASA would overrule the voting.
_	A psychic attack by the genocidal Cassandra Nova leaves Beast humiliated, badly beaten (by the controlled body of his friend Beak) and haunted by the possibility that his new form is simply a step in a continuous state of devolution.
_	The word "only" raises the possibility that discrimination may be permissible on the basis of one of the proscribed grounds in combination with some other factor, such as age or state of health.
_	In a private audience with the emperor on the penultimate eve of the tournament, when confronted with the seeming absurdity of the possibility that a novice with a mere two years of experience at the game could systematically defeat players' whose whole lives were devoted to its mastery, the protagonist comes to understand that his proficiency is merely a reflection of his experience with strategic games of all sorts.
_	Still currently only in pilot stage, this promising technology offers the possibility that any agricultural economy might be able to get rid of its requirement to refine oil for transportation fuels.
_	"Funny Side Up" did not have a smooth start: the writers were slow to produce material, and the trustees even considered the possibility that there would be no show.
_	This later notoriety has been much more publicised due to the issues of widespread respiratory illnesses contracted in Java, and the possibility that nasal irrigation may be of assistance.
_	After police examined the possibility that the two were responsible for 17 other cases involving stones being hurled at Israeli vehicles and the prosecution, the prosecution indicted the men for other stone-throwing attacks, one of them who was charged with attempted murder in another case, in which he allegedly threw rocks at a bus to kill passengers.
_	Jones v Lock (1865) 1 Ch App 25 is an English trusts law case, concerning the formality for creating a gift, and the possibility that if the gift were not properly completed with the required legal form, a trust could be found.
_	To guard against the possibility that a respondent who is a heavy smoker might decline to give an accurate response about smoking, the highest level of smoking asked about in the survey instrument might be "two packs a day or more."
_	Maynard Solomon, who has written biographies of both Mozart and Beethoven, does not mention Jahn's tale, and even puts forward the possibility that Mozart might have given Beethoven an audition and then rejected him:
_	Mormons see the tendency to dismiss the possibility that God could call modern prophets as similar to the attitude of those in the Bible who rejected the prophets and/or apostles of their day.
_	Act 1984 defines sexual harassment as "... a person sexually harasses another person (the person harassed ) if: (a) the person makes an unwelcome sexual advance, or an unwelcome request for sexual favours, to the person harassed; or (b) engages in other unwelcome conduct of a sexual nature in relation to the person harassed; in circumstances in which a reasonable person, having regard to all the circumstances, would have anticipated the possibility that the person harassed would be offended, humiliated or intimidated."
_	Exploration continues within the West Coast region for further economic mineral deposits, and due to the complexity of the geology, there is always the possibility that new mines will open: the Henty Gold Mine is a good example as it commenced operation in the 1990s.
_	This suggests the possibility that the ancestors of the Cassii were from Hirpinum, or had some other connection with Viscellium.
_	In 1924, Kemp Malone was the first to suggest the possibility that Lucius Artorius Castus was the inspiration for the figure of Arthur in medieval European literature.
_	Jeffrey Kaplan, an academic specialist in the far right, has also suggested that Myatt and Long are separate people, while the religious studies scholar Connell R. Monette posited the possibility that "Anton Long" was not a singular individual but rather a pseudonym used by several different people.
_	A more thorough analysis will consider the false positive rate of the test and the possibility that a less likely diagnosis might have more serious consequences.
_	They found "Baryonyx" to be unlike any other theropod group (and considered the possibility that it was a thecodont, due to apparently primitive features), but noted that the articulation of the maxilla and premaxilla was similar to that in "Dilophosaurus".
_	To modern historians, these details confirm the truth of the Phoenicians' report and even open the possibility that the Phoenicians knew about the spherical model.
_	The mechanism uses Hipparchus's theory for the motion of the moon, which suggests the possibility that he may have designed it or at least worked on it.
_	This raises the possibility that someone in the vicinity has access to President Jerrison's memories, some of which are extremely secret; these include plans for a major, morally questionable, anti-terrorist action codenamed Counter Punch.
_	In sum, having regard to the decision not to prevent the suspects from travelling into Gibraltar, to the failure of the authorities to make sufficient allowances for the possibility that their intelligence assessments might, in some respects at least, be erroneous and to the automatic recourse to lethal force when the soldiers opened fire, the Court is not persuaded that the killing of the three terrorists constituted the use of force which was no more than absolutely necessary in defence of persons from unlawful violence within the meaning of Article 2(2)(a) of the Convention
_	"Glottolog" (2013), for example, a publication of the Max Planck Institute in Germany, does not recognise the unity of the Nilo-Saharan family or even of the Eastern Sudanic branch; Georgiy Starostin (2016) likewise does not accept a relationship between the branches of Nilo-Saharan, though he leaves open the possibility that some of them may prove to be related to each other once the necessary reconstructive work is done.
_	Originally the game was to be more open world based, with the possibility that each NPC could turn into a Thing at any moment completely randomized.
_	While these lower levels have not yet been excavated, the possibility that they date back to the Early Bronze Age was not ruled out by the archaeologists.
_	The bill cited lack of progress towards stabilizing Iraq, the possibility that a draft would be required to sustain sufficient troop numbers, Iraqi disapproval of US forces and approval of attacks on the soldiers, and the increasing costs of the war.
_	Also posing a difficulty to stratigraphical analysis is the possibility that the time of an object's creation and final deposit can vary greatly.
_	As such, Justice Brennan demonstrates his unwillingness to foreclose on the possibility that future circumstances might require similar limitations on technology in relation to privacy law as the Court has imposed on Fourth Amendment law.
_	While mean equating is attractive because of its simplicity, it lacks flexibility, namely accounting for the possibility that the standard deviations of the forms differ.
_	This may be the case but evidence for the large scale if not total submergence of continental crust in the New Zealand and New Caledonian region in the Oligocene, indicates the possibility that weta have arrived in these locations at least, since re-emergence of land.
_	It is significantly larger than the living callitrichines, and work by Rosenberger has largely eliminated the possibility that these taxa share a close phylogenetic relationship.
_	David De Meza and David C. Webb argued the possibility that adverse selection could lead to the flip side of what Stiglitz and Weiss considered, namely over-investment.
_	Elijah offers the unconditional love Klaus craves, while Klaus represents the possibility that, if Klaus can be saved, so can Elijah, while offering a fertile ground for Elijah's caretaker tendencies.
_	It allowed for the possibility that a bishop could be wrong about a matter of religious truth, while a lowly priest could be right.
_	The NTSB considered the possibility that the explosive residue was due to contamination from the aircraft's use in 1991 transporting troops during the Gulf War or its use in a dog-training explosive detection exercise about one month before the accident.
_	Attempting to capitalize on the possibility that the text of the United States Code can differ from the "United States Statutes at Large", Bancroft-Whitney for many years published a series of volumes known as United States Code Service (USCS), which used the actual text of the "United States Statutes at Large".
_	Police explored the possibility that the killer lived in neighbouring Delhi, and involved the Delhi Police in the investigation.
_	And I think when we're in Europe, we realized how close people were to becoming to understand that, if the Russians or the Americans decided that they were actually going to set something off, they would be faced with the possibility that they may have nuclear warheads detonated in their backyard, or in their laundry.
_	Meanwhile, large numbers of refugees continued to move south, causing the British and Australians further concern given the possibility that they might be used by the Chinese to cover the infiltration of their positions.
_	This gives rise to the possibility that "constitutional law" can be unconstitutional.
_	Civil law jurisdictions - in very general terms - tend to regulate the content of the insurance agreement more closely, and more in the favour of the insured, than in common law jurisdictions, where the insurer is rather better protected from the possibility that the risk for which it has accepted a premium may be greater than that for which it had bargained.
_	Jung's resignation was over allegations that, whilst he was Defence Minister, he intentionally downplayed the possibility that civilians had been killed in the airstrike.
_	After admitting to Justin that he lied about his blood type and therefore the possibility that he could be Sarah's father he decides to leave.
_	Joseph Rotblat has suggested that an oath would help make new scientists aware of their social and moral responsibilities; opponents, however, have pointed to the "very serious risks for the scientific community" posed by an oath, particularly the possibility that it might be used to shut down certain avenues of research, such as stem cells.
_	Frimley Park Hospital consultants took into consideration the possibility that Dux may have suffered permanent disability.
_	Bauer had gone rogue after finding out the possibility that a recorded audio incriminating three Middle East countries in the nuclear explosion in American soil was faked.
_	This was in response to an FBI investigation regarding the possibility that they were stolen from the New York Public Library sometime prior to 1986.
_	He quickly eliminated the possibility that the fourth angle is obtuse, as had Saccheri and Khayyam, and then proceeded to prove many theorems under the assumption of an acute angle.
_	There is the possibility that an attorney may not see the merit in the error assigned by his or her client, and a client may have viable grounds for the client's claim.
_	The autopsy's finding of intense vascular congestion in the lungs also suggests the possibility that a rapidly progressive pneumonia may have been developing.
_	However, an article in the "George Washington Law Review" which advocates for the use of the "National Muffler" standard in reviewing retroactive tax regulations () states that "National Muffler" may not have been entirely overruled, arguing that the Court implied that "Chevron" test is only to be used in "complex questions of statutory interpretation" and that the Court left open the possibility that a future scenario may warrant the use of the "National Muffler" test instead of the "Chevron" test.
_	Also is the possibility that "Mora" was an anagram of "Amor".
_	He is taken away, with the possibility that he will be euthanised, but Gus and Deano Wicks (Matt Di Angelo) launch a campaign to save him, under the moniker "Walford One Owed Freedom" (WOOF).
_	[…] in many interpretations, the fraternal killing is the criminal moment, and in more recent years scholars have argued explicitly against the possibility that Shechem rapes Dinah.
_	His failed attempt to locate a "registered" papal copy of the "Libellus" presumably suggested to Boniface the possibility that the document was spurious and had in fact not been authored by Pope Gregory I.
_	What Locke is expressing here is not only the call for black artists to overcome racial prejudices via positive artistic representations of blacks, but that the actual African American individual like Thrash portrayed the lives of fellow blacks, and had the power to propagate this idea of the New Negro, as Locke explains, “There is the possibility that the sensitive artistic mind of the American Negro, stimulated by a cultural pride and interest, will receive…a profound and galvanizing influence,” (Locke, “Bridging Identities” 36).
_	A number of observations point to the possibility that chemotaxis and thermotaxis also occur at lower parts of the female genital tract.
_	During the negotiations over the clause "take a part in hostilities" the word "direct" was added to it, opening up the possibility that child volunteers could be involved indirectly in hostilities, such as by gathering and transmitting military information, helping in the transportation of arms and munitions, provision of supplies, etc.
_	Furthermore, entrance polls are based upon a future event, meaning there is always the possibility that a voter may change his or her mind between being asked questions for an entrance poll and then actually voting.
_	The interest in the discovery stems from the possibility that it explains part of the antihypertensive effect of beta blockers.
_	His parentage is unknown, but the Elisabet Ney Museum relates the possibility that he was the son of Isabella Davidson (or Montgomery) and a prominent Scottish jurist, Duncan McNeill, 1st Baron Colonsay.
_	Since his father, Raúl Castro, came to power, Alejandro has become personal assistant to the president and been involved in various political events and official visits, which has increased speculation about the possibility that he is Castro's successor as head of the Cuban regime.
_	The lawsuit alleged that the combination of drugs administered left open the possibility that an individual being executed could regain consciousness prior to death, leaving him paralyzed but in intense pain prior to death, and thus in violation of the eighth amendment injunction preventing "cruel or unusual punishment."
_	There is still the possibility that a new race of pathogen will develop to which all lines are susceptible, however.
_	Nonetheless, Bremermann did not foreclose the possibility that a computer would someday be able to solve chess.
_	There have been recent studies looking into the possibility that an abnormality with one's chromosomes could be the trigger for serial killers.
_	However Lewis also allows for the possibility that these innovations should be credited to Daniel Hoechstetter.
_	Since the late 1950s, the US Air Force had faced the possibility that the nuclear deterrence role would be handed to the US Navy's Polaris missile fleet.
_	These performances prompted connections to consider retiring the horse, with the possibility that age and racing had caught up with him.
_	However, German Turkologist Gerhard Doerfer assessed the derivation from Iranian as superficially attractive but quite uncertain, and pointed out the possibility that the word may be genuinely Turkic.
_	As noted in the first quote above, the procuratorship was a "wealthy" one, leading to the possibility that the job involved tax collection.
_	The implications of such observations demonstrate the possibility that metamorphic belts could have formed in different sectors of the same subduction margin and became juxtaposed afterwards.
_	Research has shown unexpected genetic diversity in "M. mutica", raising the possibility that additional subspecies might exist.
_	There is also the possibility that Aristotle may have borrowed his use of the word "analysis" from his teacher Plato.
_	In contrast, the British Museum does acknowledge the possibility that the relief depicts either Lilith or Ishtar, but prefers a third identification: Ishtar's antagonist and sister Ereshkigal, the goddess of the underworld.
_	However the book also allowed the possibility that the dinosaur that attacks the camp was a "Megalosaurus" or a juvenile "Allosaurus", which would be a much closer size comparison.
_	The increased speed of the rocket as opposed to those then in service – intended to reach or exceed Mach 3 – was intended to remove the possibility that a high-speed aircraft might overtake its own weapons after launch, as well as improving the rocket's accuracy through providing a flatter trajectory, and reduction in its flight time.
_	This presented the possibility that the two would be separated at some point, or not properly recombined when they were transmitted back to the Mac.
_	On 14 October 2008, the Czech Security Forces Archive ruled out the possibility that the document could be a fake, but refused to make any interpretation about it.
_	In discussing his opinion that every mathematical problem should have a solution, Hilbert allows for the possibility that the solution could be a proof that the original problem is impossible.
_	Speculation over the reason for the raid has included the possibility that it was the unintended consequence of equipment used to jam radio navigation used by the bombers.
_	Gideon gets her home while Lesley, Raphael, and Gwyneth go back to Gideon's apartment to come up with a plan for finding out how to keep the circle from being closed on the second chronograph, and the possibility that the Count is still living in the present, disguised as someone else.
_	The purpose of having this three-branched nuclear capability is to significantly reduce the possibility that an enemy could destroy all of a nation's nuclear forces in a first-strike attack.
_	Critics of payday lending cite the possibility that transactions with in the payday market may reflect a market failure that is due to asymmetric information or the borrowers' cognitive biases or limitations.
_	However, there was always the possibility that this could be circumvented and the Beaufort line eventually produced King Henry VII and the Tudor dynasty.
_	Although the NTSB had already reached the conclusion that a missile strike did not cause the structural failure of the airplane, the possibility that a missile could have exploded close enough to TWA 800 for a missile fragment to have entered the CWT and ignited the fuel/air vapor, yet far enough away not to have left any damage characteristic of a missile strike, was considered.
_	It expressed unhappiness over pay that was months in arrears, and concern over the possibility that the half pay pension would not be forthcoming.
_	In a 2013 interview, Ruckelshaus noted the possibility that the original caller was a hoax.
_	There exists the possibility that the operator may forget to close a valve located upstream of the filling hose, which is a crucial part of the procedure; if overlooked, this could result in adverse consequences, of greater effect to the operator in control.
_	That is, the risk arises not from the completion of the burglary, but from the possibility that an innocent person might appear while the crime is in progress".
_	This “does not foreclose the possibility that a regulation might be so arbitrary or irrational as to violate due process.
_	Following its announcement, the test generated great controversy, centering on two issues: its potential value in developing a nuclear "bunker buster" warhead, and the possibility that the mushroom cloud generated by the explosion could carry large amounts of radioactive dust deposited at the Test Site over years of nuclear testing.
_	Entrapment usually consisted of an undercover officer who found a man in a bar or public park, engaged him in conversation; if the conversation headed toward the possibility that they might leave together—or the officer bought the man a drink—he was arrested for solicitation.
_	Connie James as a likely suspect after dismissing the possibility that Richard Dolby could have betrayed the operation.
_	It was while in high school that Jones realized the possibility that librarianship would be a part of her future.
_	This offers strong evidence that natural selection has acted on this gene as opposed to the possibility that the gene has spread through genetic drift.
_	As such, Terrans will find themselves unable to ignore the possibility that super intelligent machines might one day cause the destruction of the human race—being very immensely intelligent and so cosmically inclined, these artilect machines may have no more moral or ethical difficulty in exterminating humanity than humans do in using medicines to cure diseases.
_	The Court was also concerned about the possibility that these men would have been humiliated and even tortured in their own country, and claimed that its decision is based on respect for human rights.
_	However, the court also raised the possibility that sections 71 and 73 of the Constitution were "words of futurity", and described illusory rights, because the Court did not physically exist in 1901.
_	Finnish authorities dismissed the possibility that the "Arctic Sea" was bearing a cargo of nuclear material.
_	Olympio held out the possibility that the UFC would participate; Compaoré anticipated that the UFC would present conditions for its participation.
_	In addition, there is always the possibility that naturally-derived materials may cause an immune response or contain microbes.
_	Oxygen only became available in earth's environment after the development of chlorophyll-based photosynthesis, and given that retinal organisms also require oxygen to synthesize critical substances for life, the possibility that retinal life-forms could have preceded chlorophyll-based ones as the most common photosynthetic organisms is unlikely.
_	Recognizing the possibility that stones can be captured using these techniques is an important step forward.
_	In October 1945, Orwell wrote to Frederic Warburg expressing interest in pursuing the possibility that the political cartoonist David Low might illustrate "Animal Farm".
_	The Court resolutely rejected the possibility that the party autonomy could take precedence over the abovementioned goals of certainty and mutual trust, stating that "the court second seised is never in a better position than the court first seised to determine whether the latter has jurisdiction".
_	Targ and Puthoff write about their pilot experiments, "We couldn't overlook the possibility that perhaps Ingo knew the geographical features of the earth and their approximate latitude and longitude.
_	Tor.com's Dexter Palmer considered the possibility that the film is a "misunderstood art film", highlighting its color scheme that is a "pleasure" and the fact it does not try to seem real.
_	According to the scientific article, this raises the possibility that Ivins was not the perpetrator or did not act alone.
_	Besides the possibility that the bite could squirt and eject liquid palm sugar, a freshly boiled one — which usually contains hot liquid palm sugar, should be consumed carefully or best to be left to cool down for some moment.
_	However, some studies suggest the possibility that health impacts from UHIs are disproportionate because the impacts can be unevenly distributed based on a variety of factors (e.g. age, ethnicity and socioeconomic status).
_	In 2014 FIDE amended the rules to eliminate the possibility that a game could continue without end.
_	However, the movement of Mario is based on the mechanics and physics of the Sonic character from "Sonic the Hedgehog 2", raising the possibility that it contains coding information from this game as well.
_	The review felt some of the online foibles left open the possibility that the production might get overshadowed by future ventures that leverage the electronic possibilities more fully.
_	The position of the burst's afterglow was measurably offset from the centroid of the host galaxy, effectively ruling out the possibility that the burst originated in an active galactic nucleus.
_	Superfluid vacuum theory brings into question the possibility that a relativistic object possessing both of these properties exists in nature.
_	Architectural historian K. A. C. Creswell, referring to a testimony by Arculf, a Gallic monk, during his pilgrimage to Palestine in 679–82, notes the possibility that the second caliph of the Rashidun Caliphate, Umar ibn al-Khattab, erected a primitive quadrangular building for a capacity of 3,000 worshipers somewhere on the Haram ash-Sharif.
_	Newly identified documents show the possibility that it was the location where John Smith grabbed Opechancanough by the hair and put a pistol to his head in order to escape an ambush.
_	Cryer presents the possibility that a misunderstanding allowed Nemias Greco to be assumed to refer to the Yorkshire saint and scholar.
_	It is now proposed that the absence of any mention of Ecbatana in Assyrian sources can be explained by the possibility that Assyria never became involved as far east as the Alvand mountains, but only in the western Zagros.
_	A recent study of the refugia used by rayaditos when the Patagonian Ice Sheet covered most of the species’ existing range shows that Mocha Island was the most prominent glacial refuge and suggests the possibility that the species was present in areas to the east of the ice sheet in Argentine Patagonia, creating considerable gene flow when most of the ice sheet melted.
_	We are also concerned about the possibility that the use of military force, as called for in paragraph 4 of today's resolution, could change that narrative in ways that may have serious repercussions for the situation in Libya and beyond."
_	In 2016, a BBC Radio 4 documentary explored the possibility that the character of James Bond was created by 20th Century author and mentor to Fleming, Phyllis Bottome in her 1946 novel, "The Lifeline".
_	Nevertheless, Thomas H. Huxley in 1904 saw among Frisians the presence of what he believed to be Neanderthaloid skeletal and cranial characteristics as an evolutionary development from Neanderthal rather than as a result of interbreeding, saying that "the blond long-heads may exhibit one of the lines of evolution of the men of the Neanderthaloid type," yet he raised the possibility that the Frisians alternatively "may be the result of the admixture of the blond long-heads with Neanderthal men," thus separating "blond" from "Neanderthaloid."
_	His virtuosic performance coupled with his dedicated following presented the possibility that jazz sets could be at the top of the bill.
_	The United States military played a key role in perpetuating the status quo, not wanting to risk the possibility that a change in status could affect their presence in the Caribbean.
_	That is why we are having a new division, the 14th Division, to be built in Basrah, especially with the possibility that the British might be leaving us in time."
_	Brooks cited Bede's statement implying that Penda's fortunes were mixed during his 22 years in power and noted the possibility that Penda's fortunes were low at this time.
_	DNA testing eliminated the possibility that the unidentified body could be Brandi Wells.
_	The study explores the possibility that singing could help put patients in the best mental and physical shape to receive the treatment they need, by reducing stress hormones, and increasing quantities of cytokines- proteins of the immune system that can increase the body's ability to fight disease.
_	The comic hints at the possibility that the Mariner's mutation may not be caused by evolution but by genetic engineering and that his origins may be linked to those of the "Sea Eater", the sea monster seen during the fishing scene in the film.
_	Additionally, considerations about long-term storage of electronic health records are complicated by the possibility that the records might one day be used longitudinally and integrated across sites of care.
_	The shift to brigade-level organization provided greater operational flexibility, maneuverability, tactical initiative and reduced the possibility that large army units would be destroyed in set piece engagements with an aggressor.
_	The BBC also broadcast special reports, interviews and birthday greetings to the missing journalist on BBC radio and television in the possibility that Johnston had access to either.
_	James K. Polk was faced with the possibility that a Tyler ticket might shift votes away from the Democrats and provide Clay with the margin of victory in a close race.
_	Phallic earthenwares were found in the Pinagbayanan sites which suggest the possibility that they were used as a symbol of fertility.
_	Amy tries to cope with the possibility that she must return to a normal life.
_	If formula_60 knows nothing that rules out the possibility that formula_63 and knows nothing that rules the possibility that formula_66, it does not follow that formula_60 knows nothing which rules out the hypothesis that formula_68.
_	The remains visible today indicate the possibility that the Externsteine were intended as a destination for pilgrims unable to travel to Jerusalem.
_	A month later, the almost totally unexpected discovery of nuclear fission by Hahn, Meitner, and Otto Frisch put an end to the possibility that Fermi had discovered element 93 because most of the unknown half-lives that had been observed by Fermi's team were rapidly identified as fission products.
_	Mars's atmosphere is thought to have changed over the course of the planet's lifetime, with evidence suggesting the possibility that Mars had large oceans a few billion years ago.
_	However, the possibility that these species come from different points in time cannot be excluded, due to a lack of study on the stratigraphy and age of the Nanxiong Formation.
_	The hypothesis has been supported in several of Sims' studies, presenting the possibility that optimal searching movements approximated by Lévy patterns have evolved in organisms.
_	One of the effects of the appointment of receivers and managers is the possibility that KL Infra will not be receiving any compensation for KL Monorail should the takeover by SPN go through.
_	The first comments of town officials on the find of 57.7 microsieverts per hour were that there could not be a link with the Fukushima disaster, but after the find of this large amount of cesium, officials of the Science Ministry could not deny the possibility that the cause could be found at the Fukushima-site.
_	In reference specifically to Haplogroup K, they suggested that although it is common throughout western Eurasia, "the observed global pattern of distribution renders very unlikely the possibility that the four aforementioned founder lineages entered the Ashkenazi mtDNA pool via gene flow from a European host population".
_	In their presidential contest, President George W. Bush and Senator John Kerry both agreed that the most serious danger facing the United States is the possibility that terrorists could obtain a nuclear bomb.
_	At the advice of the imperial scholars Li Song and Lü Qi (呂琦), Li Congke considered entering an alliance with the Khitan to ward off the possibility that Shi would seek aid from Khitan.
_	The CIO leadership, alarmed by the possibility that sectarian infighting might destroy the UAW, forced Martin to reinstate the Executive Board members.
_	Alain Demurger, in "Jacques de Molay", mentions the possibility that the Mongols may have occupied Jerusalem, quoting an Armenian tradition describing that Hethoum celebrated mass in Jerusalem in January 1300.
_	Authorities in Michigan were investigating the possibility that serial killer John Wayne Gacy could have been the Oakland County Child Killer.
_	Endorsement from the French, with their military headquarters in Mainz, was taken for granted: it is not clear what thought was given to the possibility that commanders of France's junior partner in the occupation might take a less benign view of separatist activities just across the border from Belgium's Eupen enclave, west of Aachen, only recently incorporated into Belgium under the terms of the Versailles settlement.
_	Consequently, they considered the possibility that the "Kingdom of Denmark in respect of the Faroes" could join the EFTA, though the Danish Government has stated that this mechanism would not allow the Faroes to become a separate member of the EEA because Denmark was already a party to the EEA Agreement.
_	However, the possibility that the shared presence of these signature proteins in these archaeal lineages is due to lateral gene transfer cannot be excluded.
_	The work became a best-seller in Italy for the next 100 years, and this entry in the catalogue raises the possibility that those very copies, purchased in February 1765, were the precipitating factor in its popularity there.
_	Tests showed no signalling equipment faults and the report was able to dismiss the possibility that the signalman had only changed the route after the Perth train had passed the caution signal.
_	Tony Schriner, a developer on the Internet Explorer team, explained that the information bar was introduced to reduce the possibility that the user might mis-click and allow the installation of software they did not intend, as well as to simply reduce the number of pop-ups displayed to the user.
_	Potterley and his wife both remain disturbed by the death of their baby daughter in a house fire many years earlier, and there is the suggestion that he is subconsciously trying to exonerate the Carthaginians of child sacrifice as a way of exonerating himself of the possibility that "he" accidentally started the fire which killed his daughter.
_	At the same time, it does not deny the possibility that those not visibly members of the Church may attain salvation as well.
_	The ICMJE action was probably the most important motivator for trial registration, as investigators wanted to reserve the possibility that they could publish their results in prestigious journals, should they want to.
_	The authorities noted that there had been no forced disappearances in the area in the previous days, and so did not discount the possibility that those killed were US-bound migrants.
_	The authorities have also not discarded the possibility that the massacre was the result of an "internal adjustment" between the Mexican criminal organizations.
_	The Bhagavata Purana's references to the South Indian Alvar saints, along with its emphasis on "bhakti", have led many scholars to give it South Indian origins, though some scholars question whether this evidence excludes the possibility that "bhakti" movement had parallel developments in other parts of India.
_	This caused a heightened security level in Belgium and led to the possibility that the race would be cancelled.
_	Baring was aware of the possibility that the people in Mediterranean countries would regard Germans as economic policemen, predicting that the currency bloc would end up with blackmailing its member countries.
_	Gao, who had also drawn Empress Dugu's ire for having a favorite concubine, thereafter came under suspicion by Emperor Wen and Empress Dugu of being overly supportive of Yang Yong, as he rejected outright the possibility that Yang Yong should be displaced by Yang Guang.
_	The passing on defence is inconsistent with restitution law, it confuses compensation matters, and is not concerned with the possibility that the claimant may receive a windfall.
_	The plot was based on the possibility that the real Captain Kidd was misjudged in an unfair trial.
_	Subsequent modelling of the universe explored the possibility that the cosmological constant, introduced by Einstein in his 1917 paper, may result in an expanding universe, depending on its value.
_	Elliot Katz, the president of a group called In Defense of Animals, brought with him a cloth banner, approximately 4 by 3 ft, that read "Please Keep Animal Torture Out of Our National Parks," to voice opposition to the possibility that the Letterman Army Hospital might be used for experiments on animals.
_	"Arming America" said things, and created a system of thought so comfortable for the vast majority of historians, that they didn’t even pause to consider the possibility that something wasn’t right."
_	Page Fortna concludes that internationally-led peacekeeping operations significantly reduces the possibility that a host country will relapse into civil war.
_	Sisera and priests of Baal arrive to counsel the Israelites not to attack but Deborah and Barak reject the possibility that the God of Israel will not conquer.
_	However, while we desire an end to conflict, if we want people to be free we must always allow for the possibility that conflict may appear and to provide an arena where differences can be confronted.
_	This theory was supported by Miloš Milojević, and Relja Novaković included the possibility that they were relatives in his work.
_	The media also questioned whether Yuan was indeed the culprit, and why his brother and cousin also needed to be put to death, raising the possibility that their punishments were influenced by Liu Han and his connection with Zhou Yongkang.
_	With each new layer of organisms, a bit more hierarchy to the Chtorran "societal" structure is revealed, allowing the possibility that all these organisms will transform the Earth in support of some worse, higher form of Chtorran life.
_	London's newspaper "The Sunday Times" has defined it as "an on-the-record statement, usually made by a politician, repudiating a journalist's story, but in such a way as to leave open the possibility that it is actually true".
_	The direct involvement of the Russian troops on Ukrainian territory began in August 2014, at a time when Ukrainian military successes created the possibility that the pro-Russian rebels would collapse.
_	Still, Allied intelligence could not entirely discount the possibility that remnants of the German Army would attempt a suicidal last stand in the Alps.
_	In his earlier science fiction novel "Lest Darkness Fall" (1939), the main character considers the possibility that instead of being thrown back in time he has found himself in a Rome that Benito Mussolini has forced to imitate the 6th century, but dismisses the idea as impractical.
_	This leaves open the possibility that there may be solutions that work in specific cases, where the oscillations of the integrand have a structure that can be exploited to reduce the numerical errors.
_	She left unexpectedly when contract negotiations for the fifth and final season – aggravated by the possibility that there would not be one – broke down.
_	The festival was put into further disarray in the evening with the possibility that Blur would pull out at the last minute due to guitarist, Graham Coxon, being apparently ill in hospital with food poisoning.
_	In the event that some portion of the nucleus did survive, the eccentricity and inclination of Comet Lovejoy's orbit avoids significant perturbation from planets, which leaves the possibility that the comet may return for another perihelion.
_	Also, in anticipation of the possibility that his rights of government in the colony might be stripped of by the English Parliament, a more democratic governmental structure might provide the Quakers in the colony with a shelter from an arbitrary royal governor.
_	He may have also been concerned about the possibility that he had distant Jewish ancestry.
_	He raises the possibility that the court may have overlooked the distinction between the two categories and recommends the introduction of a different word, namely "residual terms," for provisions which the law adds in the absence of agreement by the parties.
_	This ensures the taxes will be paid first and will be paid on time, rather than risk the possibility that the tax-payer might default at the time when tax falls due in arrears.
_	The latter station opened up the possibility that the neighbouring municipality of Grünwald, which from 1910 had an interurban tram line of the Munich Tramway, could have its own railway connection.
_	On 21 November 1831, Gran Colombia dissolved into Quito (Ecuador), Venezuela, and New Granada (present-day Colombia), New Granada used "state" in its formal name ("Estado de la Nueva Granada"), anticipating the possibility that the three states might still form a confederation.
_	There has been renewed interest in the 21st century with the possibility that this theory may be finite.
_	Haughton also considered the possibility that "Macroscelesaurus" was a therocephalian therapsid, because it shared more features in common with "Ictidosuchus" than any other therapsid.
_	The Husband is completely unfazed and uninterested and almost leaves, until the Wife presents him with the possibility that the baby may not be his.
_	The initial ground rules acknowledged the possibility that such an experiment could end up going down darker paths, and they specifically ruled out Ong's Hat being used for cult-like activity.
_	Typical assumptions in consumer choice theory rule out the possibility that anyone can be Dutch-booked.
_	He was most likely a clerk in service to one of the King's justices, but there is also the possibility that he worked for the clerk of Chancery.
_	There is the possibility that orbit could become inaccessible for generations due to exponentially increasing space debris caused by spalling of satellites and vehicles (Kessler syndrome).
_	The court concluded by addressing "the possibility that discrimination in hiring, for example on the basis of race, might be cloaked as religious practice to escape legal sanction".
_	Planco informed members at that time that the club was about $4 million in debt, and raised the possibility that their clubhouse may have to be sold; some estimates put the value of the property at more than $14 million.
_	The taxonomy of this species is uncertain, with some dubious subspecies, but also the possibility that what is usually treated as the white-throated spadebill consists of more than one species.
_	Paso accepted his first point, but argued that the situation in Europe and the possibility that Napoleon's forces could conquer the American colonies demanded an urgent resolution.
_	Given the unpredictability of rainfall, a family probably planted small fields – as did other Southwestern peoples – in several different micro-environments with the objective of maximizing the possibility that some of their fields would be productive.
_	Some scholars favour Roger's identification or at least the possibility that her name was Eadgyth/Edith.
_	"It is especially ill-suited to constitutional torts charging retaliation for the exercise of First Amendment rights" since it ensures that an employee who speaks out on a matter of public concern will have to consider the possibility that his or her employer will find some plausible reasons for taking action against him apart from his protected speech or other activity.
_	Finally, saying that "certain wrongs affect more than a single right", the Court left open the possibility that the Fourteenth Amendment's protections against deprivation of property without due process of law may also be implicated.
_	The equation enables him to finish his book, but he is forced to confront the possibility that he not living in a clockwork universe after all.
_	Conceivably, Olga was initially either open to the possibility that Anderson was Anastasia or unable to make up her mind.
_	Beyond this strong statement (not ontologically neutral itself), it is probably important to keep in mind the possibility that epistemology and ontology sometimes need to be distinguished.
_	The requirement for ground connections at both cable ends creates the possibility that a ground loop may result if one of the networked chassis is at different instantaneous electrical potential with respect to its mate.
_	The career has a duration of 5 years with the possibility that in the third cycle of the 4th year, the student can study in Germany, Chile, United States and Mexico as long as your CUM is up 8.0.
_	The long-term outcomes for asymptomatic adults with SPCD is not known, but the discovery of mothers with undiagnosed cardiomyopathy and SPCD has raised the possibility that identification and treatment may prevent adult onset manifestations.
_	He ruled out the possibility that it could have been used for LOX production and concluded, erroneously, that "the site had no offensive role."
_	Initially, the lucrative donations and campaign contributions roll in, but as he learns the nature of the con game in Washington D.C., he starts to see how the greed and corruption makes it difficult to address issues such as campaign finance reform, environmental protection, and the possibility that electric power companies may have a product that is giving kids in a small town cancer.
_	In their 2006 examination of the specimen, Grellet-Tinner and Makovicky examined the possibility that the dromaeosaurid had been feeding on the egg, or that the egg fragments had been associated with the "Deinonychus" skeleton by coincidence.
_	The producer of the film later appeared on stage to explain that the images were taken out not because they were disturbing, but because of concerns about the possibility that relatives of the dead persons appearing on the photographs might bring lawsuits for emotional distress and the like.
_	Attention is moreover drawn to the possibility that some of the elements of this International Standard may be the subject of patent rights other than those identified above.
_	Freud does not consider the possibility that either her erotic journal or her pains might arise from an incident in not her past, but her future.
_	The ambiguous report of "Jonas Rider, a Black Man", raises the possibility that the French captured this vessel, only to lose it to the British.
_	This situation, of the inability to pass the budget, revived the possibility that early elections might be held – a possibility which Prime Minister Netanyahu expressed his support of during a special speech he delivered from his public office on 9 October.
_	As the source is extended, with a size of about 45', this argues against the possibility that a single galaxy is responsible for the emission.
_	Comparisons between parent and offspring genomic and epigenomic data allows one to rule out the possibility that a disease or phenotype is due to genomic variation.
_	As of February 2015 the only detail which has been released is the possibility that due to the subject matter's sensitive nature Sheik and Sater may instead fictionalize the two leads.
_	Tucker felt unfulfilled by his work in child psychiatry, but was open to the possibility that humans are more than their material bodies and wished to investigate the matter further.
_	According to Siobhán Marie Kilfeather the song is from the music hall style of the period, and while one cannot wholly dismiss the possibility that it is "based on an older folk song", "neither melody nor words bear any relationship to the Irish tradition of street ballads."
_	While further research is needed to assess whether these results generalize to a larger sample, these recent findings open the door to the possibility that gay men's online experiences may differ from heterosexuals' in that it may be more likely to provide mental health benefits than consequences.
_	He raises the possibility that Lody was motivated by what had happened two years earlier in Omaha, when Lody had responded to the accusations of being a wife-beater by declaring that he would "defend the honour of a gentleman".
_	Stevens, in his initial draft, expressed great concern with the possibility that an individual might be liable for copyright infringement for copying a single program in his own home, and for his own use.
_	Since the sample being studied was drawn from a normal population (as opposed to the population of individuals seeking treatment for psychological disorders), this lack of an effect on behavior may be due to the possibility that the people being studied were not under any motivation to actually change their behavior.
_	There is the possibility that future lander missions could carry in situ instrumentation to perform the necessary measurements.
_	There also remains the possibility that a greater diversity of First Peoples such as ancestors of those named nations may have contributed to building some percentage of the mounds.
_	However, the attack failed, so Thuyết had to go on the run with Hàm Nghi and a band of nationalist partisans, so Hien could not turn up at the examinations as a family member without risking the possibility that he would be taken hostage.
_	In 1919, the Italian state had brought in a series of liberal reforms in Libya that allowed education in Arabic and Berber and allowed for the possibility that the Libyans might become Italian citizens.
_	Also there is the possibility that many so called criminals may consider productive work readily available for idle hands to be more rewarding whatever the case crime rate is relatively low.
_	In the opening episode of season seven, "Active Measures", Eric asks Sam to show him how to fire a weapon and how to fight, leaving open the possibility that he may want to try his hand as a field agent in the future.
_	The domain "cm" of Cameroon has generated interest due to the possibility that people might miss typing the letter "o" for sites in the "com".
_	Answers vary, from time travel not being possible, to the possibility that visitors from the future can not reach any arbitrary point in the past, or that they disguise themselves to avoid detection.
_	Consequently, some believe in the possibility that there were prehistoric humans in Sri Lanka from 500,000 BP or earlier, and consider it likely that they were on the island by 300,000 BP.
_	This ignores the possibility that the material in zones with poor rock will often be highly weathered, and it ignores the possibility that even without weathering a zone of poor rock may represent rock which simply has a lower intact strength, and that is why it became disturbed while zones of stronger rock on the same project did not.
_	This was rejected out of the concern that the upper, active part of the Slumgullion Earthflow could one day reach the dam site, and the possibility that the added pore pressure of the deeper water could reactivate the lower part of the slide.
_	It was not until several days later that the two accepted the possibility that Eyles may have contracted malaria.
_	If he was voted out, there would be a new election for Speaker, which would allow for the possibility that Democrats—along with dissenting Republicans—would vote in Dick Gephardt as Speaker.
_	Churchill acknowledges the possibility that the manuscript is a synthetic forgotten language (as advanced by Friedman) or a forgery as preeminent theories.
_	Thus, Pengornis supports the possibility that enantiornithines and Ornithurines may not be distinct clades.
_	US defense officials investigating the case said that "serious inconsistencies" had become evident and they were exploring the possibility that, rather than having been kidnapped, Metzger was attempting to flee her marriage.
_	According to officials, Bales may have been having marital problems, and the investigation of the shootings is looking into the possibility that an e-mail about marriage problems might have provoked Bales.
_	According to the police report, the driver suffered from epilepsy, but investigators could not rule out either a vehicle defect or the possibility that the driver had suffered a seizure.
_	Uncertainties regarding its distance leave open the possibility that Mu Normae could be between 250,000 and one million times as luminous and up to 60 times as massive as the Sun, though it is more likely to have around 500,000 times the Sun's luminosity and 40 times its mass.
_	Authorities also considered the possibility that he committed the crime due to relationship problems.
_	In his book "Bob Dylan, Performing Artist", author Paul Williams has suggested that the song addresses "the possibility that the most important (and least articulated) political issue of our times is that we are all being fed a false picture of reality, and it's coming at us from every direction."
_	Steinman's "Cry to Heaven" demo was intended for the possibility that Steinman would provide songs for a musical based on the film "Cry-Baby".
_	Lopez allows for the possibility that earlier Sanskrit commentaries of the Heart Sutra before the 8th century existed but were later lost.
_	This presents the possibility that they can be trampled beneath the group, as depicted in the 1994 film "The Paper", and the difficulty of photographing a defendant who may be looking downward to keep his face from view.
_	If the vibrating speed is too fast, the particle will go forward along the screen, reducing the possibility that the particles will pass through.
_	Advantages of land spreading are the low treatment cost and the possibility that the approach could improve soil characteristics.
_	When originally described, the authors mentioned the possibility that it was an ankylosaurian.
_	Solt raises the possibility that the police and government elites received a portion of the profits from the illegal food trade, which explains their motives for quietly accepting the black market.
_	The likely presence of an ocean within Callisto leaves open the possibility that it could harbor life.
_	This suggested to Robert Lindsey that there could have been the possibility that Mark was copying Luke and not the other way around.
_	The team of French researchers who developed the DNA test for the recessive "a" allele also discussed the possibility that "Extension" might be dosage-dependent.
_	Occasionally, their outfits flicker in color, alluding to the possibility that they're animated characters in the real world.
_	Scott Sharkey of 1UP wrote that the game "was pretty much at the top of the heap [of demakes]," also stating the possibility that he might "prefer this thing to "Team Fortress 2"" and that it was "a great way to blow a few minutes while putting off work."
_	He affirms God's all-powerful nature, but suggests the possibility that God is not the all-good force of love that rabbinic Judaism has made him out to be.
_	At the same time, a "New York Times" report portrayed her as still fighting, but philosophical and realistic about the possibility that she would lose the race.
_	A stucco scene at Tikal shows a prisoner being "adorned" for sacrifice and names the Kaan king in a related caption; the text is damaged and in its current condition it allowed for the possibility that it referred to Yich'aak K'ahk' himself instead of him being the overlord of the prisoner to be killed.
_	This, and the possibility that he learned of his intended deportation, prompted him to bring forward his revolt, which made its success unlikely.
_	The short-term effects observed after only thirty minutes of playing are substantial enough to consider the possibility that the longer amount of time a child plays a video game, the more effect it will have on their behavior.
_	Lucas offered the possibility that there was perhaps an earlier scuffle between Rebel and Imperial forces on the planet before the events in "Episode V – The Empire Strikes Back" unfolded and that they "later decided to build a base there figuring the Empire wouldn’t think the rebels would return to that same location."
_	This family relationship rules out the possibility that the Younger Lady was Kiya, because no known artifact accords Kiya the title or attribute "god's daughter."
_	Although the McDaniels continue to believe Ben's body is in an area of the cave beyond the reach of current search capabilities, they have also entertained the possibility that his death was not an accident but the result of foul play.
_	The Boulder police considered the possibility that an intruder had gotten into the house and committed the murder.
_	Sequences of polydnavirus genes show the possibility that venom-like proteins are expressed inside the host caterpillar.
_	The Niger stingray has only been found in fresh water, though the possibility that it may be euryhaline (tolerant of varying salinities) cannot be discounted.
_	Today, the official Church's position remains a focus of controversy and is fairly non-specific, stating only that faith and scientific findings regarding human evolution are not in conflict, specifically: the Church allows for the possibility that the human body developed from previous biological forms but it was by God's special providence that the immortal spirit was given to humankind.
_	Lewis implies that these amount to a claim to be God and argues that they logically exclude the possibility that Jesus was merely "a great moral teacher", because he believes no ordinary human making such claims could possibly be rationally or morally reliable.
_	The concern over India building large dams over various Punjab rivers that could undercut the supply flowing to Pakistan, as well as the possibility that India could divert rivers in the time of war, caused political consternation in Pakistan.
_	Likewise, a screen of 17 miRNAs that have been predicted to regulate a number of breast cancer associated genes found variations in the microRNAs miR-17 and miR-30c-1of patients; these patients were noncarriers of BRCA1 or BRCA2 mutations, lending the possibility that familial breast cancer may be caused by variation in these miRNAs.
_	Photographs support the possibility that this building was an exact copy of Weidmann Cottage.
_	In fact, the possibility that Chouan was already in custody is contradicted by the fact that the proceedings initiated against him in 1780 were resumed in 1785.
_	The precise wording of Xenophon's description suggests the possibility that the kopis was regarded as a specific variant within a more general class, with the term makhaira denoting any single-edged cutting sword.
_	Overall, "Nanchangosaurus" was smaller in size than "Hupehsuchus", and although several characteristics of the single representative specimen of the former genus suggest it belonged to a juvenile individual, other differences between the two genera are clearly not ontogeneic and dispel the possibility that the single specimen of "Nanchangosaurus" could represent an immature "Hupehsuchus".
_	It has often been confused with the European elk, leading to debate regarding the possibility that some members of the species have survived; however, the European Elk lives in Scandinavia and the Baltic States, whereas the Caucasian moose lived in Eastern Europe and Western Siberia.
_	After Nicodemus gives in and walks away from the conflict, Uriel is revealed to have been reduced to a mortal, with the possibility that he can now be injured or even killed, and with the added danger that if Michael were to misuse his power, the archangel would become one of the Fallen.
_	Based on DNA and other evidence, they note the possibility that additional Jefferson males, including his brother Randolph Jefferson and any one of Randolph's four sons, or his cousin, could have fathered Eston Hemings or Sally Hemings's other children.
_	As the campaign drew to a close, both Republicans and Democrats warned of the possibility that electoral fraud and violence would be perpetrated by the other side.
_	Baker has raised questions about the Boston Marathon bombings, and "is not willing to rule out the possibility that the bombings were a false-flag operation conducted or permitted by elements of the American government in order to justify the Homeland Security complex."
_	On 17 June, the Adelaide "Daily Mail" raised the possibility that Harris was the hoaxed rather than the hoaxer.
_	While it is uncommon nowadays for vessels to suffer disasters such as fire, explosion, or a sinking, workers face the possibility that they may have to abandon their craft on short notice if it collides with other vessels or runs aground.
_	Henneberg believes that evolutionary biologist are so enthusiastic to declare new species and links in human evolution that they have overlook the possibility that each species, like Neanderthals, are merely variations of "homo sapiens".
_	The size of the lake raises the possibility that the harbor played a role in the trade between Egypt and Libya.
_	While stating that ""the typical features which Hanway mentions are distinctly Indian, not Zoroastrian"" based on the worshipers' attires and tilakas, their strictly vegetarian diets and open veneration for cows, he left open the possibility that a few ""actual Gabrs (i.e. Zoroastrians, or Parsis)"" may also have been present at the shrine alongside larger Hindu and Sikh groups.
_	Girardot reasons that "Tao Te Ching" evokes the Tao as "a cosmic principle of the beginnings would seem to make little sense without seeing the possibility that it was rooted in the symbolic remembrance of archaic mythological, especially cosmogonic, themes."
_	The Bat Creek inscription and Los Lunas Decalogue Stone have led some to suggest the possibility that Jewish seafarers may have come to America after fleeing the Roman Empire at the time of the Jewish Revolt.
_	Scientists later determined that the BICEP2 team could not rule out the possibility that the B-modes it detected originated from dust within the Milky Way galaxy – and not from inflation.
_	Measurements of the star suggested that this was close to the star's rotation period, which raised the possibility that the 43-day signal was caused by stellar activity.
_	They considered the possibility that "Akanthosuchus" is a postcranial skeleton of either "Ceratosuchus" or "Navajosuchus", contemporaneous crocodilians known primarily from skulls, but elected to name a new genus instead.
_	This critically endangered tanager is an endemic to handful of localities in the Atlantic Forest in Espírito Santo, Brazil, though the possibility that it occurs in adjacent parts of Minas Gerais and Rio de Janeiro cannot be discounted.
_	Furthermore, Kitagawa argues that de Silva could have entertained the possibility that Theravada Buddhism might look for Ultimate Reality more readily in the Mahayana Buddhist tradition, rather than turning towards Christianity.
_	Parvoblongoolithus is an oogenus of fossil dinosaur egg whose small size and unusual shape suggest the possibility that it is a dwarf egg.
_	Alternatively, given the possibility that someone else may have been involved, Tammy may have been abducted or killed.
_	After the college's administration expressed the possibility that this plan might be in violation of U.S. Department of Health, Education, and Welfare standards on segregation, all but four black students walked out of the meeting and the assembly decided that the Board of Trustees needed to be better informed of the racial climate on campus.
_	This creates the possibility that the same action is justifiable with reference to different principles, or that how a principle should be put into practice is interpreted in different ways.
_	Because the state's toll roads and bridges are run by different government agencies, there was the possibility that a number of different incompatible ETC systems would be instituted throughout California.
_	However, since planetary systems that resemble the Solar System are proving to be rare, they have begun to explore the possibility that life might form in systems very unlike our own.
_	While supporters of the aetherial theory accepted the possibility that negatively charged particles are produced in Crookes tubes, they believed that they are a mere by-product and that the cathode rays themselves are immaterial.
_	Rule 907(b)(2)(C) of the MCM states that jeopardy attaches at the "beginning of the presentation of evidence on the merits," raising the possibility that jeopardy attached prior to the declaration of mistrial.
_	Gasparoli raised the possibility that Rosario's friend Marisol Rangel, whose voice sounds to him more like the constantly sobbing caller, was the real caller, only later identifying herself as Rosario after repeated requests from the dispatcher for her name.
_	Uniform cooling of the CMB over billions of years is explainable only if the universe is experiencing a metric expansion, and excludes the possibility that we are near the unique center of an explosion.
_	However, the ownership of "UFO Magazine" has been a well maintained secret, suggesting the possibility that it had been utilized as a manipulation and/or disinformation tool.
_	There is the possibility that "Pseudomystus" as currently understood may not be monophyletic.
_	Albert James Williams Myers, professor of Black Studies at the State University of New York at New Paltz remarks, "I think that political officials in Albany and elsewhere within New York felt that since Pinkster was a gathering for Africans that perhaps it could lead to a revolt and so I think it was really fear of the possibility that something like this could happen that we have to bring it to an end.
_	Ian Hacking noted that traditional "Dutch book" arguments did not specify Bayesian updating: they left open the possibility that non-Bayesian updating rules could avoid Dutch books.
_	Research investigated the possibility that individuals will have a preference for spices in their cooking to defend against food-borne human parasites.
_	There is thus the possibility that the odd qualities of finish in his later instruments—ironically, those most highly prized and expensive—were due not only to stress and haste but also to encroaching illness.
_	The realisation that the St Mary Guildhall was not specifically built for the Great Guild of the Blessed Virgin Mary, and, that it was built at sometime previous to 1251/2, when it was acquired by the Guild, opens up the possibility that it had been a Royal Palace or "hospicium", where and Henry II had a crown wearing or second crowning.
_	Beginning in early 2005, journalists, activists and academics such as Seymour Hersh, Scott Ritter, Joseph Cirincione and Jorge E. Hirsch began publishing claims that United States' concerns over the alleged threat posed by the possibility that Iran may have a nuclear weapons program might lead the US government to take military action against that country in the future.
_	In addition, there may be the possibility that the tax value of life insurance policies and charitable remainder trusts could be included in these wealth calculations.
_	As observed from a political point of view, Obrenović saw the works of Karadžić as a potential hazard due to a number of apparent reasons, one of which was the possibility that the content of some of the works, although purely poetic in nature, was capable of creating a certain sense of patriotism and a desire for freedom and independence, which very likely might have driven the populace to take up arms against the Turks.
_	Stereospondyli, though they also consider an anternative phylogeny, the possibility that it may belong, instead, in the Trematosauroidea, and suggest that only additional and more complete specimens of the taxon will resolve the issue.
_	"[T]here is the possibility that the photographs were doctored or the injuries inflicted at a later date", Wilson comments, "but Soviet justice rarely required such damning evidence."
_	As native lead is extremely rare, such artifacts raise the possibility that lead smelting may have begun even before copper smelting."
_	Moreover, it does mention the possibility that leadership might wish to withhold evidence of extraterrestrial life from the public under some conditions.
_	Officers removed the front door to Yeates' flat to check for clothing fibres and DNA evidence, with investigators examining the possibility that the perpetrator had entered the flat before Yeates returned home.
_	The decision in "Immigration and Naturalization Service v. Chadha" created the possibility that every previous reorganization was effectively null and void; to avoid the potential administrative chaos that might have ensued, Congress enacted legislation retroactively approving all previous reorganizations.
_	Adoptive parents may be less likely to consider the possibility that "they" are doing something wrong, and blame the child's heredity.
_	As for his romantic future, Hatori wrote that she saw him marrying a woman that would bring merit to the Ootori family, although she did not completely discount the possibility that love would be involved in said choice.
_	This raised the possibility that such adoption could be possible even if the 2011 Family Code were to be repealed in a referendum.
_	Receiving her award in the crowded House of Commons, she spoke out against the possibility that the Children's Commissioner become a figurehead with little real power.
_	In the book proper, Davies briefly explores: the nature of reason, belief, and metaphysics; theories of the origin of the universe; the laws of nature; the relationship of mathematics to physics; a few arguments for the existence of God; the possibility that the universe shows evidence of a deity; and his opinion of the implications of Gödel's incompleteness theorem, that "the search for a closed logical scheme that provides a complete and self-consistent explanation is doomed to failure."
_	They also acknowledged the possibility that the culprit may have already died.
_	They were generally ignored by humans, except for the periodic threat of eradication due to the possibility that they were destroying native herbivore habitat, until the 1980s.
_	Reports that melamine has been added as a binder in animal feed manufactured in North America also raise the possibility that harmful melamine contamination might not be limited to China.
_	This event pointed to the possibility that the band as such is still functioning and Avendaño's arrest represented a political strategy to gain credibility with respect to the armed struggle that was and still is developing (it was never fought to Avendaño's innocence, but it was believed that he was just a simple member of the gang and not the leader), or simply a judicial mistake.
_	Using the nominal parameters, the planet is too close to the star to be habitable, though the uncertainties allow for the possibility that it may actually lie in the innermost region of the habitable zone, however even with the lowest error bar measurement, a stellar flux of 1.35 "S" would still be high enough to boil away any oceans.
_	D'Annunzio was known as a lover of women of all ages, so one cannot exclude the possibility that the woman in question, whose rose-like dried mouth the poet was writing about, was in her late forties or even older.
_	The action was taken to defend against the possibility that a force of Japanese warships and planes would attempt to attack the cities of Fremantle and Perth.
_	Due to the uncertainty region, there was the possibility that it could pass Mars as far away as .
_	Yet, according to FAIR, "the possibility that illegal, unpopular government actions might be disrupted is not a consequence to be feared, however — it's the whole point of the U.S. First Amendment."
_	Orotracheal application of WISP-1 neutralizing antibodies to the lung ameliorates bleomycin-induced lung fibrosis, raising the possibility that WISP-1 might be a potential target for anti-fibrotic therapy.
_	In September 2007, activists in China had already warned about the possibility that TOM's versions have or will have more trojan capability.
_	On the other hand, Ecuador consulted the possibility that the Swedish government would establish guarantees so Assange would not be extradited from that country to the United States.
_	In "The International", he recovers that moment in Belfast's history just before the outbreak of the Troubles, to show diverse strands of city life around a city centre hotel, essentially to make the point that the political propagandists who explain their positions through history overlook its inconvenient complexity and the possibility that things might have turned out differently.
_	Globes also said that the production line is automatic ("without human hands") and the possibility that the source is human is a very slim chance.
_	However, this overlooks the possibility that there is a commonality among all creatures that drives all others urges.
_	The report criticised Sunjet Aviation for the possibility that this would have made the problem harder to identify, track, and resolve, as well as the fact that in at least one instance the plane was flown with an unauthorized maintenance deferral for cabin pressure problems.
_	The correlation between damage to certain specific brain areas (usually in the left hemisphere) and the development of specific types of aphasia makes it possible to deduce (albeit very roughly) the location of a suspected brain lesion based only on the presence (and severity) of a certain type of aphasia, though this is complicated by the possibility that a patient may have damage to a number of brain areas and may exhibit symptoms of more than one type of aphasia.
_	Although the Anaheim City Council rejected the Katella streetcar in January 2017, OCTA has listed a streetcar connection in its Central Harbor Boulevard Transit Corridor Study, leaving the possibility that it could be built as a county project, rather than a city project.
_	Francesco Sisci, Asia editor of "La Stampa", supported the possibility that the self-immolators were Falun Gong practitioners, writing in the "Asia Times" that "no one believed that the government could have paid a mother to torch herself and her daughter, or that she was so loyal to the Communist Party that she pretended to be a Falungong member and kill herself and her only daughter, even if Falungong master Li Hongzhi forbade suicide ..."
_	Biddle allowed for the possibility that Ayyadurai may have coined the term "EMAIL" and used the header terms without being aware of earlier work, but maintained that the historical record isn't definitive on either point.
_	Recognizing the possibility that stones can be captured using these techniques is an important step forward.
_	Unfortunately, one consequence of jump-door technology is the possibility that large numbers of unsuspecting sentients can be diverted to destinations unknown for nefarious purposes.
_	Working against time before the new trial, Wimsey first explores the possibility that Boyes took his own life.
_	Frankie could either be interpreted as a family ties murderer for the possibility that she manipulated family members to help kill her husband, or a battered woman murderer for the possibility that she killed him in self-defense during one of the beatings he would give her.
_	He urged them to take more seriously the possibility that there might be a political aspect to her disappearance: "Through her critical engagement with Russian society, and because of her Jewish provenance, Mrs Mikhalchuk was exposed to daily repression and threats of violence.
_	If the central powers were to be distributed among the various states, there's the possibility that it didn't spread equally.
_	The uncompleted hulls of four ships, "Albuera", "Jutland", "Namur" and "Oudenarde" were laid up with the possibility that they could be completed at a later date.
_	In "United States v. Carolene Products Co." the Court in Footnote Four left open the possibility that laws that seem to be within "a specific prohibition of the Constitution," which restrict the political process, or which burden "discrete and insular minorities" might receive more exacting review.
_	Procter's Catholicism also influenced her choice of images and symbols; Procter often uses references to the Virgin Mary, for example, to "introduce secular and Protestant readers to the possibility that a heavenly order critiques Victorian gender ideology's power structure."
_	Vincent Solis, LC vice president for student services, discounted the possibility that the probationary status was a cause of the decline in enrollment in the fall of 2012.
_	Sampling risk can also increase detection risk which suggests the possibility that an auditor will not find material misstatements relating to the financial statements through substantive tests and analysis.
_	In a later Venona transcript, the KGB speculates about the possibility that Laurence Duggan, another source who had recently resigned from the U.S. State Department, might go to Chile in place of Menaker or do some unspecified work with him.
_	The structural engineers on the project also considered the possibility that an aircraft could crash into the building.
_	At that time, TRN had not yet decided whether the wiring would be reinstated after completion of the work on the bus terminal, leaving open the possibility that the current suspension might eventually be made a permanent closure.
_	Whilst praising Moghaddam's model for emphasising potential mechanisms for future study, the review concludes that the staircase model may not be the right metaphor for summarising the phenomena of terrorism, citing a lack of evidence for transition between the floors, and the possibility that some floors and corresponding processes from the model could be removed entirely due to a lack of empirical evidence.
_	Because the gift to A's widow cannot be resolved until A dies, the law will consider the possibility that, after the property is left to A, he marries a woman who was not born at the time the gift was made.
_	It faced criticism for its combination of quantitative and qualitative methods, the wide variety of its fourteen scales, and the possibility that it did not include enough different neuropsychological skills or did not distinguish brain dysfunction adequately.
_	The Chinese state prosecutor is investigating the possibility that criminal negligence was responsible for the disaster.
_	This change had the effect of retaining the station's transmitter location in Wayne for the present time but opening the possibility that the station could serve the Sioux City, Iowa market at some future date.
_	The Romanesque tower foot is more old-fashioned in style than the body of the main church apparently was, indicating the possibility that it could have belonged to an older structure predating the arrival of the Cistercians with their characteristic building style.
_	One physician found the womb veil to be "harmless" and likely "effectual" in some cases, but thought it relied too much on women knowing how to insert it correctly, with the possibility that it might become dislodged during intercourse.
_	In August 2005 the council published their preferred route for the section from the A1067 to the A47 road in the east, but left open the possibility that the section from the A1067 to the A47 to the west of Norwich would not be included due to the objections relating to the Wensum Valley.
_	An argument over the correct translation of an unidentified term depends on the possibility that the native could have spoken a different sentence.
_	On May 16 2018 in an unexpected announcement on Al Jazeera Sinwar stated that Hamas would pursue "peaceful, popular resistance" opening the possibility that Hamas, which is considered a terrorist organisation by many countries, may play a role in negotiations with Israel.
_	Nikki cannot cope with the loss, as well as the possibility that he himself may have killed her without knowing it (it was later revealed on the "Mindcrime at the Moore" DVD that Mary killed herself after Dr. X threatened to kill Nikki) and he begins to succumb to insanity.
_	In a joint lead judgment by Lords Hughes and Toulson, they concluded that a conviction under the principle of joint enterprise should require that the secondary party "intended" the primary party to commit the crime, rather than merely foresaw the possibility that they might do so.
_	To offset the possibility that incumbents could shift to other occupations with little loss of income, entry requirements could be tightened to limit supply and create monopoly rents within the licensed occupation.
_	In contrast to these views, however, Paolo Musso, a member of the SETI Permanent Study Group of the International Academy of Astronautics (IAA) and the Pontifical Academy of Sciences, took the view that extraterrestrial civilizations possess, like humans, a morality driven not entirely by altruism but for individual benefit as well, thus leaving open the possibility that at least "some" extraterrestrial civilizations are hostile.
_	Griffiths therefore rejected the possibility that Osiris's murder was rooted in historical events.
_	However, not all musicians have taken issue with the possibility that their music is being used during interrogations.
_	Follow up radial velocity observations to confirm the planet were made with the 1.5 m Tillinghast reflector in order to rule out the possibility that the observed decrease in brightness was caused by an eclipsing binary.
_	Barsbold took the conservative position and did not name this specimen because it was not complete enough to rule out the possibility that it was a juvenile of a known genus of troodontid.
_	Geoffrey Hodgson has considered the possibility that evolutionary economics and institutional economics may eventually become a new mainstream.
_	Some theories look for a graviton to complete the Standard Model list of force-carrying particles, while others, like loop quantum gravity, emphasize the possibility that time-space itself may have a quantum aspect to it.
_	None of the schools had received an at-large bid to the 2017 NCAA Tournament – Mount St. Mary′s, a 16th-seed in the tournament, was the only team among Georgetown′s 11 non-conference opponents that made the tournament and did so via an automatic bid by winning the 2017 Northeast Conference Tournament – and none of them were projected to make the 2018 NCAA Tournament; preseason prognosticators raised the possibility that none of them would make even the 2018 National Invitation Tournament.
_	However, the majority of documents dating from 1915 onwards are closed, due to the sensitive nature of the material they contain and the possibility that first degree relatives may still be alive.
_	Aires de Ornelas wavered in his support, which risked the possibility that Integralists would transfer their loyalty to Miguel's supporters, or assume the leadership of the monarchist movement.
_	Scholars such as Lloyd Laing and Leslie Alcock note the possibility that Gildas may have instead intended the territory of the Damnonii, a tribe in present-day Scotland mentioned by Ptolemy in the 2nd century, but others such as Thomas D. O'Sullivan consider this unlikely.
_	Even in simple systems the troubleshooter must always consider the possibility that there is more than one fault.
_	The latest development is the possibility that Jenna will have a cornea replacement, which means that she may regain her vision at some point in the near future.
_	Furthermore, electrolyte homeostasis is maintained in these patients, which excludes the possibility that other Na transporters elsewhere in the kidney are being shut down.
_	Greek heritage led to her being one of several members of parliament to come under scrutiny over the possibility that they held another citizenship by descent.
_	Tasked with leading Labour's defence review, she said that she would not rule out the possibility that it might recommend unilateral disarmament, but described Corbyn's comments that he would not countenance using a nuclear deterrent as "unhelpful" to the policy process.
_	Spinoza was offered the chair of philosophy at the University of Heidelberg, but he refused it, perhaps because of the possibility that it might in some way curb his freedom of thought.
_	The precise position of Griffineae remained unresolved since its sister status to Hippeastrae was weak, leaving the possibility that it could be sister to the whole American clade.
_	There is debate about the audience for Otfrid's work, whether it was primarily a clerical or lay audience, whether the work was meant for recitation or private reading, and even the possibility that it was sung.
_	There is also the possibility that they may be a hybrid of "I. coindetii" and "I. illecebrosus".
_	There was concern that the early announcement of the change would cause an Osborne effect, and there was the possibility that Intel could force Apple to use the Intel Inside branding.
_	Historically, the dispute over the San Juan River has been exacerbated by the possibility that it might become part of a Nicaragua Canal connecting the Atlantic and Pacific oceans.
_	Various authors and filmmakers have speculated about Vicious's role in Spungen's death and the possibility that Spungen was killed by a drug dealer who frequently visited their room.
_	Investigators examined the possibility that Harper's assault was related to the disappearance and murder of First Nations teenager Tina Fontaine, whose body had been discovered in a river only weeks before, but found no information suggesting the two crimes were linked.
_	Although this was a victory for the Barry company, it left open the possibility that the Taff Vale Railway would bring Rhondda coal to Barry via Cardiff and this coastal line, rather than hand it over to the Barry Railway at Trehafod.
_	These included British naval superiority; the prospect of an Anglo-French war leading to the British gobbling up the entire French colonial empire after the defeat of the French Navy; the pointed statement from the Russian Emperor Nicholas II that the Franco-Russian alliance applied only to Europe, and that Russia would not go to war against Britain for the sake of an obscure fort in the Sudan in which no Russian interests were involved; and the possibility that Germany might take advantage of an Anglo-French war to strike France.
_	Perhaps almost as remarkable as the discovery of the house-church is the possibility that pagan worship may have continued in the cult room below.
_	Brin was comparing Google's ambitions of building an artificial intelligence to HAL, while dismissing the possibility that a bug like the one that led HAL to murder the occupants of the fictional spacecraft "Discovery One" could occur in a Google-based artificial intelligence.
_	This requirement is based on the possibility that either of the cylinders may become unusable without warning.
_	Richard Fass puts forward the possibility that business scandals in the real world make students believe dishonesty is an acceptable method for achieving success in contemporary society.
_	Kui refuses to ascend to godhood without Snow Girl by his side, so he instead plunges himself into Hell in his demon form in the hopes of finding and saving her before it's too late - accepting the possibility that he too might be trapped for thousands of years in his demon form, yet unwilling to spend any more amount of time anywhere unless Snow is with him.
_	Herwig Wolfram argued the possibility that unknown river "Erac" could be identified with the river Phasis in Lazica.
_	There is also the possibility that a bias can make an effective program seem ineffective or even as far as harmful.
_	The Toronto Transit Commission reminds everyone of the possibility that people who refuse to offer their seat may have a hidden disability that is either not likely to be recognized or a disability that is uncomfortable to discuss in public.
_	On the same "Quirks and Quarks" show he dismissed Benveniste's complaints, stating that because of the possibility that the results would be unduly promoted by the homeopathy community, an immediate re-test was necessary.
_	The organization had a "clandestine character," and all the inner workings of the organization were enshrouded "in deep secrecy," raising the possibility that "the group might take extralegal action against all organized labor."
_	Similarly, photogeochemistry may also include photochemical reactions of naturally occurring materials that are not touched by sunlight, if there is the possibility that these materials may become exposed (e.g. deep soil layers uncovered by mining).
_	Casey refused to acknowledge the possibility that he was the father and accused Gwen of stalking him.
_	The discovery of fission raised the possibility that an extremely powerful atomic bomb could be created.
_	The Renaissance origin of the name of anthropology does not exclude the possibility that ancient authors presented anthropogical material under another name (see below).
_	Scully does not tell Mulder about this, and the pair discuss the possibility that Boggs has orchestrated the kidnapping with a partner to avoid execution.
_	Most physicians accept that laboratory tests are overused, but "it remains difficult to persuade them to consider the possibility that they, too, might be overutilizing laboratory tests."
_	Historian A. H. Merrills, on the other hand, has proposed the possibility that placing Rodulf's origin with the Scandinavian tribes could have been politically motivated.
_	Upset at the possibility that Silver might raise her daughter, Adrianna pays a surprise visit to Maisie picking her up from daycare pretending to be Greg's girlfriend.
_	This resulted in fears of an imminent volcanic eruption, which began October 10, 2011, approximately 1 km south of the island in a fissure on the floor of the ocean and is continuing with the possibility that a new island will form or an existing island become larger.
_	The collection includes some non-literary material, such as a collection of letters from the abbots of the monastery of Saint Pachomius, raising the possibility that the unifying circumstance in the collection is that all were part of a monastic library.
_	According to the church's sacred texts and pronouncements by its leaders and theologians, the church leaves open the possibility that it may one day re-institute the practice.
_	The signal intelligence also raised the possibility that high-value targets (HVTs) were present in the valley among which were Jalaluddin Haqqani and Saif Rahman.
_	Historians and Egyptologists therefore consider the possibility that Peribsen's name was actually forgotten in time or that his name was preserved in a distorted, misspelled form.
_	However, the current shape also supports the possibility that Enceladus is not in hydrostatic equilibrium, and may have rotated faster at some point in the recent past (with a differentiated interior).
_	Prime Minister Robert Fico said "I do not exclude the possibility that Slovakia will never recognize Kosovo.
_	This raises the possibility that Kelley actually plagiarized material from a different source.
_	Owen Marshall wrote a novel "The Larnarchs" (2011), based on the possibility that the tragedy resulted from an affair between Larnarch’s third wife Constance and his youngest son Douglas (Dougie).
_	Using reconstructions and eyewitness accounts, it presented the possibility that the three IRA members had been unlawfully killed.
_	Holmes considers the possibility that the two matters are related and that someone is not telling him the truth.
_	At that point, Marco, urged by Matilde, insinuates to the local magistrate the possibility that Orimbelli could have killed his wife: a new and more accurate investigation reveals that Orimbelli rented a bicycle to reach Villa Berlusconi from the village where the "Tinca" was moored and Matilde is spared consequences by feigning not to know what Orimbelli intended to do during his absence.
_	Roman law regulated the legal protection of property and the equality of legal subjects and their wills, and it prescribed the possibility that the legal subjects could dispose their property through testament.
_	The advent of digital communication tools and media has introduced the possibility that the nature of the social ties discussed above has been radically altered.
_	Crutchfield refuses to entertain the possibility that Omar is innocent and is angry that Bunk is interfering.
_	However, the differing laws of succession in each kingdom leave open the possibility that the two lands may eventually become separate.
_	The large eye sockets suggest a keen visual sense, and also suggest the possibility that they were nocturnal.
_	Such tyoe of coins were also issued by the kingdom of Tripura in 1464, thus precluding the possibility that Jalaluddin was following the kingdom's custom.
_	The samples grouped it with lion samples from Namibia and Botswana, raising the possibility that the Batéké lion either dispersed from a Southern African lion population or is a survivor of the ancestral Batéké population that was considered to be extinct since the late 1990s.
_	Fichman claimed "there was the possibility that we were going to cause a riot".
_	"The only acceptable strategy is one that eliminates the possibility that Iraq will be able to use or threaten to use weapons of mass destruction.
_	There is the possibility that heading the ball could damage the head, as the ball can travel at 100 km/hour; although most professional footballers have reported that they experienced head injuries from colliding with other players and the ground.
_	The Bhagavata Purana's references to the South Indian Alvar saints, along with its emphasis on "bhakti", have led many scholars to give it South Indian origins, though some scholars question whether this evidence excludes the possibility that "bhakti" movement had parallel developments in other parts of India.
_	The results confirmed how inducing attentional bias can alter emotional vulnerability, thus introducing the possibility that cognitive-experimental procedures designed around these results have potential therapeutic value in the future.
_	If a student and a professor are in a relationship while the student is enrolled in that professor's class, there is the possibility that their relationship could create conflicts of interest.
_	Augustine of Hippo mentioned the cynocephali in "The City of God", Book XVI, Chapter 8, in the context of discussing whether such beings were descendants of Adam; he considered the possibility that they might not exist at all, or might not be human (which Augustine defines as being a mortal and rational animal: "homo, id est animal rationale mortale"), but insisted that if they were human they were indeed descendants of Adam.
_	Stevens did not rule out the possibility that the majority opinion in "Watt v. Western Nuclear, Inc." misinterpreted Congress' intention, but he said there was no reason to choose another assessment of the Congress' intention over the old one.
_	Larry explores the possibility that he may have been adopted, because of a potentially misunderstood word his father said (and no longer remembers) while in the hospital — Larry hires a private investigator (Mekhi Phifer) to look into it.
_	This excerpt from an Australian newspaper reveals the possibility that Hampton Court's Mrs Grundy was a real-life moral regulator who had an impact upon London society, or at least upon the residents of Hampton Court:
_	The cupola, armed with the secondary 7.5 mm machine gun, was to have a large episcope to which the main turret was to be slaved, allowing the commander to lay the 75 mm gun on the target himself, allowing for the possibility that the commander would double as gunner.
_	Ellison denied the allegations as well as the possibility that a video could exist, saying, “this video does not exist because I never behaved in this way”.
_	The feelings that surfaced between them caused controversy in the Church authorities in Chile and were the subject of debate during the time the soap opera aired, because of the possibility that she left the habit and start a relationship with the radio announcer.
_	The detectives then look into the possibility that it was Perry who hurt Zoe. ADA Pippa Cox comes to prosecute Perry as a child in Family Court.
_	Orientation independent relates to the possibility that a slope fails independently from its orientation, e.g. circular failure completely through newly formed discontinuities in intact rock blocks, or failing partially following existing discontinuities and partially new discontinuities.
_	The film explores the possibility that the three children could have been murdered by the stepfather of Christopher Byers, John Mark Byers. "" (2011) exonerates Byers, explores another suspect, stepfather Terry Hobbs, and chronicles the eventual release of the West Memphis Three from jail in August 2011.
_	This concept that "dinosaur" was an outdated term for two distinct orders lasted many decades in the scientific and popular literature, and it was not until the 1960s that scientists began to again consider the possibility that saurischians and ornithischians were more closely related to each other than they were to other archosaurs.
_	It raised questions about the case and raised the possibility that Ingram was innocent of all charges and forms the basis of which "Quiz" was adapted.
_	This theme ties in with the nationalism theme because it is another way that Tagore is warning against the possibility that nationalism can do more harm than good.
_	This has opened up the possibility that the Long Man could be a Tudor or Stuart-era political satire in the manner recently posited for the Cerne Abbas giant, or possibly a religious image associated with the Reformation:
_	A common argument against reductive physicalism is multiple realizability, the possibility that a psychological process (say) could be instantiated by many different neurological processes (even non-neurological processes, in the case of machine or alien intelligence).
_	By 1952 a theologian such as Ludwig Ott could, in a widely used and well-regarded manual, openly teach the possibility that children who die unbaptised might be saved for heaven.
_	The difficulty in proving the latter lies in the fact that, while the number of board positions that could happen in the course of a chess game is huge (on the order of at least 10 to 10), it is hard to rule out with mathematical certainty the possibility that the initial position allows either side to force a mate or a threefold repetition after relatively few moves, in which case the search tree might encompass only a very small subset of the set of possible positions.
_	Tyldesley conjectured that Thutmose III may have considered the possibility that the example of a successful female king in Egyptian history could demonstrate that a woman was as capable at governing Egypt as a traditional male king, which could persuade "future generations of potentially strong female kings" to not "remain content with their traditional lot as wife, sister and eventual mother of a king" and assume the crown.
_	The 1995 declarations begins: "As scientists, we are intensely interested in the possibility that human activities may affect the global climate".
_	Physicist Stephen Hawking, Microsoft founder Bill Gates and SpaceX founder Elon Musk have expressed concerns about the possibility that AI could develop to the point that humans could not control it, with Hawking theorizing that this could "spell the end of the human race".
_	Through the Intershops, we have created the possibility that these funds stay with us in the country."
_	It does not pay great attention to things like this, although it accepts the possibility that God can intervene in human life in 'extraordinary' ways: what we call 'miracles'.
_	While considered unlikely, there was the possibility that some of the uranium had reacted with the water vapour to form pyrophoric uranium hydride (); uranium exposed to air forms uranium dioxide ().
_	This led to the possibility that Marie used the real arsenic to murder her husband.
_	In his introduction, Kramers rejects the possibility that Wang Su may have forged the entire work.
_	Franz Babinger alludes to the possibility that the crescent was adopted from the Eastern Romans, noting that the crescent alone has a much older tradition also with Turkic tribes in the interior of Asia.
_	The request for bail was turned down, with Judge McNaughton saying that "he was denied due to the risk [that] Mr. Dotcom would flee jurisdiction and the possibility that if he reached Germany he wouldn't be extradited to face the charges".
_	The next day, President Truman ordered a halt to the bombing due to the possibility that it would be interpreted as a sign that the peace negotiations had failed.
_	Zellweger's physical appearance in the trailer for the film has rekindled a debate about the possibility that Zellweger had plastic surgery, which began in 2014 when she re-emerged from a long hiatus.
_	He compares her to the character of La Maheude in Émile Zola's novel "Germinal", who also contemplates an alternative life, and "hypothetically thinks about the possibility that they could have been lovers".
_	Though a minority of commentators believe or at least accept the possibility that Zembla is as "real" as New Wye, most assume that Zembla, or at least the operetta-quaint and homosexually gratified palace life enjoyed by Charles Kinbote before he is overthrown, is imaginary in the context of the story.
_	"So long as the islands retain their own independent government there remains the possibility that England or the Canadian Dominion might secure one of the Hawaiian harbors for a coaling station."
_	These symptoms presented themselves in his assistant, and in order to rule out the possibility that his assistant was suffering from a mental illness (psychosomatic symptoms), Meyer had this compound tested on laboratory rabbits, most of which died.
_	In a 1999 paper, "Leo Strauss and the World of Intelligence (By Which We Do Not Mean Nous)," also co-authored by Schmitt, Shulsky writes that "Strauss's view certainly alerts one to the possibility that political life may be closely linked to deception.
_	The song is about a woman, Billie Jean, who had spent a night of passion with the narrator and now claims that the narrator is the father of her newborn son; he insists that "the kid is not my son", although the song leaves open the possibility that he is indeed the father.
_	During the development stage of this series, she encouraged Bullen to write Jenny out by severely maiming her, though they both came to the agreement that Jenny would take a job in New York, leaving open the possibility that she could return in the future.
_	Fadel said that she could not find any evidence of the new Egyptian military campaign, when she went to villages where the fighting was said to have been the most intense, which has raised the possibility that Egypt has been inflating the facts on their military campaign.
_	As such, "[b]oth agreed that the proletariat would play a key role, but for Marx the proletariat was the exclusive, leading revolutionary agent while Bakunin entertained the possibility that the peasants and even the lumpenproletariat (the unemployed, common criminals, etc.) could rise to the occasion".
_	Indian news outlets reported the Federal Bureau of Investigation (FBI) was investigating the possibility that Gen. Mahmood Ahmed ordered Saeed Sheikh to send the $100,000 to Atta, while most Western media outlets only reported his connections to the Taliban as the reason for his departure from the ISI.
_	This is important to avoid the uncertainty that would result if there was the possibility that the courts might void or hold-up transactions.
_	Some people with IC/BPS have been diagnosed with other conditions such as irritable bowel syndrome (IBS), fibromyalgia, chronic fatigue syndrome, allergies, Sjögren syndrome, which raises the possibility that interstitial cystitis may be caused by mechanisms that cause these other conditions.
_	The speech nevertheless achieved the effect of drawing attention to the possibility that Australia would be invaded by Japan.
_	The case before us concerns a District Court’s decision on a substantive legal question that was unsettled at the time the trial court acted, thus foreclosing the possibility that any error could have been “plain” then.
_	Bunter finds the door locked and, alarmed at the possibility that someone else is devouring the cake, starts to bang and thump on the door, demanding to be let in.
_	(As he would have been 17 years old at the time there is the possibility that it was his father who was elected).
_	All physicians should consider the possibility that something so meaningful to a large number of patients might also be good for their health.
_	These debates weigh the positive (stopping the Joker permanently) against its effect on Batman's character and the possibility that he might begin killing all criminals.
_	In practice, compensatory seat allocation is complicated by the possibility that one or more parties wins so many seats under the plurality/majoritarian component that the designated number of PR seats is insufficient to produce a fully proportional outcome.
_	One reason is that, when actuating electromechanical switches that carry a live current, there is always the possibility that a small electric spark will be generated.
_	While Germans of all political shades cursed the treaty as an insult to the nation's honor, President Ebert was sober enough to consider the possibility that Germany would not be in a position to turn it down.
_	Following the outbreak of the Second World War in 1939, Laake had repeatedly warned the Norwegian authorities of the possibility that the war could reach Norway in a sudden manner.
_	In 2010, he blew eight saves (including one against the Yankees on May 17, 2010, where he allowed four earned runs and a walk-off home run for the first time in his career), leaving open the possibility that he might be traded.
_	However, the First Presidency also offered the possibility that the prophecy was not closed, and that the One Mighty and Strong would be a future presiding bishop of the church when the Latter-day Saints return to Jackson County, Missouri.
_	There is currently no constitutional provision for a succession list beyond the possibility that the vice president of the Executive Yuan might succeed to the presidency.
_	"Astroconodon" occurred abundantly in freshwater lacustrine deposits and its molars were originally interpreted as being similar to those of piscivorous mammals like cetaceans and pinnipeds; by extension some researchers considered the possibility that all eutriconodonts were aquatic piscivores.
_	Meanwhile Buffy struggles with the possibility that Spike may have begun killing innocent people and "siring" them as vampires.
_	There is no direct evidence for this conclusion, but in the Turkish census of 1546 three monks and a priest were recorded in Serbian Kovin, that indicates the possibility that, along with the church, the monastery was already there.
_	In the Extra Mode there is an additional cinematic showing him becoming a more dark form called Magolor Soul, described by the game as ""a sad shell possessed by the limitless power of the Master Crown, no more than a manifestation of the crown itself"", hinting at the possibility that Magolor may not have actually been evil but was instead corrupted by the Master Crown's power.
_	Most scholars reject the possibility that the Indo-Aryans of Mitanni came from the Indian subcontinent as well as the possibility that the Indo-Aryans of the Indian subcontinent came from the territory of Mitanni, leaving migration from the north the only likely scenario.
_	This experiment demonstrated the possibility that autocatalysts could exhibit competition within a population of entities with heredity, which could be interpreted as a rudimentary form of natural selection.
_	Following the dismissal of the possibility that Hartmann could have composed the score, it was suggested that Rogert had been the original composer, a claim that was backed up by several 19th century intellectuals.
_	These results together imply the possibility that similar mechanics are required for encoding and retrieving information.
_	Much of the controversy surrounding the project involved the possibility that Casco Viejo would lose its World Heritage status.
_	"The Telegraph" summarised the television programme by stating, "According to the BBC, new details, uncovered during the making of the documentary, raise the possibility that the wrong man may have been convicted."
_	In an e-mail sent later to the media, the network said that this decision was based on "the possibility that the episode would contribute to reopen wounds very painful to Argentina".
_	Maier's research led him in "Jesus von Nazareth in der talmudischen Überlieferung" (1978) to deny the possibility that there are any authentic tannaitic Jesus passages and even declares the amoraic passages as all belonging to the post-talmudic (600-1000 CE) rather than to the talmudic period.
_	Findings suggest the possibility that Botulinum toxin type B may be of potential benefit in the treatment of pain attributed to piriformis syndrome.
_	Other research has raised the possibility that Isididae corals, because of their potential to mimic biological properties, may potentially be used as living bone implants as well as in aquatic cultivation.
_	There is also the possibility that these new regulations will be adopted by other countries, helping to set international standards.
_	A caretaker was employed until the late 1930s in the possibility that the line could be re-opened.
_	The intention of this plan was to avoid the possibility that barbarian generals like Huneric or Attila should succeed to Aetius, but clashed with the plans of Aetius himself.
_	He did also allow for the possibility that the SAS personnel had individually acted unlawfully.
_	McGrory, on the other hand, asked the coroner to allow for the possibility that the British government had conspired to murder McCann, Savage, and Farrell, which he believed was evidenced by the decision to use the SAS for Operation Flavius.
_	"The term 'sustainability' should be viewed as humanity's target goal of human-ecosystem equilibrium (homeostasis), while 'sustainable development' refers to the holistic approach and temporal processes that lead us to the end point of sustainability." (305) Despite the increased popularity of the use of the term "sustainability", the possibility that human societies will achieve environmental sustainability has been, and continues to be, questioned—in light of environmental degradation, climate change, overconsumption, population growth and societies' pursuit of unlimited economic growth in a closed system.
_	When animals are imported from one country to another, there is the possibility that diseases and parasites can move with them.
_	Klatt concluded that the origin of Notovitch's story was "to be sought in Paris rather than India, Tibet or Ladakh," but left open the possibility that Notovitch had genuinely found Tibetan texts relating to Jesus misidentifying Bible portions that Heinrich August Jäschke had translated into Tibetan in 1857–1868, decades before Notovitch's visit to Tibet.
_	Screenwriter Hampton Fancher has said that he wrote the character as a human, but wanted the film to suggest the possibility that he may be a replicant.
_	However a few weeks later this particular movement towards reconciliation within the Liberal family foundered, mainly as a result of the Independent Liberals’ fear that their approaches would be viewed as a willingness to become formally associated with Lloyd George and their determination to let it be known that they could not contemplate the possibility that Lloyd George might one day lead the party again.
_	In addition, an experiment using light topography instruments by Munetaka Haida (Tokai University School of Medicine) suggests the possibility that activated parts of human brain are different according to blood types.
_	In no case does the Commission even contemplate the possibility that a researcher might define a taxon on the basis of the same material, i.e. of the same specimen, as is already being studied by other investigators, as has been the case with "Galvesaurus".
_	In June 2014, Boeing announced it intended to send out preliminary lay-off notices to 215 employees—approximately 170 in Houston and 45 in Florida—to prepare for the possibility that Boeing would not be selected to continue work into the next phase following the expected NASA shortlist in mid-2014.
_	Yet there is the possibility that some economic activities, such as marketing and exchange of goods, were also carried out here.
_	Rumor held that Father Feit was responsible, but local church leaders discouraged people from considering the possibility that a priest could have been involved in a violent crime.
_	On the basis of the commission for Cardinal Beaton at Markinch, the historian David McRoberts raised the possibility that Mansioun was responsible for carved oak "Beaton panels" now in the National Museum of Scotland, which carry the Cardinal's heraldry.
_	Also given credence by local historians at one time was the possibility that an interpreter mistranslated the Native American word for "beaver" as "buffalo," the words being very similar, at a treaty-signing at present-day Rome, New York in 1784.
_	Hinduism, with its conception of multiple avatars being expressions of one Supreme God, is more open to the possibility that other religions might be correct for their followers, but this same principle requires the rejection of the exclusivity demanded by each of the Abrahamic religions.
_	Given the possibility that suffixes are responsible for some of the differences, there are still clearly several distinct words, though it is difficult to say how many or what their forms were.
_	After citing Harvey's conclusion that "stress waves probably do not cause any tissue damage" (p. 136), Bellamy and Zajtchuck express their view that Harvey's interpretation might not be definitive because they write "the possibility that stress waves from a penetrating projectile might also cause tissue damage cannot be ruled out."
_	They describe the possibility that a hit to a soldier's trapezius muscle caused temporary paralysis due to "the stress wave passing through the soldier's neck indirectly [causing] cervical cord dysfunction." (p. 155)
_	Clinicians must weigh the potential benefits of MAC prophylaxis against the potential for toxicities and drug interactions, the cost, the potential to produce resistance in a community with a high rate of tuberculosis, and the possibility that the addition of another drug to the medical regimen may adversely affect patients' compliance with treatment.
_	Any sexual contact outside of a strictly monogamous or polyfidelitous relationship increases the possibility that one member of the group will contract a sexually transmitted infection and pass it into the group.
_	However, it isn't until the sequel of 1981 that the film alludes to the possibility that Michael has something more going on with him than mental illness when he writes the Celtic word Samhain in blood on the elementary school chalk board.
_	However, in 1989, David Hult advanced "the possibility that Godefroi is a fiction of Chrétien".
_	Ilmar Reepalu, the mayor of Malmö for over 15 years, has been accused of failing to protect the Jewish community in Malmö, causing 30 Jewish families to leave the city in 2010, and more preparing to leave, which has left the possibility that Malmö's Jewish community will disappear soon.
_	Although the authors of the paper considered her ERα to be essentially unresponsive to estrogen, they stated that they "[could not] exclude the possibility that some residual estrogen sensitivity could be present in some tissues", which is in accordance with the fact that the EC of her ERα had been reduced 240-fold but had not been abolished.
_	However, the possibility that the Eton works are the works of a generation earlier remains, and has interesting implications if true.
_	Newman, Nibert, and Winer (2009) emphasized ruling out the possibility that mnemic neglect occurs due to incompatibility with expectancies.
_	In the wake of the kidnapping reports, questions were raised about the possibility that not only the kidnapping but Arraf al Omari herself were an elaborate ongoing hoax.
_	Vaughn cannot stop thinking about the possibility that his mother is alive, and eventually begins to pressure Corrine Baxter, who was present at the Pearadyne Labs accident after being sucked through the wormhole, to give him answers.
_	This orientation towards the most intense light source can also be seen as a survival mechanism for the fungus as it increases the possibility that the sporangia will be dispersed in the least obstructed direction and to the greatest distance.
_	The 2017 study considered it plausible that "D. horneri" was a direct descendant of "D. torosus" in a process of anagenesis, but rejected the possibility that "D. horneri" was the ancestor of "Tyrannosaurus".
_	While it is unclear what species he is referring to, he cites "Stelis costaricensis" as a homeochromic species, and while "Stelis" is a genus of orchid, he did not elaborate enough to rule out the possibility that he was simply using an outdated name for another insect.
_	Towards the end of 2012 there was increased speculation about the possibility that Mahfud would become a candidate in the 2014 presidential elections in Indonesia.
_	Beaird did not comment on the possibility that his liberal editorial views, new to the older readers, had been a factor in the decline in circulation.
_	This means that they may have reached North America at some point after the Tithonian, although the possibility that they were present but have not been found cannot be excluded.
_	With the most recent changes introduced for H.323, it is now possible for H.323 devices to easily and consistently traverse NAT and firewall devices, opening up the possibility that H.323 may again be looked upon more favorably in cases where such devices encumbered its use previously.
_	In the 1980s he, along with Carl Sagan, was outspoken about the possibility that international nuclear war would bring about a nuclear winter, making presentations in the US Senate in 1983 and the United Nations in 1985.
_	The lectures take great lengths to define and explain the terms "sincerity" and "authenticity," though no clear, concise definition is ever really postulated, and Trilling even considers the possibility that such terms are best not totally defined.
_	These observations led a number of researchers to look for remnants of more ancient coastlines and further raised the possibility that such an ocean once existed.
_	The next morning, the other four learn that Hank abruptly broke up with his girlfriend and left town; the four speculate about the possibility that Hank finally won some money in a lottery.
_	Lister finally finds the letter from his old girlfriend and reassures the others he has made peace with the chance that he had descendants - even though he never knew them, he can take pride in the possibility that a relative of his could have achieved something great.
_	Voynich contemplated the possibility that the author was Albertus Magnus if not Roger Bacon.
_	At first the majority of Staudinger’s colleagues refused to accept the possibility that small molecules could link together covalently to form high-molecular weight compounds.
_	However, Nakaya and Sato (2000) recommended that the status of the species be reviewed once additional specimens are available, citing the possibility that the dorsal fin of the holotype may have been malformed.
_	Although Davie and McCreadie don't believe he is a prime suspect both admit the possibility that O'Neill was responsible.
_	As Cuddy and the rest of House's team communicate with House over the phone to run tests and offer possible diagnoses, they ponder the possibility that Jason has nothing physically wrong with him and that everyone in Cuddy's office could wind up dead.
_	Other than this distinction (and the possibility that the universe will one day return to the state of being God), pandeistic beliefs are deistic.
_	The reviewers noted that the book looks at the origins of Gay Shame, the question of gay pride and challenges readers to "question and explore the possibility that the modern LGBT rights movement's push for acceptance, assimilation, and—they would argue—pride, results in a loss of something importantly queer as it attempts to eradicate shame...[by] exploring the ways in which pride and shame connected with race, gender and sexuality."
_	Xiang argued the possibility that Chau, having such a higher IQ than Tse, could have manipulated and framed Tse for the murder.
_	However, a 2014-2016 study suggests that a potential confounding variable for this outcome is the possibility that aid was directed at countries once they were already on track for improvement.
_	Before the date of crystallisation (given the charge merely "floats" over no particular property) there is the possibility that a company could both charge out property to creditors with priority, or that other creditors could set-off claims against property subject to the (uncrystallised) floating charge.
_	The astonishing economic growth from 1992 to 1996, according to the MPAA, exploded for two reasons: (1) as the growth of multiplex theaters and cable television rose, it created a higher general demand for more entertainment media productions; and (2) "the possibility that this new production activity would occur outside California, or in other countries, did not materialize."
_	It plays a large part in various theories which have been offered about the possibility that the Pashtun people might be descended from the Israelites, through the Ten Lost Tribes.
_	But it is hard to accept the possibility that the real perpetrator would leave his escape from the trap entirely to chance."
_	Hybridization can often be a beneficial genetic event in a population, as indicated by the concept of hybrid vigor, but when a population or species is well suited to its environment there is also the possibility that hybridization could make them less fit.
_	Some caution has been suggested, given the possibility that some sympatric species might actually represent different sexes or morphs, though the vast temporal spanning of the genus still offers a large diversity.
_	According to Max Bennett, "the effect of the drug to produce 'disinterest' is mentioned together with the possibility that this property might make it of psychiatric use."
_	They disputed the possibility that the looping is related to olfaction (sense of smell) as the olfactory region is pushed to the sides of the main airway.
_	That, coupled with a scheduling process that had soccer and rugby sevens events on different days (thus opening the possibility that Toronto's BMO Field, which would house the rugby sevens contests in 2015 might also be able to host the soccer contests), had the potential to put the Hamilton stadium project in jeopardy.
_	He puts forward the possibility that peasant participation (in the Philippine Revolution) was primarily the result of patron-client ties, i.e. clients were asked to join by their landlords or by other prominent to whom they were indebted.
_	Cerny first posed the theory that the hereditary prince was the future Ramesses II, but later considered the possibility that the title referred to the famous Amenhotep Son of Hapu.
_	Concerned about the possibility that the deformities occurred because of a contaminant in the water, Ms. Reinitz contacted the Minnesota Pollution Control Agency (MPCA).
_	Even if the ending is not as ambiguous as the book's, the possibility that there might be another version of Pi's story comes at you unexpectedly and raises the same important questions about truth, perception and belief.
_	They are standing together on the grounds of Kenwood and her cousin's hand lies gently upon Dido's arm, suggesting affection and the possibility that they are walking the grounds together.
_	The study was conducted on average eight years after the strokes, which opens up the possibility that recall bias could have affected the results.
_	Richard J. Hooper does not make the Jusino thesis his own, but says: "Perhaps we should not altogether reject the possibility that some Johannine Christians considered Mary Magdalene to be 'the disciple whom Jesus loved'."
_	Using this formalism, it can be shown that black holes emit a blackbody spectrum of particles known as Hawking radiation leading to the possibility that they evaporate over time.
_	However, the Inter-American Commission on Human Rights (IACHR) of the Organization of American States (OAS) is still urging officials not to rule out the possibility that his killing had another motive.
_	However, Thomas questioned whether Meyer and Pierce were correctly decided, but floated the possibility that parental rights may be protected under the Privileges or Immunities Clause of the Fourteenth Amendment instead.
_	Jenkin then introduced the swamping argument to deny the possibility that an occasional monstrous individual could supply an escape from this state of affairs.
_	There is also the possibility that AI will write work in the future.
_	The building of the railroad in 1886 raised the possibility that it might come to the town, but instead it was routed through Zolfo Springs.
_	In 1996, the cover story "An Urban Central Valley?" by urban planner Rudy Platzek drew wide attention to the possibility that by the end of the 21st century the Central Valley might not even be able to feed its own rapidly expanding population (due to loss of acreage to new development), let alone the rest of the country.
_	Eli (David Blue) and Wray (Ming-Na) discuss the possibility that the system might have been built by possibly the most advanced race in the Universe.
_	On February 19, 2008, the author's official site revealed twelve stories that would comprise the collection, mentioning the possibility that one additional "bonus story" could be included, and on April 16 "The Cat from Hell" (a much anthologized but heretofore uncollected short story originally published in 1977) was added to the contents list.
_	There has been renewed interest in the 21st century, with the possibility that this theory may be finite.
_	The White House also said that the decision to keep the rug in storage "does not preclude" the possibility that it might be displayed sometime in the future.
_	Several Italian newspapers wrote about the possibility that some Italian Banks are illegally controlled by Communion and Liberation (Banco BPM and Banca Popolare di Milano), it is said that their actual CEO Giuseppe Castagna is a member of the Communion and Liberation movement and he faced several conflicts of interest and he is investigated since 2016 because he gave bank fundings for millions Euro towards his personal Communion and Liberation friends to receive business favors and due money laundering.
_	Large assortments offer consumers many benefits, notably increased choice and the possibility that the consumer will be able to locate the ideal product.
_	This led police to investigate the possibility that Spangler and Ogul, who was under indictment for conspiracy, had fled to avoid prosecution.
_	This raises the possibility that more effective treatment of these young people might also improve their outcomes in adult life.
_	By 1980, the gold reserve was exhausted and the Lithuanian diplomatic service faced the possibility that it would have to close due to lack of funds.
_	Gabriel Vecchi, of NOAA said of Emanuel's announcement, "While his results don't rule out the possibility that global warming has contributed to the recent increase in activity in the Atlantic, they suggest that other factors—possibly in addition to global warming—are likely to have been substantial contributors to the observed increase in activity."
_	Namely, the possibility that one may be convinced by an argument, yet know no more after the argument than before.
_	Vora raised the possibility that Conan Doyle read the first report of melioidosis published in 1912 before writing his short story in 1913.
_	Like many of the acts that had left Motown, the Jacksons had to accept the possibility that they would no longer enjoy the same level of success they had while they were associated with the label—something Motown itself reiterated upon hearing that longtime front man Michael Jackson had moved on to a full-fledged solo career following "Destiny"'s release.
_	He felt that founding a private university was a real possibility because of the growing signs of pluralism in the political and economic systems at that time, opening the possibility that something new would also be accepted in the education system.
_	Thus, the trial court erred in failing to instruct the jury to consider the possibility that Newton was unconscious at the time of the shooting, thereby lacking the requisite mental state—mens rea—to commit any crime at all.
_	The structural engineers working on the World Trade Center considered the possibility that an aircraft could crash into the building.
_	They discuss Lewis, and they speak about the possibility that Lewis's soul is still present.
_	Stumm stated that there was still the possibility that "an 11th-hour solution" could prohibit the layoffs.
_	It is also suggested a few times that he had a drinking problem, and later on Alison and Rachel discuss the possibility that he is mentally slow.
_	These facts also point to the possibility that Rizwanur was not the person who was sending these messages, if they are at all authentic.
_	Theories as to the reasons for its construction currently range from the need for some central burial place by the ancient inhabitants of the area to the possibility that the people of Rock Eagle were sending a message to the gods.
_	First is the possibility that capital controls may be used as a substitute for warranted external adjustment (for example, when inflow controls are used to sustain an undervalued currency).
_	Arthur was subsequently charged with murder, but the possibility that the child’s death was caused by his other defects caused the original charge to be reduced, during the trial, to attempted murder.
_	New research opens the possibility that it could have been a girl who died as early as March 1938 at the Leipzig-Reudnitz Children's Hospital.
_	He returns to the front, threatened by the possibility that Dimitri might find about his secret marriage to Tatiana and turn him in to the NKVD in revenge.
_	Calder was unwilling to attack a second time against superior odds, he had to protect the damaged "Windsor Castle" and "Malta" with her large captured Spanish prizes and he had to consider the possibility that the previously blockaded fleets at Rochefort and Ferrol might put to sea and effect a junction with Villeneuve's combined fleet.
_	This success did not foresee the possibility that a telephone user could insert control signals into the switching system by sending unusual tones into the telephone handset.
_	In response to the possibility that the states would prove vulnerable to invasion, insurrection, natural disasters, rioting, and other threats if the National Guard were to be federalized upon entry of the United States into World War I, Congress passed the Home Defense Act in June 1917 to allow the creation of state defense forces, or Home Guards.
_	In a February 2015 interview, Snyder stated that it was the last time he had plans to feature the Joker during his stint on "Batman", but ruled out the possibility that he would not change his mind in the future.
_	A knowledge divide concerning technology presents the possibility that the gap has moved beyond access and having the resources to connect to ICTs to interpreting and understanding information presented once connected.
_	The destructive foray of the Confederate ironclad ram "Albemarle" from the Roanoke River into Albemarle Sound, North Carolina, on 17 April and her reappearance on 5 May—the day Grant's offensives began—increased Union anxiety over the possibility that the Confederate squadron at Richmond might descend the James, wrest control of that vital stream from the Union flotilla, and wreck Butler's transports and supply ships, stranding his troops in hostile territory where they would be at the mercy of Southern soldiers.
_	The following month, "Ha'aretz" requested that the Attorney General investigate the possibility that Ben-Gal had given false testimony in court in exchange for business favours from Sharon.
_	They use a range of tactics to minimise the possibility that their own caches will be pilfered.
_	The first response invokes the possibility that introspective representations fail to represent mental properties as they are in themselves; specifically, that introspection represents phenomenally conscious properties as having certain characteristic qualitative natures which these properties actually lack.
_	Additionally, to guard against the possibility that some electors might strategically throw away their second vote in order to bolster their favorite son's chance of winning, it was specified that the first runner-up presidential candidate would become vice president.
_	The attacks at Matawan are the subject of the National Geographic Channel documentary "Attacks of the Mystery Shark" (2002), which examines the possibility that a bull shark was responsible for killing Stanley Fisher and Lester Stilwell; Discovery Channel's "Blood in the Water" (2009); and Smithsonian Channel's "The Real Story: Jaws" (2011).
_	However, his superiors scoff at the possibility that Schottland is a spy.
_	Due to the possibility that she would be impounded for safety reasons, she was unable to call at Colombo as scheduled, and went directly to Jakarta.
_	The new evidence refutes the possibility that the silver coins could have been collected from single individuals, for instance, as tax payments, or that Qumran could have been a regional ‘tax house’.
_	Giving into question the credibility of the complaints to the Pope, this document suggests the possibility that the marriage between Henry IV and the princess of Opole took place in Vienna in 1280.
_	Researchers therefore concluded that Genie was acquiring language in the right hemisphere of her brain, and definitively ruled out the possibility that Genie's language lateralization was only reversed.
_	He excludes the possibility that the Gül Mosque is the building where the body of Hagia Theodosia was brought after the end of the Iconoclasm period.
_	On the other hand, he does not exclude the possibility that the building could have been dedicated to Hagia Theodosia in a later period.
_	Starman admits the possibility that the missing Post-"Crisis" Earth-2 Superman is still alive ("Justice Society of America" [second series] #23) despite being lost, whereas Kal-L is dead.
_	Ayala's Scottish mission involved a diplomatic deception, as he was instructed to maintain the possibility that James might marry Catherine of Aragon, whilst knowing that she was more securely promised to Arthur, Prince of Wales.
_	The nearness of the island chain to the Tonga Trench at the south became a possible explanation for these discrepancies as well as the possibility that the islands were formed by magma seeping through cracks in stressed fracture zones.
_	Subsequent seismic analysis indicated the possibility that the overfill could fail due to agitation, allowing the buoyant tube to float upward, misaligning the tracks and possibly overstressing the bolted connections.
_	In this article, he raises the possibility that two things (sounds) that appear to be different may, in fact, be the same.
_	Assuming this theory is correct, many scholars consider the possibility that one chronicler wrote this book.
_	The United Nations Fact Finding Mission on the Gaza Conflict ("UNFFMG") that took place in 2008-2009 accepted the possibility that Hamas launched mortar attacks from the vicinity of a school and from residential homes, sometimes by threat of force against residents.
_	Other authors have noted that because the plant fossils were removed from their original context in the specimen and were heavily prepared, it is no longer possible to follow up on the original work, leaving open the possibility that the plants were washed-in debris.
_	James King of William, editor of the pro-merchant, pro-American Party "Bulletin" whipped the citizens into a frenzy over the possibility that Cora might not be hung for the death of Richardson, and was driven to frenzy when the jury in the trial couldn't reach a decision.
_	In 1821 Mantell mentioned the find of herbivorous teeth and began to consider the possibility that a large herbivorous reptile was present in the strata.
_	Dr.Bianchi's research challenged the first commonly accepted identification of the statue by dating the fragment to between 200 and 100 BC, and by giving merit to the possibility that the statue in fact depicts a goddess.
_	There it is the possibility that a Roman road was built toward south, from Sala Colonia to the area of modern Casablanca.
_	In July 2005, former Apollo astronaut Rusty Schweickart, as chairman of the B612 Foundation, formally asked NASA to investigate the possibility that the asteroid's post-2029 orbit could be in orbital resonance with Earth, which would increase the probability of future impacts.
_	Because most of her hull remains buried in sand, there is the possibility that different hull sections may be uncovered which may reveal more significant information about her construction.
_	Taking the remainder modulo 11 a second time accounts for the possibility that the first remainder is 0.
_	A common theme in Tawada's work is the relationship between words and reality, and in particular the possibility that differences in languages may make assimilation into a different culture impossible.
_	In one unpublished interview with Guantanamo defence attorney Dennis Edney, the two discuss blackmail attempts of witnesses by the FBI and the possibility that Omar Khadr's plea deal was signed without legal counsel.
_	The book itself only hints at the possibility that a proportion of those who died were "executed" after being captured.
_	Some speculation has considered the possibility that these missing five lines were always missing, having never originally existed, their absence itself being a teaching of the text.
_	Mrs. Noble was detained in December 2002 by order of Judge Roberto Marquevich following a lawsuit filed by the Grandmothers of the Plaza de Mayo alleging that the two infants she adopted in 1976, Marcela and Felipe, should submit DNA samples on the possibility that their biological parents may have been abducted by the last dictatorship during their Dirty War against dissidents.
_	Ann Williams doubted that the estates in Berkshire belonged to Siward Barn, noting the possibility that these estates belonged to Siward of Maldon.
_	From a technical point of view, it could be argued that it left open the possibility that the Sultanate might not be abolished and that it could have been amended to make way for a constitutional monarchy, similar to one founded by the French Constitution of 1791.
_	There is also the possibility that this Acilius Strabo may not be the suffect consul discussed above, but a polyonymous senator, Lucius Stertinus Quintillianus Acilius Strabo Gaius Curiatius Maternus Clodius Nummus, consul in 114.
_	Much later in life, in his "Pragmatism: A New Name for Some Old Ways of Thinking" lectures, James also mentions the possibility that God's existence may actually depend upon our belief in his existence.
_	Vertical relativism also accounts for the possibility that cultural values and norms will necessarily change as influencing norms and conditions change in the future.
_	The British journalist wrote that the possibility that what Ceaușescu had seen in both China and North Korea were "vast Potemkin villages for the hoodwinking of gullible foreign guests" was something that never seemed to have crossed his mind.
_	This observation raised the possibility that instances of the STAXI motif function as single-stranded DNA molecules, perhaps during DNA replication or DNA repair.
_	New Testament scholar Robert M. Price has outlined the possibility that some Bible stories are based partly on myth in "The Christ Myth Theory and its problems".
_	After the drilling started, Seismic and volcanic activities in the area threatened the building of the power station, like the major volcanic eruptions less than 2 km from the power station away, introducing the possibility that it would never start operating at all.
_	Rallying behind the Monitor of Earth-8, now calling himself Solomon, they begin to fear that it is not only the anomalies that they must face, but also the virus infecting Karate Kid, Monarch's growing army, whoever is responsible for Jimmy Olsen's powers, and the possibility that a single individual may be behind all of these events.
_	The investigation report gave considerable attention to the possibility that the air crew could have misread their "three-pointer" altimeters, which were designed to warn the pilots with a cross hatch indicator when the altitude was below 10,000 feet.
_	"Princess Royal" arrived at Halifax on 21 November, then spent several days off New York City before she steamed down to the Caribbean to guard against the possibility that Graf Spee would use the Panama Canal.
_	Indicating exceptions with the possibility that women played a more active role in Villanovan culture and that men too had made clothing.
_	The unexpected size of the plumes leaves open the possibility that they may conduct the bulk of the Earth's 44 terawatts of internal heat flow from the core to the surface, and means that the lower mantle convects less than expected, if at all.
_	Carl Atkins' analysis undermines some of the more popular interpretations of this sonnet, largely because he emphasizes the possibility that the poet and the male beloved (or "Fair Youth") had a passionate but platonic friendship, devoid of sexual tension.
_	When she turned out to be alive, concern switched to the possibility that she might be pregnant".
_	There is also the possibility that the state that has been attacked will not take action against the offenders, and will not accuse another state of unlawful action.
_	Their agreement also refers to the anarchic situation, mentioning the possibility that "either pagan or some godless prince or the governor" would seize Gabriel's property.
_	Woodworth had died in office, amidst a political battle with the fledgling American Public Health Association and its allies in the United States Congress over the possibility that a new National Board of Health would supersede the newly revamped MHS (1871).
_	"Time Out" called it a "werewolf movie," but Roger Ebert asserted "Wolfen" "is not about werewolves but is about the possibility that Indians and wolves can exchange souls."
_	Minsky has also written on the possibility that extraterrestrial life may think like humans, permitting communication.
_	First, the stimuli should be identical in all conditions, and the experimenter should only manipulate instructions for directing attention across conditions; this precludes the possibility that stimulus features drive ERP effects rather than focused attention.
_	The organization had a "clandestine character", and all the inner workings of the organization were enshrouded "in deep secrecy", raising the possibility that "the group might take extralegal action against all organized labor."
_	Word of Banks's ejection from the Valley caused consternation in Washington because of the possibility that the audacious Jackson might continue marching north and threaten the capital.
_	Contemporary scholarship disagrees, and finds a variety of possible explanations, including an order from Arcadius ordering him to evacuate the Eastern Empire, the unreliability of his mostly barbarian troops, the revolt of Gildo in Africa or the possibility that he simply was never as close to Alaric as Claudian suggests.
_	However Jabavu declined, citing the possibility that such a move would unite and aggravate reactionary elements in the Cape Parliament and would therefore be counterproductive.
_	Rufino Tamayo founded the Oaxacan school of painting on the principle that although painting must take place on the plastic level, it does not exclude the possibility that the work contain a profound consequence not altogether expressed.
_	Once frozen, they have one last chance to answer all the questions from the beginning, with the possibility that if they answer one incorrectly, the jackpot is lost and their game is over.
_	In the event that one of the poles in the bipolar system is faulted, the current path will switch to ground return, thus allowing the system to continue operating at reduced capacity and reducing the possibility that a pole fault will cause a bipolar outage.
_	A snark "G" with girth greater than γ cannot contain any of the configurations in the set "S", so the reductions in "S" are not strong enough to rule out the possibility that "G" might be a minimal counterexample.
_	Navrozov was concerned with the possibility that China is developing deadly weapons based on nanotechnology; and the need for the United States to counter this threat with its own nanoweapon research.
_	Following the Olympics, China analysts speculated on the possibility that the authorities would begin dealing harshly with Tibetan dissenters after world attention moved off Beijing.
_	Other than the purposeful act of fire-setting itself, there is no mention of the possibility that the tension or affective arousal experienced before the act; the fascination with, interest in, or attraction to fire and its situational contexts (for example, paraphernalia, uses, consequences); or the pleasure, gratification, or relief when setting, witnessing, or participating in the aftermath of fires might be sexual in nature or even contain a sexual arousal component.
_	Hermann Gunkel rules out the possibility that such a sophisticated motif had developed independently in different places.
_	His parents confirmed the police's fear that this time Lee's opponent had an organized crime background and that there was the possibility that a contract was out for his life.
_	The bacteria multiply relatively quickly which increases the possibility that "Curtobacterium flaccumfaciens" can shed from dying or dead plant material.
_	The narrator, with his own bitter memories of that time, cannot discard the possibility that his phone has somehow crossed wires through time.
_	The authors of "How to Have Sex in an Epidemic" were aware of the political risks they took in creating the booklet: Berkowitz noted in his autobiography the possibility that their writing could be used as ammunition by homophobic institutions and leaders.
_	There is also the possibility that the issues wouldn't even be considered if turnout remains so low.
_	Conditions at Hut Point were gloomy and depressing, with an unrelieved diet and no normal comforts; Mackintosh in particular found the squalor of the hut intolerable, and dreaded the possibility that, caught at Hut Point, they might miss the return of the ship.
_	Researchers also suggest the possibility that these megalithic cemeteries could have been a focal spot of the cultural landscape and served the purpose of bringing people together.
_	Justice Brennan, writing for the majority, first swiftly ruled out the possibility that the meal allowances payments are not "income" under §61(a):
_	He observed: "Some researchers had begun to express concern over the possibility that a collision between two pieces of debris might spawn a large number of fragments, thereby increasing the probability of further collisions and further fragments, producing a chain reaction that might put so much debris into low earth orbit as to create a barrier to future space exploration.
_	Having been raised on the idea of 'Space, the Final Frontier', I was both appalled and fascinated by the possibility that it might instead become an impenetrable ceiling only a hundred or so miles above our heads."
_	In "Blues People" Baraka explores the possibility that the history of black Americans can be traced through the evolution of their music.
_	They suggest the possibility that sociality may play a major role in the mediation of solitary faces".
_	They officially folded in July 2006, but chairman Bill Holden did not rule out the possibility that the club could be re-launched in the future.
_	Although scholars acknowledge the possibility that some of these influences may have come through the limited trade the Tagalogs had with the Srivijaya, it is believed that most of the Hindu and Buddhist elements were incorporated as a result of the more extensive trade the Tagalogs later had with the Majapahit, while the Islamic influences were incorporated due to the Tagalog maginoo class' connections with the Sultanate of Brunei, and the Tagalog's trading relations throughout Malaysia.
_	Beginning in early 2005, journalists, activists and academics such as Seymour Hersh, Scott Ritter, Joseph Cirincione and Jorge E. Hirsch began publishing claims that United States' concerns over the allege threat posed by the possibility that Iran may have a nuclear weapons program might lead the US government to take military action against that country.
_	In December 2013, the Polish ambassador to Armenia said that the EU and Armenia were discussing a less in-depth bilateral agreement on their relations, and did "not rule out the possibility that it may be an association agreement in a different form".
_	The Court also held that the identification requirement did not violate Hiibel's Fifth Amendment rights because he had no reasonable belief that his name would be used to incriminate him; however, the Court left open the possibility that Fifth Amendment privilege might apply in a situation where there "was" a reasonable belief that giving a name could be incriminating.
_	In a more speculative vein, he has (from the 1970s onwards) been interested in anthropic reasoning, and the possibility that our visible universe is part of a vaster "multiverse".
_	Of even more concern is that the memory stick on the sample player was exposed and could be removed by candidates, leaving open the possibility that candidates may inadvertently remove the memory stick during the test and render the player inoperable.
_	Although Mattern et al. attempted to explore the possibility that these protozoal viruses could function like bacteriophages, they found no significant changes in "Entamoeba histolytica" virulence when infected by viruses.
_	These efforts demonstrated to other Malagasy language writers the versatility of the language and the possibility that it could be used for any literary form.
_	(However, after he later became emperor, Shi Jingtang honored Shi Shaoyong's concubine Lady Liu, first as consort dowager, and then as empress dowager, suggesting the possibility that Lady He was Shi Shaoyong's wife and Shi Jingtang's "legal" mother, but that Lady Liu was his birth mother.)
_	Before the affair broke, Bligh had been advised of the possibility that Profumo had compromised national security through a sexual affair with a 19-year-old showgirl, Christine Keeler, who was a known associate of the society osteopath Stephen Ward, a suspected Soviet sympathiser.
_	In July 2012 in response to public inquiries, and the possibility that some viewers may have mistaken the programme for a documentary, the National Ocean Service (a branch of NOAA) made the unusual declaration that "no evidence of aquatic humanoids has ever been found".
_	In "Guardians of Destiny", a brief reference is made to the Kyragem from "The Legend of Kyrandia", while "Kyrandia's" sequel "The Hand of Fate" has an easter egg where letters written by Scotia hint at the possibility that both Westwood Studios fantasy games take place in the same continuity.
_	A decline in cotton prices in 1925 raised the possibility that Southern congressmen would join with Western congressmen in supporting a major agricultural bill.
_	Also, a mysterious backdrop relating to dinosaurs is revealed via in-game radios that will sometimes carry programs that discuss the history of dinosaurs and the possibility that some might still be alive.
_	He still held out the possibility that Rome might have to step in.
_	Questions arose about whether it was a community event or a political event due to the possibility that the funds raised at the dinner might be used for a Mayoral campaign.
_	However, there is also the possibility that the retaining wall might be of a much later date, having been built using megaliths taken from the temple.
_	The introduction of as the league's eighteenth club this season created the possibility that Geelong could again lose an uncontracted player to a new club, as had previously occurred when Gold Coast entered the league the prior season and signed Gary Ablett.
_	This raises the possibility that the bed was either that of the deceased woman or a significant bed of some other person.
_	If all examples of the RNA were upstream of homologous genes, there is the possibility that the RNAs were conserved in that position simply by inheritance.
_	This would make unconsciousness an unlikely cause for this error, since the engineer was able to compose and send the message; instead a psychology professor from the University of Utah raised the possibility that "inattentional blindness" caused the engineer to fail to see the signal.
_	After the 2018 Danforth shooting, posters on an incel message board expressed excitement with the possibility that the perpetrator might be an incel, although no motive has been identified.
_	Schleicher for a long time refused to take seriously the possibility that Papen was working to bring him down, as Plank speaking for Schleicher told a journalist: "Let him [Papen] talk, he's completely insignificant.
_	Xenopol also argues against the possibility that Aaron was born to a Prince and his Jewish mistress, and proposes that he may have been fully Jewish.
_	If a country's government is corrupt, there is also the possibility that INGO funds are being siphoned off by the government.
_	By holding that diminished ability to use a phone or email system constitutes damage, the Sixth Circuit has left open the possibility that coordinated phone or email campaigns – common tools of civic action – will be subject to liability under the CFAA.
_	What makes this situation unusual is the existence of tangible solutions and the possibility that they can be widely applied.
_	There is disagreement over the possibility that proteins with homology to clathrins are represented in the "G. obscuriglobus" proteome.
_	Years later, there was the possibility that the Western River Expedition would be built.
_	The men of the Gordon family had served as officers in the British Army for four generations, and as a son of a general, Gordon was brought up to be the fifth generation; the possibility that Gordon would pursue anything other than a military career seems never to have been considered by his parents.
_	MacLaurin does not mention the possibility that the center of the series of diffraction rings produced when light is shone through a small hole may be black, but he does point to the inverse situation wherein the shadow produced by a small circular object can paradoxically have a bright center.
_	Therefore, the clinical importance of pharmacogenetics and gene by environment interactions comes from the possibility that genomic, along with environmental information, will allow more accurate predictions of an individual’s drug response.
_	Troubled by the possibility that her son has returned from the grave, Rachel shares her troubles with a young and handsome lighthouse keeper named Angus (Matheson) and the two spark a romance that suddenly goes awry when she learns that Angus died seven years ago by committing suicide after murdering his wife and her lover in the lighthouse.
_	This study brings up the possibility that if ants have the capacity for empathy and/or altruism, these complex processes may be derived from primitive and simpler mechanisms.
_	The investigation did not exclude the possibility that Israeli forces were responding to fire from an armed Palestinian group, as Israel said, but said that this and similar attacks "cannot meet the test of what a reasonable commander would have determined to be an acceptable loss of civilian life for the military advantage sought".
_	Unlike previous seasons, only one point was offered to the driver who recorded the fastest lap of any race to reduce the possibility that the championship could be decided by this additional award.
_	This may be on the possibility that young sympathizers can share information and images and create Facebook groups in a decentralized way.
_	The research paper's lead author, Hamish McGowan, suggests further investigation into the resulting cultural collapse and the possibility that another ethnic group supplanted the Bradshaw artists.
_	Ptolemy's maps, which became well known in Europe during the Renaissance, did not actually depict such a continent, but they did show an Africa which had no southern oceanic boundary (and which therefore might extend all the way to the South Pole), and also raised the possibility that the Indian Ocean was entirely enclosed by land.
_	Initial findings from the necropsy ruled out the possibility that it could have been crushed by Mei Xiang.
_	Later authors sometimes noted the possibility that the grey poplar was a hybrid.
_	This raised the possibility that the law was so vague that it might fail the section 1 requirement that a limit be "prescribed by law."
_	The historian Barbara Yorke mentions the possibility that Seaxburh and her namesake Seaxburh of Wessex were the same person, but also notes that the accounts of Seaxburh's religious life at Ely contradict this suggestion.
_	Hume but denies the possibility that skepticism could possibly be the final end of reason or could possibly serve its best interests.
_	This result excludes the possibility that 3-year olds' motor-spatial imitation problems are due to difficulty learning (i.e., encoding and recalling) novel spatial rules in general.
_	3-year old's success in the goal emulation condition excludes the possibility that 3-year olds' motor-spatial imitation problem is due to difficulty vicariously learning (i.e., because of a lack of interest, failure to attend, problems inferring goals, etc.) a novel spatial rule from a model.
_	The prince's arrest caused great consternation among the Japanese, because it opened the possibility that Emperor Shōwa and more senior members of the imperial household might also face prosecution for war crimes.
_	The type of job board that he had in mind differed from a static Craigslist-type online bulletin board by being enriched with features that would exclude the possibility that employers give out advance payments for work that does not get delivered when agreed or that does not meet their requirements, and the chance that contractors deliver their work online but never hear back from employers who choose not to pay.
_	This study leaves open the possibility that filgrastim may still be appropriate for patients who have symptoms of infection, or at times other than shortly after cladribine treatment.
_	This could lead to delays and of course, the possibility that signatures could be forged and documents altered, especially when multiple signatures from different people located in different locations are required.
_	Although the monorail company reported that any such accident was "unlikely" as six bolts would have to be removed for it to occur and furthermore, a check of all 23 other safety wheels on the train involved did not turn up any other issues, the high court judgement ruled that the monorail company "failed to provide a reasonable explanation as to how the safety wheel had come off the train and instead relied on the possibility that there had been tampering by unknown persons".
_	On 22 September 2009, APEX declared a trading halt to its shares and the possibility that it may go into voluntary suspension of trading to receive enough time to complete another capital raising.
_	On the other hand, alternative judicial appointment methods have their own problems such as the possibility that judges cannot be appointed because decision-makers are unable to agree on the matter.
_	The Bible was written down centuries before Hebrew diacritics were introduced, and there is thus no certain knowledge of how the name was pronounced during the man's own lifetime - leaving open the possibility that at that time it was no dishonor for a major tribal leader to be named "Dog".
_	In January 2014, a "Guardian" interview with Clark raised the possibility that she could take over as UN Secretary-General after Ban Ki-moon's retirement in 2016.
_	Physicist Stephen Hawking, Microsoft founder Bill Gates, and SpaceX founder Elon Musk have expressed concerns about the possibility that AI could evolve to the point that humans could not control it, with Hawking theorizing that this could "spell the end of the human race".
_	Alongside similar sites at Boyndie, Balnageith, Easter Galcantray and Tarradale, the possibility that Thomshill represents a Roman fort has been seen as evidence that the Roman Army under Agricola occupied Moray after the Battle of Mons Graupius in AD84.
_	This caused some newspapers to report on the possibility that she might never sing again.
_	This does not however exclude the possibility that such diseases may be found in the future.
_	The discovery of fission raised the possibility that an extremely powerful atomic bomb could be created.
_	However, White does not dismiss the possibility that in a free market people might prefer a commodity standard, such as the gold standard.
_	New co-counsellors are usually alerted to the possibility that they may develop strong feelings about people they counsel with and are advised to stick to co-counselling with them until they have a clearer idea about what is going on.
_	This rules out the possibility that by "to be a man", "not to be a man" is meant.
_	Such criticisms do not necessarily allow for the possibility that "Verstehen" does not involve "complete" understanding.
_	Boltz (1979: 431) suggests the possibility that the matching names "fangxiang(shi)", "fangliang", "wangliang", and "wangxiang" are all derived from the same Proto-Chinese "**BZjang" "see" etymon, with him as a "Master of Visions" or "Imaginator" and them as "visions" or "specters" from the Latin "spectrum" "appearance; apparition", and to use the same root, the "fangxiangshi" "was in fact exorcising "images", or "visions", of himself."
_	Investigators and Kesse's friends and family have remained open to the possibility that Kesse was a victim to human trafficking, but do not consider it likely.
_	The Martin B-26 suffered only two fatal accidents during its first year of flight, from November 1940 to November 1941: a crash shortly after takeoff near Martin's Middle River plant in Maryland (cause unknown, but engine malfunction strongly suggested) and the loss of a 38th Bombardment Group B-26 when its vertical stabilizer and rudder separated from the aircraft at altitude (cause unknown, but the accident report discussed the possibility that a canopy hatch broke off and struck the vertical stabilizer).
_	Hertwig and colleagues discuss the possibility that "Ansonia echinata", known only from male specimens (and one unsexed juvenile), could be conspecific with "Ansonia vidua".
_	The movie stars Joanna Kerns in the movie's lead role, seismologist Clare Winslow, who tries to warn city leaders of the possibility that a powerful earthquake may strike southern California.
_	The overall themes that emerge in these paintings are the "supremacy of the Spaniards", the possibility that Indians could become Spaniards through miscegenation with Spaniards and the "regression to an earlier moment of racial development" that mixing with Blacks would cause to Spaniards.
_	While waiting for the publication of Broshi and Eshel's results, Patrich, anticipating them, doubted the possibility that there were once "significantly more habitable caves" cut into the marl, pointing to the lack of paths and suitable terrain.
_	To counteract the possibility that gamers would grow impatient with the wait for the Nintendo 64 and purchase one of the several competing consoles already on the market, Nintendo ran ads for the system well in advance of its announced release dates, with slogans like "Wait for it..." and "Is it worth the wait?
_	This raises the possibility that the Hesperornithes not only included flying members (see also "Enaliornis"), but that their families might have evolved flightlessness independently.
_	Although the "Mo Jing" is the oldest existent book on geometry in China, there is the possibility that even older written material existed.
_	"I am dedicated to opening space for all of humanity and, with SpaceDev well-managed and growing, I plan to spend the next several years creating the possibility that anyone who wants to go to space will be able to, safely and affordably," said Benson in September, 2006.
_	Only this one was preserved, which doesn't exclude the possibility that there are other, undiscovered ones.
_	the possibility that the Batavians may therefore have been Celtic-speaking.
_	With the possibility that Li Keyong might intervene removed, Han submitted a petition demanding the deaths of Li Sizhou, Li Jiepi, and the other imperial princes, on accusations of treason.
_	Högel admitted to an undisclosed number of deaths but in most cases was unable to remember specific details, although he did not deny the possibility that he was responsible.
_	However, this would not rule out the possibility that geons are stabilized by quantum effects.
_	John George IV was either ignorant of the possibility that he and Billa were committing incest, or he disregarded the claim as a malicious rumor.
_	"Reswitching" is basically the possibility that the same method of production may became the most profitable one at more than one rate of profit, i.e., a production method may become the most profitable one both at low and at high rates of return, even when in the medium range it is dominated by other methods.
_	Fearful of the possibility that protesters or radicals would try to kill them for their supposed "anti-Christ" stance, the group's manager, Brian Epstein, contemplated cancelling the tour altogether.
_	Wik raised the possibility that those acts could be invalid and showed that the "freehold test" (the principle used to determine where proposed activities could be done without regard to native title) in relation to future acts was inappropriate.
_	According to the defence, this raised the possibility that Fuhrman had planted key evidence as part of a racially motivated plot against Simpson.
_	This discovery suggests the possibility that P2 and P3 could be used as a biological control agent when other methods do not work.
_	He started to explore the possibility that the planet Mars might have an elliptical orbit rather than a circular one.
_	There is research interest in the structure and electronic properties of GaTe because of the possibility that it, or related compounds, may have applications in the electronics industry.
_	The reason is unknown, but the study suggests the possibility that a full-agonist metabolite may be generated in humans but not animals previously tested or else that there are significant differences in benzodiazepine receptor population in animals and humans.
_	Some also expressed concern regarding the possibility that Doré might stand as a presidential candidate; his own statements on that possibility were unclear.
_	Trump's relatively poor polling in some traditionally Republican states, such as Utah, raised the possibility that they could vote for Clinton, despite easy wins there by recent Republican nominees.
_	A separate but less imminent forecast may include a fire weather watch, which is issued to alert fire and land management agencies to the possibility that Red Flag conditions may exist beyond the first forecast period (12 hours).
_	Dewar suggested the possibility that it might have been connected to the term "Wurse", used for the Devil in Layamon's "Brut", or to the 17th-century Italian term "Oser", again used for the Devil.
_	One objection to the technical aspects of the project is the possibility that the groundwater may trigger earthquakes.
_	The film hints at the possibility that Ann will wait for him.
_	The warrant was reportedly based on the possibility that Page was acting as an agent of a foreign government, i.e., Russia.
_	In other words, Tarr's film suggests the possibility that it is only on an abstract plane that murder committed by and on strangers causes a stir and demands an investigation.
_	The parliamentary report suggests according to the New York Times that Reactor No. 1, in particular, might have suffered earthquake damage, including the possibility that pipes burst from the shaking, leading to a loss of coolant even before the tsunami hit the plant about 30 minutes after the initial earthquake.
_	Brockett also suggests the possibility that the satyr play was the first form of drama from which both tragedy and comedy gradually emerged.
_	Turkey is expected to receive approximately US$200 million in transit fees per year in the initial years of operation, with the possibility that the fees increase to US$290 million per year from year 17 to year 40.
_	Given the as-if nature of this position, similar to that of Hans Vaihinger, there is always the possibility that there may be practical or pragmatic concerns in building domain ontologies which actually trump the realist pursuit, and Arp is mindful of this possibility.
_	The authors did not rule out the possibility that someone else provided the false fossils to Dawson, but ruled out several other suspects, including Teilhard de Chardin and Doyle, based on the skill and knowledge demonstrated by the forgeries, which closely reflected ideas fashionable in biology at the time.
_	They ignore the possibility that activity expands at expense to experiential intricacy.
_	In spring 624, Li Fuwei died suddenly—with official sources suggesting that he was poisoned by the substances he was taking as a part of alchemical exercises, but also, in a veiled manner, leaving open the possibility that he was assassinated on Emperor Gaozu's orders.
_	The article, entitled "Max Baucus's Fish Sense - Protectionism often hurts the protectionist," outlined this controversial topic in Washington and underlined the possibility that the U.S. Department of Agriculture could effectively ban imports from Vietnam of pangasius fish, which are similar to U.S.-produced catfish.
_	He had not been considered a major candidate, but his death raised the possibility that the election would be delayed.
_	"The finding that D dopamine receptors are substantially increased in schizophrenic patients who have never been treated with neuroleptic drugs raises the possibility that dopamine receptors are involved in the schizophrenic disease process itself.
_	Models support the possibility that this hypothesis is evolutionarily stable but empirical tests are lacking.
_	Kim Ryholt, a professor of Egyptology at the University of Copenhagen, suggests the possibility that the names on the canon had been misarranged and offers two possible regnal lengths for Senusret II: 10+ years, or 19 years.
_	The Amsterdam merchants were very interested in the possibility that the American Revolution after 1775 would reopen the American Colonies to free trade, in contravention of the British Navigation Acts.
_	Waad has no more title to the name than his companions on the Minion, and infinitely less than the sixteen Englishmen who accompanied Sebastian Cabot, not to mention the possibility that were English sailors among Columbus’s crews.
_	Shotguns dedicated to being used for bean bag rounds are often visibly modified with either yellow or green markings, or bright orange stocks and stops, to reduce the possibility that a user might inadvertently load lethal munitions into the weapon.
_	For example, it does not judge a “slum" as a blight on society; it sees the possibility that such a settlement may be an opportunity channel for entry into the city.
_	However, the possibility that this is a Brit.[ish] name meaning 'swift river' from the same root as 'Calder' cannot be ruled out altogether." (OE=Old English, OFr=Old French, Brit.=British language).
_	Thus, because patients who are candidates for DCD are not known to be brain dead either before or shortly after they are declared dead by cardiocirculatory criteria, the possibility that they may experience distress must be considered.
_	Disadvantages include the possibility that a patient will use the pain medication nonmedically, self-administering the pain medication to get high.
_	In "Intelligent Life in the Universe" (1966) astrophysicists I. S. Shklovski and Carl Sagan devote a chapter to the argument that scientists and historians should seriously consider the possibility that extraterrestrial contact occurred during recorded history; however, Shklovski and Sagan stressed that these ideas were speculative and unproven.
_	Whether the transmitted fragments can be considered archaic or not, their small number and uninformative context leave open the possibility that they belonged to an expanded version of the "Works and Days", for the fragments' contents—the paths of the stars and their significance—betray a similarity to the astronomical advice in that poem that is, in the opinion of one modern scholar, "obvious."
_	On 4 January 2011, Freeview announced details for the launch of ITV1+1, together with the possibility that both STV and UTV will launch their own timeshift services, STV +1 and UTV +1 in Scotland and Northern Ireland respectively.
_	John's position was undermined by Walter's relative popularity and by the news that Richard had married whilst in Cyprus, which presented the possibility that Richard would have legitimate children and heirs.
_	He notes that in a sermon of September 25, 1539, "Luther tried to demonstrate through several examples that individual Jews could not convert permanently, and in several passages of "The Jews and Their Lies", Luther appeared to reject the possibility that the Jews would or could convert."
_	In view of this, Vincent Delieuvin, curator of 16th-century Italian painting at the Louvre museum states that the sketch and these other copies must have been inspired by another version, while Frank Zöllner states that the sketch brings up the possibility that Leonardo executed another work on the subject of Mona Lisa.
_	In combination with the existence of the Arabika Submarine Depression, all these facts point to the possibility that karst systems in Arabika could have originated in response to the Messinian salinity crisis (5.96–5.33 Ma) when the Black Sea (Eastern Paratethys) could have almost dried up, as did the adjacent Mediterranean, where the dramatic sea level drop of ~1,500 m is well established.
_	Upon cross-examination, Gacy's defense team attempted to raise the possibility that all 33 murders were accidental erotic asphyxia deaths:
_	However, Ian Hacking noted that traditional Dutch book arguments did not specify Bayesian updating: they left open the possibility that non-Bayesian updating rules could avoid Dutch books.
_	He quickly eliminated the possibility that the fourth angle is obtuse, as had Saccheri and Khayyám, and then proceeded to prove many theorems under the assumption of an acute angle.
_	Dennison suggests the possibility that Hunt was painting the scene from memory, when he was finishing the painting in London after he had returned from his trip to the Dead Sea, and mis-remembered it.
_	This analysis of the need for the person to identify persecution of the type described in the Refugee Convention does not exclude the possibility that a people for countries experiencing severe impacts of climate change can come with the Refugee Convention.
_	However, when explaining his decision not to run Ciaccia specifically mentioned the possibility that his (mostly non-francophone) supporters would have felt alienated from the rest of the party.
_	A number of conspiracy theories have been raised around Van Dorn's death, including the possibility that Dr. Peters was motivated more by politics than the sanctity of his marriage.
_	Criticism is levelled against solicitor advocates due to the possibility that Defendants' interests may not be best protected by an advocate who also works for the solicitors employed by the Defendant.
_	He continued as Reds manager until, in 1989 it was revealed that he was being investigated for sports gambling, including the possibility that he had bet on teams with which he was involved.
_	The uplifted right arm is missing, but the possibility that the god holds out to the child a bunch of grapes to excite his desire would reduce the subject to a genre figure, C. Waldstein noted in 1882, remarking that Hermes looks past the child, "the clearest and most manifest outward sign of inward dreaming".
_	The United States, United Kingdom, and France were finally concerned about the possibility that the Treaty could forbid the transit of nuclear weapons through the territory.
_	The allegations made against him generally include suspicions about the extremely fast increase of his activity as a construction entrepreneur in years 1961–63, hinting at the possibility that in those years he received money from unknown and possibly illegal sources.
_	After a laborious exercise in draining one of these bogs (the so-called "Suslov's crater", in diameter), he found an old stump on the bottom, ruling out the possibility that it was a meteoric crater.
_	Just the same, the law communicates the message that faith tradition does not (and should not) consider the possibility that women might have different yet valid perspectives."
_	There is the possibility that "Homo sapiens" is still undergoing genetic change.
_	The scale of the activity and the lack of large game on the island, suggest the possibility that Colonsay contained a community with a largely vegetarian diet for the time they spent on the island.
_	According to the method described above, the tablebase must allow the possibility that a given piece might occupy any of the 64 squares.
_	For instance, in labor economics hysteresis refers to the possibility that periods of high unemployment tend to increase the rate-of-unemployment-below-which-inflation-begins-to-accelerate, commonly referred to as the natural rate of unemployment or non-accelerating inflation rate of unemployment (NAIRU).
_	Dumville allows for the possibility that Secundinus participated in the Palladian mission, but is more hesitant.
_	The 1938 discovery of nuclear fission in uranium, by Lise Meitner and Otto Hahn, raised the possibility that an extremely powerful atomic bomb could be created.
_	Furthermore, he hints at the possibility that this system of mindprints is the basis for all general epistemology and ontology, and it seems to exist at all levels of being: physical, biological, social, noetic, at both macro and micro scales.
_	Alessandro Vezzosi, director of the Museo Ideale Leonardo da Vinci at Vinci said in 2011 that he had excluded the possibility that it was a self-portrait, but that the painting "remains intriguing because it adds a new element to the Leonardo puzzle".
_	This allowed for one of them to fail, and also limited the possibility that (if the train was suddenly forced to stop) the locomotive's contact-shoe might be short of the next section of energized 3rd-rail.
_	She also criticized the researchers' explanation for the unexpected results, as they discounted the possibility that men may be more sensitive to fear than women.
_	Brereton (1999) argues that the defect is a conscious device employed by the rishi to express puzzlement at the possibility that the world may "not" be created, parallel to the syntactic defect of pada 7d, which ends in a subordinate clause without a governing clause:
_	Questions about causality often come from the possibility that social support levels may be tied to other traits that also play a role in depression.
_	At times there is no record of the specific date a team won the championship or who they defeated, leaving the possibility that there may have been other championship reigns in that period of time.
_	Li (1974) also noted the possibility that it was related to geomyoids based on the bilophodont tooth.
_	Even worse is the possibility that the unrecognised dimensionality in RWA can cause a statistical artifact to arise in such regressions, which can reduce or even reverse some of the relationships.
_	On 24 July 2014, it was reported that Ruffley was under investigation by the Conservatives' Chief Whip, Michael Gove, with the possibility that disciplinary measures may be taken against him.
_	The Payolas lack of State-side exposure was attributed in some quarters to the possibility that American radio programmers were refusing to play any Payolas music simply because the band's name would remind the public of one of the radio industry's greatest scandals (and its ongoing practices).
_	While the Vatican confirmed that "conditional re-ordination" did not exclude the possibility that the men had previously been validly ordained, it held to the view that the doubts over validity were genuine:
_	Another study of the Lake Taimyr wolf found that its comparatively small size and characters of the cheekteeth and skull raised the possibility that it might have been a domesticated or semi-domesticated animal.
_	However, the possibility that the vases depict scenes from Euripides has not been definitively closed and even if they depict scenes from Astydamas' play they may be relevant since Astydamas may have been influenced by Euripides.
_	But the manner also includes future imminent dangers, such as the possibility that single attacker might imminently be joined by others.
_	Being classically educated Englishmen, Grenfell and Hunt were mainly interested in the possibility that Oxyrhynchus might reveal the lost masterpieces of classical Greek literature.
_	The ceilings of 3% for budget deficit and 60% for public debt were maintained, but the decision to declare a country in excessive deficit can now rely on certain parameters: the behaviour of the cyclically adjusted budget, the level of debt, the duration of the slow growth period and the possibility that the deficit is related to productivity-enhancing procedures.
_	Indian news outlets reported the FBI was investigating the possibility that Gen. Mahmood Ahmed ordered Saeed Sheikh to send the $100,000 to Atta, while most Western media outlets only reported his connections to the Taliban as the reason for his departure.
_	Analysis of WASP-24's spectrum ruled out the possibility that WASP-24 is a rapidly rotating star, which could make confirmation of a planet difficult, or that it is a spectroscopic binary star system.
_	Russian military expert Vadim Lukashevich argued on TV Rain that the spatial orientation of the rocket at the moment of explosion did not exclude the possibility that it was launched from Snizhne, as the report claimed.
_	Consideration must be given the possibility that this technique may cause individual clients to switch between individual servers in mid-session.
_	On the possibility that the heir to the throne of Aragon would also become King of Castile, Louis XI of France officially positioned himself on the side of Joanna and Afonso in September 1475.
_	A final shot shows Reptilicus's foot, which had been blown off earlier by the Danish Navy's depth charges, sinking to the floor of the ocean, raising the possibility that it could regenerate into a new Reptilicus.
_	And while it is certain that only Jeremiah knew the language of the original, it is quite impossible to rule out the possibility that his wife’s contribution was limited to copying the day’s work in longhand when her husband had gone to sleep, exhausted with dictating throughout the day."
_	The "Daily Star", quoting an unnamed source, reported that Lebanese security officials were considering the possibility that the cyclists may have been smuggled back into Syria.
_	Among these was Louis Joxe, due to the possibility that his suggestion of spying on US nuclear secrets was in fact a Soviet plan he was carrying out.
_	Researchers have considered the possibility that these drongos possess theory of mind, not fully shown in any animal other than humans, but doubt this capability.
_	In debt and facing the possibility that she would no longer be able to dance because of a knee injury, she committed suicide in Berlin on 31 December 1967.
_	Although his precise motivations for enlisting are debated, his testimony helped frame Gren, his squadmate in the war, for spying, which raises the possibility that he himself might have been involved in military espionage on behalf of the Syndicate and chose to pin it on his admirer.
_	Showcasing interviews and talks by Dr. Derek Yach, a former World Health Organization tobacco control chief; Clive Bates, a prominent anti-smoking activist; and many other experts, Biebert narrates the possibility that e-cigarettes may be able to save a majority of the billion lives that could be lost to tobacco.
_	In 2009, FBI investigators were unable to match the bullets from the shooting to those guns carried by Blackwater contractors, leaving open the possibility that insurgents also fired at the victims.
_	In 2017, the last chapter of "The Man from the Train", briefly discusses the murders at Hinterkaifeck and the possibility that they might have been committed by the titular serial killer.
_	The cause of DID is unknown and widely debated, with debate occurring between supporters of different hypotheses: that DID is a reaction to trauma; that DID is produced by inappropriate psychotherapeutic techniques that cause a patient to enact the role of a patient with DID; and newer hypotheses involving memory processing that allows for the possibility that trauma-induced dissociation can occur after childhood in DID, as it does in PTSD.
_	Others have denied that anxiety's indirect influence on voting behavior has been proven to the exclusion of alternative explanations, such as the possibility that less preferred candidates produce feelings of anxiety, as opposed to the reverse.
_	NIH forwarded the complaint to the University of Pittsburgh, which found that Needleman didn't "fabricate, falsify or plagiarize", but a Preliminary Inquiry Panel said it could not exclude the possibility that "misrepresentation" had occurred.
_	In a 1979 volume of the Bulletin of the New York Academy of Medicine, William Ober’s article "Notes on Placentophagy" evaluates the possibility that certain ancient cultures that practiced human sacrifice may also have practiced human placentophagy, including Egyptians, Tasians, Badarians, Amrateans, Gerzeans, Semainians.
_	Since most of the remaining ancient sources covering this period are pro-Roman, one cannot rule out the possibility that Rome encouraged Saguntum to defy Hannibal.
_	Bandura accepts the possibility that an individual's behavior may be conditioned through the use of consequences.
_	And at another point implying the possibility that the sex was in fact real:
_	This findings rules out the possibility that the musical excerpts merely primed an emotional state that was (in)consistent with the emotional content of the target word.
_	PBCore version 1.2.1 was published to better accommodate the possibility that a media asset may have multiple instantiations with various technical attributes.
_	This may be due to differences in pharmacology or potency between CI-966 and tiagabine or might be accounted for the possibility that the initial doses of CI-966 studied in humans simply were too high.
_	Piller said that it was suggested that the episodes could serve as an introduction to a new alien species, but he supported the possibility that they act as a farewell to the Kazon storylines.
_	The film is a mockumentary which examines the possibility that Adolf Hitler did not commit suicide at the end of World War II in 1945.
_	The study further indicates the possibility that "Tyrannosaurus" may have driven other tyrannosaurids that were native to North America extinct through competition.
_	This system raised the possibility that the two top-ranked teams in the final poll would not play each other in a bowl game, even in situations when there was a clear-cut top two.
_	She also said, “I would not rule out the possibility that this act was committed by the secret services, with the aid of hackers or pirates based in Tunisia or abroad."
_	Pruss, along with other airship crewmen, maintained that the disaster was caused by sabotage, and dismissed the possibility that it was sparked by lightning or static electricity.
_	Again, the possibility that "behaviour-evoking-situations" might be the more parsimonious mechanism of the expression of social behavior, and fully compatible with inclusive fitness theory, has often been underemphasized.
_	Whereas other ministers such as Malcolm Rifkind wished to imply that British Euro membership was unlikely, Clarke fought successfully to maintain the possibility that Britain might join a single currency under a Conservative Government, but conceded that such a move could only take place with the mandate of a referendum.
_	Eric Goldman of IGN gave the episode 8 out of 10 saying "I do think the show needs to finally stop playing so coy with so many carrot-dangling ideas – this episode didn't do anything to kill the possibility that Barney is marrying Robin at that wedding, after all.
_	He rejected the possibility that the name "Assam" ("Asam") could be derived from "Aham" (Ahom).
_	In the year 2015, spaceship IC-1 (Interstellar Colony #1) travels toward a planet similar to Earth to explore the possibility that the population problem on Earth can eventually be solved there.
_	Additionally, the University of Cauca offers the possibility that members of the university community to register different kinds of programs and recreational sports.
_	He is one of the co-authors of a paper that appeared in "Science" in 1996, raising the possibility that a meteorite from Mars, ALH84001, contained traces of Martian life.
_	The existence and plans of this shadowy organization are revealed bit by bit but there is always the possibility that the Trystero does not exist.
_	Founding members Fran and Will Parrish face the possibility that their comfortable marriage may not be as infallible as they once thought.
_	One of the assessors Hilding Bergstrand concluded that "one cannot, at this point, find much support for the possibility that the work of Fibiger and Yamagiwa will have great importance in the solving of the riddle of cancer.
_	Lisa Schwarzbaum writing for "Entertainment Weekly" deduced that ""Mission to Mars" wants us to think about lofty things: the bravery of explorers, the ingenuity of our nation's space program, the humility required to comprehend the possibility that we earthlings are not the be-all and end-all of creation.
_	Because of the "walk in" nature of NATWT, the tunnel was designed with the possibility that someone could accidentally be locked in the tunnel.
_	Police considered the possibility that the two cases could be related.
_	At the time of the writing of the book in 1966, McAlister was aware that many sources that could be used in his research were still classified, and he articulated the possibility that relevant information would be contained in the then classified documents.
_	Szára's research explored both the possibility that some tryptamines (DMT, in particular) might contribute to psychosis by forming in the brain as well as the possibility that some psychedelics might be useful in psychotherapy.
_	Mortier and Davout were so wary of the possibility that the inert Kutuzov might attack that they immediately joined the throng of troops, mobs and wagons rushing that moment to Liady.
_	They suggested the possibility that he turned off Tina's regulator and held her until she was unconscious, then turned the air back on and let her sink before surfacing himself.
_	The strange promotion of Basil to co-emperor in May 867 lends some support to the possibility that at least Leo was actually Michael III's illegitimate son.
_	Analysis of his hair found no conclusive traces of cocaine, codeine or morphine, making it unlikely that he had a long-term opioid addiction; however, this does not exclude the possibility that he was intoxicated or that he took hallucinogenic drugs before his death.
_	On June 29, 2007 the Supreme Court agreed to hear outstanding habeas corpus, opening up the possibility that they might overturn some or all of the Military Commissions Act.
_	She was very apprehensive about the possibility that the Republic could become a major naval power and a major competitor of England.
_	As increasing concerns are raised regarding the environmental risks related to breast, the BEIR VII report cited evidence that suggests that "radiation may interact synergistically with other risk factors for breast cancer", raising the possibility that endocrine disrupting chemicals like PCBs and dioxins might combine to increase the risks associated with radiation beyond that which would be caused by either separately.
_	Although the style of armor described as being found with the skeleton certainly does not sound similar to anything worn by early European colonists who settled the area, the possibility that the skeleton belonged to some early settler cannot be entirely discounted.
_	The Brandenburg state authorities, concerned about damage to the region's image and the possibility that the area would become a pilgrimage site for Nazi supporters, attempted to destroy the design by removing 43 of the 100 larch trees in 1995.
_	The fact that the building was described as ‘old’ in 1936 suggests the possibility that it may have been built much earlier.
_	DeFede did not know that Amuso had placed a contract on his life but, during DeFede's imprisonment, he was demoted from capo to soldier and this alerted him to the possibility that he had fallen out of favor with boss Vic Amuso and could be in serious trouble.
_	Henry I's biographer C. Warren Hollister suggests the possibility that Osmund was in part responsible for Henry's education; Henry was consistently in the bishop's company during his formative years, around 1080 to 1086.
_	He told the New York Times, “We have never seen as midnight an hour as we face this coming week,” Bishop Ellis said, referring to the possibility that Congress would soon vote on a deal to give the carmakers enough money to stay afloat into next year.
_	The meteorologist Sakuhei Fujiwhara wrote "Atmospheric Light Phenomena" in 1933, but in it, he wrote that he did not know the cause of shiranui, and due to some who profited from delighting sightseers, he pointed out the possibility that they are from noctiluca.
_	Hank travels to Transia in search of the High Evolutionary, who discusses the possibility that science cannot undo something that magic ultimately caused.
_	Although he did posit the possibility that "Ocypode pygoides" and "Ocypode convexa" might actually be the same species later on in 1897.
_	The motives behind the assassination of Mora García still remain unsolved, but neither the Mexican authorities nor investigators have discarded the possibility that the attack was work-related and driven by his coverage on drug trafficking, police corruption, government-drug cartel collusion, and impunity.
_	In the Burial service, the possibility that a deceased person who has died in the faith may nevertheless not be counted amongst God's elect, is not entertained.
_	One important finding is the possibility that chromosomes are evolving from plasmids in many of these bacteria.
_	He does not disillusion Kennaston, but "gently" raises the possibility that the sigil might not be miraculous.
_	Some historians have viewed the New Jersey episode as evidence that the founders entertained the possibility that women could have political rights.
_	It compensates for (and requires) the possibility that "new physics" may be discovered at those scales which the present theory is unable to model, while enabling the current theory to give accurate predictions as an "effective theory" within its intended scale of use.
_	Stephen Thomas Erlewine of AllMusic wrote that the song "opens the door upon the possibility that the rest of the songs on the record -- the tales of heartbreak and longing, maybe even the stories of love and family -- are characters, not confession."
_	Oliver also facing with the possibility that his life might have inadvertently affected by his best friend and ally Barry Allen's time-travelling actions.
_	But it also accepted the possibility that Marhoni and Asgari were hanged simply for engaging in consensual homosexual sex.
_	Officials counseled the president and his advisers to consider a list of potential consequences, including the possibility that the Iranians might seek to retaliate by kidnapping or killing U.S. personnel in Iraq even though they were already seeking to kidnap and kill U.S. personnel.
_	This however opens up for the possibility that names are not proper, when for example more than one person shares the same name.
_	In this omission Roger Mason saw the possibility that Knox took his record of events of the Scottish Reformation, and laid the focus of his "History" on those events, and on the progress of the new Scottish kirk after the Reformation, producing a critique of recent familiar events which may have helped build community consensus.
_	Although wrestlers would be able to continue to compete in the World Games, United States wrestlers expressed grave disappointment at the possibility that they could be excluded from future Olympics.
_	This talk probably started with my question as to whether or not it was right for physicists to devote themselves in wartime to the uranium problem – as there was the possibility that progress in this sphere could lead to grave consequences in the technique of the war.
_	The current view reflects the possibility that specific changes in development can occur later in life, without having been established at birth.
_	Showrunner Joseph Mallozzi mentioned the possibility that a Replicator lied to or misinformed the Atlantis team when she said that Weir was killed.
_	Beck's documentation of the "aguelos", masked animal-like, whip-carrying ogres who would appear around bonfires called "luminarias", reveals not only Indian-Spanish-Basque dramatic hybridization, but also the possibility that, in the past, "aguelos" were secretly observing the Jewish Festival of Lights.
_	Due to the reported damage, Grady County was under strict warnings regarding the possibility that the tigers, and other creatures, might have gotten out of their habitats.
_	It suggests at least the possibility that the instrument was being used as a dance instrument by this time.
_	Kenneth Silber of Space.com wrote positively of the episode, hoping that it foreshadowed answers to come, writing "As the middle installment of a three-part story and what was then thought to be the final season premiere of "The X-Files", 'The Sixth Extinction' is suffused with a somber pre-apocalyptic mood, but one vivified by the possibility that soon we'll have answers to the most important outstanding mysteries of the series."
_	Neurogenesis is substantially reduced in the hippocampus of aged animals, raising the possibility that it may be linked to age-related declines in hippocampal function.
_	He found it necessary to banish to Virginia several of his acquaintances and friends, most of them Quakers, because of the possibility that they were siding with the British.
_	The classes in Chinese language were developed primarily because of the possibility that CASA might be called upon to, send Civil Affairs officers to the Theater for use in Formosa or on the China coast.
_	Authorities rapidly ruled out the possibility that ETA had a cell in the island, with police believing the attack had been carried out by a unit that had travelled to the island specifically to carry it out.
_	At the same time, Hutton also accepted the possibility that some of the legends associated with Murrell had come to be associated with Pickingill, although stated that this seemed to be "incapable of solid proof".
_	Downing said that their statements raised the possibility that right-wing Cubans killed Kennedy.
_	Gallant at first considered the possibility that Philip had used the attack to flee her mounting personal problems and start a new life under a new identity.
_	Brentano discusses, but rejects, the possibility that there is such a thing as the unconscious mind.
_	It is composed of government, education and industry experts who provide policy recommendations on ways to minimize the possibility that knowledge and technologies emanating from biological research will be misused to threaten public health or national security.
_	It was therefore argued that increasingly accurate measurements and modelling of the motions of the outer planets and their satellites undermined the possibility that the Pioneer anomaly is a phenomenon of gravitational origin.
_	This suggests the possibility that the dissociated selves are merely fantasies, for example, being a coping response to trauma.
_	Even though the written notice was slightly different from what the Road Traffic Act required, it was enough to have warned him of the possibility that his license could be disqualified.
_	The Primera Junta did not pledged allegiance to the Regency Counsel of Spain and the Indies, an agency of the Spanish monarchy still in operation, and in 1810 the possibility that Napoleon Bonaparte was defeated and Ferdinand returned to the throne (which would finally happened on December 11, 1813 with the signing of the Treaty of Valençay) still seemed remote and unlikely.
_	● Economics professor Richard Gilbert envisions the possibility that a coordination of enforcement and veto power in licensing among or between patentees might support the conclusion that "the benefits from coordination could outweigh the risks to competition."
_	Also, the requirement to use ground burst strikes to destroy hardened targets would produce far more fallout than the air bursts used to strike countervalue targets, which introduces the possibility that a counterforce strike would cause more civilian casualties over the medium term) than a countervalue strike.
_	There has long been a general reluctance in the field to consider the possibility that primary neural induction might be initiated by mechanical effects.
_	Many ancient writings and various similarities among two people that suggest the possibility that Croats were once the Iranian tribe were discovered.
_	To actually define a binary tree in general, we must allow for the possibility that only one of the children may be empty.
_	Eventually, they realize that this is not the first time that the Mri have been almost exterminated; in fact, the entire Mri history has been made up of the Mri fighting as mercenaries for other races, then being turned upon once their usefulness has ended, as the race(s) employing the Mri did not wish the possibility that the Mri might go and work for their enemies and be used against their former employers.
_	The hypothesis of comets made of antimatter can be traced back to the 1940s, when physicist Vladimir Rojansky proposed, in his paper "The Hypothesis of the Existence of Contraterrene Matter" the possibility that some comets and meteoroids could be made from "contraterrene" matter (i.e. antimatter).
_	Lawson told the "Columbia Spectator" that Sulkowicz and the actor had captured the shift from the consensual to non-consensual: "I think the video expresses the possibility that you don't forfeit that [consensuality] ever."
_	There is even the possibility that this vernacular Latin lasted to the late 7th century in the area of Chester, where amphorae and archaeological remnants of a local Romano-British culture at Deva Victrix have been found.
_	On the "Killer Cable Snaps" episode of the popular science television series "MythBusters", which aired on October 11, 2006, the possibility that audio could be transcribed onto pottery was tested.
_	More recently, Crusio has been investigating the possibility that "Fmr1" knockout mice might perhaps be used as a model for autism.
_	However, in the same article these authors also note that "...we want to stress that we are sympathetic with the goals of evolutionary psychology and think that research should proceed on all fronts, including the possibility that unethical behaviors such as rape evolved by natural selection".
_	Pearce also suggested the possibility that in parts of Glamorgan and Monmouthshire the Mari Lwyd tradition came under the influence of mystery plays, thus explaining why later recorded examples from those counties contained characters known as "the Sergeant" and the "Merryman".
_	Bonnar was unhappy about the possibility that his team could potentially play in Christy Ring Cup rather than the All Ireland Series in 2010.
_	During the 1960s, Mexican intellectuals began to seriously speculate about the possibility that Mexcaltitán was the mythical city of Aztlán, from where the mexicas (late known as the aztecs) left to initiate their pilgrimage.
_	the possibility that the authors of these memoranda counseled the use of lethal and unlawful techniques, and therefore face criminal culpability themselves.
_	The coincidence of this event with a major reorganization of the copper industry of the region—attributed to the results of the campaign of Pharaoh Shoshenq I—raises the possibility that the two were connected, and that camels were introduced as part of the efforts to improve efficiency by facilitating trade.
_	The beauty of the Romance language versions is that they retain their ambiguity due to the possibility that the feminine pronoun may refer to a woman or a girl, or any inanimate object or word that has the feminine gender.
_	For instance, they do not consider the possibility that species may be able to develop tolerance of new climates through acclimatization or adaptation.<ref name="doi10.1111/j.1461-0248.2005.00792.x"></ref>
_	The mine, and the possibility that other gold concessions will follow, is projected to be an important component of future export revenue for the West African state.
_	The term "Second Superpower" has been applied by scholars to the possibility that the People's Republic of China could emerge with global power and influence on par with the United States.
_	Feminist writers of that period, such as Alva Myrdal and Viola Klein, started to allow for the possibility that women should be able to combine home with outside employment.
_	He further refers to scholarly discussion of the brooches in Nazi Germany, allowing for the possibility that the designers of the Wewelsburg mosaic were indeed inspired by these historical precedents.
_	The assumption has been made by scholars and the general populace alike “that children have followed in the paths marked out for them by adults, and the possibility that they developed their own reactions and behavior in the course of their maturation has been ignored”.
_	However, the report left open the possibility that relativistic cosmic ray impact products might behave differently while transiting earth compared to "at rest" RHIC products; and the possibility that the qualitative difference between high-E proton collisions with earth or the moon might be different than gold on gold collisions at the RHIC.
_	Believing it likely that the hoodening tradition "substantially pre-dates" its earliest textual appearances, the folklorist Geoff Doel suggested the possibility that it had originated as a Midwinter rite to re-energise the vegetation.
_	These observations, combined with observations of Kepler-10's spectrum taken from the W.M. Keck Observatory, ruled out the possibility that a nearby star's light was corrupting the observed spectrum of Kepler-10 and creating the results that had led astronomers to believe that a second planet existed in Kepler-10's orbit.
_	Coined in summer 1963 to refer to the possibility that white workers, when forced to compete with their black colleagues in a shrinking job market, might "lash back", backlash came to be associated with whites' ability to do so in the voting booth in the face of racial tension, as they had done with the repeal of the Rumford Fair Housing Act in California.
_	In August 2009, "Finding Dulcinea" reported that the two earliest skulls found both show evidence of blunt-force trauma inflicted peri-mortem, suggesting the possibility that they were murdered.
_	Analysis of the bones has indicated the possibility that some of the men were killed by projectiles.
_	There was the possibility that Field might revoke the settlement he had made on his daughter at the time of her first marriage and the new couple would have no means of support.
_	Composed of as many as 300 men and led by a "Bull", the Herd would in most cases have been called in from a neighbouring town, to eliminate the possibility that the target might identify and report one of its members.
_	Diabetes is also a cause of RPN, and scholars have not ruled out the possibility that the composer had diabetes mellitus.
_	During the fourth season, Shego’s character went through some development which pointed to the possibility that she may have been growing tired of her established role as a villainous sidekick.
_	The woods were purchased in 1989 after a campaign by the local Green Party as there were concerns about the deteriorating condition of the woods and the possibility that the land might be bought by developers.
_	However, for a filter that has multiple stopbands, there is the possibility that the form of the transfer function in each stopband can be different.
_	In June and July 2016, the station's general manager and news director stepped down and moved to other Quincy Media stations; the "South Bend Tribune" reported the possibility that Quincy was planning to shut down WSJV and consolidate its
_	Based on the bus driver's uncertainty as to whether Suzanne had indeed disembarked at Collins Circle, police also began considering the possibility that she might never have returned to campus that night.
_	However, the initiation of war may also have been brought by the desire to remove the possibility that Gojoseon would ally with the Xiongnu against the Han.
_	It was also found that the car had braked before reaching the bridge, which, as the Police stated, ruled out the possibility that the driver had fallen asleep.
_	Analysis of collected CORALIE data ruled out the possibility that the detected radial velocity was caused by the blended spectrum of a spectroscopic binary star, supporting the possibility that the body orbiting WASP-44 was indeed a planet, designated WASP-44b.
_	They did not succeed and published a report in which they considered the possibility that "dephlogisticated muriatic acid air" is an element, but were not convinced.
_	The article noted that the popes had generally refrained from endorsing the blood libel, and it concluded that the accusations were unproven in a general sense, but it left open the possibility that some Jews had committed ritual murders of Christians.
_	Although the Court determined that it did not have original jurisdiction in this case, the Court held open the possibility that it yet might rule in favor of the Cherokee.
_	While the research world was initially excited by the discovery of Dr Lawrence and the possibility that a small molecule could effect the immune system, the concept of small molecules having such profound biologic effect had not been proven.
_	Anti-Communist members of the US Congress, especially Charles J. Kersten and Patrick J. Hillings of the Kersten Committee, began to use PBHISTORY documents in their reports, provided by the CIA to forestall the possibility that members of Congress, officially ignorant of the CIA's role in the Guatemalan coup, would expose other CIA projects.
_	Although developers usually produce upgrades in order to improve a product, there are risks involved—including the possibility that the upgrade will worsen the product.
_	The historian David Rollason suggested the possibility that some Romano-British saints' cults survived the Anglo-Saxon migration of the fifth century and continued to exist amid the growth of Anglo-Saxon paganism.
_	In addition to the mystery surrounding her disappearance, many of these articles focus on the content and style of Converse's music – and the possibility that she may be the earliest performer in the singer-songwriter genre.
_	According to the "New York Times", "the damage was nowhere near severe enough to have come from an Israeli F-16, raising the possibility that an errant missile fired by Palestinian militants was responsible for the deaths."
_	After Sheila finds out about how Howie's parasite revived, she concludes that the parasites must have their hosts eat large quantities of salt in order to survive, which leads them to investigate the local salt mines for the possibility that that is where they are during the day.
_	At the time, Russia was at war with Great Britain (the Crimean War), and alarmed at the possibility that Russia would obtain the upper hand in Japan, Royal Navy vice admiral Sir James Stirling, commander of the East Indies and China Station led a fleet of British warships to Nagasaki on September 7, 1854.
_	It seems best to hold open the possibility that there may be a connection between them, but there may not be.
_	Carlos Fuentes raised the possibility that Cervantes and Shakespeare were the same person, in the sense that Homer, Dante, Defoe, Dickens, Balzac, and Joyce are all the same writer whose spirit wanders through the centuries.
_	Dromaeosaurid fossils have been found across the globe in North America, Europe, Africa, Asia, South America and Antarctica, with fossilized teeth giving credence to the possibility that they inhabited Australia as well.
_	Merton M. Sealts, Jr., in state of the field note of 1980, endorsed the possibility that Melville wrote the story in the winter of 1853 with Hawthorne's style in mind and that the work was a transition toward the "Hawthornesqe symbolism" of Melville's later stories.
_	Russian military experts have downplayed any significant competition from the J-15 in the global arms market, with Col. Igor Korotchenko of the Ministry of Defence stating in early June 2010, "The Chinese J-15 is unlikely to achieve the same performance characteristics of the Russian Su-33 carrier-based fighter, and I do not rule out the possibility that China could return to negotiations with Russia on the purchase of a substantial batch of Su-33s."
_	Still, while allowing for the possibility that "new data will be found", the authors credited Baudino's former station, 8ZZ/KDKA, as being the "oldest [surviving] station in the nation".
_	At the same time he did not exclude the possibility that they may have been a horde of the Jukambal.
_	Malthael's action leaves the possibility that Diablo will return in a future installment.
_	At this stage we would like to point out that we do not rule out the possibility that this site may have other large chambers which are yet to be discovered.
_	DejaNews was the first large-scale commercial attempt to archive the Usenet news feed, and several newsgroup participants were concerned about privacy rights and about the possibility that their messages could be re-posted through DejaNews in the future.
_	Descartes fails to consider the possibility that future automata might be able to overcome such insufficiency, and so does not propose the Turing test as such, even if he prefigures its conceptual framework and criterion.
_	In 2015, Ernst van de Wetering of the Rembrandt Research Project said that "the formal properties and execution of [this] painting, I am convinced, exclude the possibility that it could be an autograph work by Rembrandt", and that the painting recalls Aert de Gelder.
_	At the same time, the Doctor (Peter Capaldi) is attempting to explore the possibility that everyone has a constant companion, like a shadow, that is always with them, relating back to the recurring dream of the monster under the bed.
_	With the possibility that Ken could be released, Disa is forced to admit to the sexual abuse he had subjected her to.
_	In the season three episode "Pandora's Box", Jamie causes a citywide power blackout in New York City, and the effects of the blackout are seen in the "Friends" episode, "The One with the Blackout", and there was also a blackout in the episode "Birthday in the Big House" of the short-lived NBC sitcom "Madman of the People", which leaves open the possibility that the characters from this program may also exist in the same universe as the characters of "Mad About You."
_	With reductions planned of nuclear weapons in Europe, which may retire the older Mod 3 and 4 and the Mod 10 already slated for retirement, and the possibility that European nations may not build or procure new aircraft to carry the Mod 12 would eliminate the need for consolidation into a new type.
_	It was not known what happened to Beagle for 11 years after its landing, and was considered a lost, but when it was found 2015 intact it raised the possibility that it had successfully played the song on Christmas Day in 2003 when it landed, but failed to transmit back to Earth.
_	Although medical evidence presented at the trial of the accused Detective Constables raised the possibility that Jackson's injuries were self-inflicted, on 23 December 1975 a magistrate upheld the charge against the two CID men and they were fined £10 each.
_	Once one considers the possibility that labor can be seen as an intermediate surrogate for more fundamental factors, like know-how, materials and energy, then it is a short step to treat (as Boulding sometimes does) capital as a surrogate for know-how and land as surrogate for material resources and the traditional factors of production, land, labor and capital, are easily rearticulated as know-how, energy and materials.
_	Williams said a decision on a proposal would be made by the end of the year, and left open the possibility that the city would subsidize the hotel's financing.
_	Reporters Without Borders is thoroughly convinced that Li's death was caused by his recent research on the oil scam: "We hope the authorities will carry out a thorough investigation and will seriously consider the possibility that Li was killed in connection with his work as a journalist."
_	S. Safrai and M. Stern suggest the possibility that someone at Joppa established a cult of the monster under the name Ceto.
_	He did not rule out the possibility that "nous" might survive without the rest of the soul, as in Plato, but he specifically says that this immortal "nous" does not include any memories or anything else specific to an individual's life.
_	Until very recently, no one had ever documented the presence of nociceptors (the cells that detect and transmit sensations of pain) in insects, though recent findings of nociception in larval fruit flies challenges this and raises the possibility that some insects may be capable of feeling pain.
_	European populations will become more ethnically diverse, with the possibility that today's majority ethnic groups will no longer comprise a numerical majority in some countries.
_	Others may acknowledge the possibility that they could develop the illness, but believe it is unlikely.
_	While aversive racists typically recommended an aggressive treatment plan more often for White than for Black patients, those who were made aware of the possibility that their implicit biases could be informing their treatment recommendations did not end up showing such a disparity in their treatment plans.
_	If this is so, it opens up the possibility that Geoffrey of Monmouth's narrative about Uther impregnating Igerna with Merlin's help (see below) was taken from a Welsh legend where Uthyr changed his own shape, Merlin possibly being added to the story by Geoffrey.
_	This in turn raised the possibility that it could fall on 22 March, and thus Easter Day might theoretically commence before the equinox.
_	This latter discovery suggested the possibility that a vaccine could eventually be developed.
_	This statement does not rule out the possibility that a quantity of energy could disappear from one point while simultaneously appearing at another point.
_	Roddenberry corresponded with science fiction writer Isaac Asimov about how to address the issue of Spock's growing popularity and the possibility that his character would overshadow Kirk.
